B
A REMINISCENCE OF FEDERALISM.
Oh shame on men! devil with devil damn'd,
Firm concord holds: men only disagree
Of creatures rational, though under hope
Of heavenly grace: and God proclaiming peace,
Yet live in hatred, enmity, and strife.
Milton
.
A calm
observer who has scarcely lived half the
age of man, must look back with a smile at human
frailty, rather than with a harsher feeling upon the
subjects that have broken the world in which he has
lived, (be it a little or a great one,) into opposed and
contending parties. The stream for a while glides on
with an unbroken surface, a snag interposes, and the
waters divide, and fret, and foam around it till chance
or time sweep it away, when they again commingle,
and flow on in their natural unruffled union. This is
the common course of human passions. The subject
in dispute may be more or less dignified; the
succession
to an empire, or to a few acres of sterile land;
the rival claims of candidates to the Presidency, or
competitors for a village clerkship; the choice of a
minister to England, or the minister of
our
parish; the
position of a capital city, or of an obscure meeting
house;
[1]
[1]
This fruitful subject of dispute has rent asunder many a village
society in New England.
the excellence of a Catalini, or of a rustic
master of psalmody; a dogma in religion or politics;
in short anything, to which, as with the shield in the
fable, there are two sides.
Some who have lived to swell the choral song to
Adams and Jefferson, and blend their names in one
harmonious peal, will remember when the one, in his
honest estimation, was a patriot hero, and the other
the arch enemy of his country. For myself, having
been bred, according to the strictest sect of my
political
religion, a federalist, I regarded Mr. Jefferson,
(whom all but his severest enemies do not now deny,
to have been a calm, and at least well-intentioned
philosopher,) as embodying in his own person
whatever
was impracticable, heretical and corrupt in politics,
religion and morals. Some impressions of my early
childhood which were connected with the subsequent
fate of obscure but interesting individuals, have
preserved
a vivid recollection of those party strifes that
should now only be remembered to assuage the heat
of present controversies.
I was sent when a very young child, (I am not the
hero of my own story, my readers must therefore bear
with a little prefatory egotism,) to pass the summer in
a clergyman's family in Vermont, in a village which
I shall take the liberty to call Carrington. Whether
I was sent there for the advantage of a better school
than my own village afforded, or for the flattering
reason that governs the disposition of most younger
children in a large family, to be got out of the way,
the domestic archives do not reveal. Whatever was
the motive, I am indebted to the fact for some of the
most interesting recollections of my life. The first
absence from home is a period never forgotten, and
always vivid. How well do I remember the aspect
of that long, broad, and straight street that traversed
the village of Carrington, as it appeared to me when I
first entered it. The meeting house, with its tall,
grenadier looking steeple; the freshly painted school
house, the troop of shouting boys springing from its
portal; the neat white houses with Venetian blinds, and
pretty court-yards and gardens, the dwellings of the
physician, the lawyer, and the merchant, the modest
gentry of the place; and that, to my youthful vision,
colossal piece of architecture, a staring flaming
mansion
,
(I afterwards learned that
Squire Hayford
was
its master,) with pilasters, pillars and piazzas, a
balustrade
,
cupola, and
four
chimneys! Even then I
turned my eyes from this chef-d'uvre of rustic art
to the trees by the way side, whose topmost boughs
in their freshest green, (for summer was still in its
youth,) were flushed with the beams of the setting sun.
And I eagerly gazed at the parsonage which stood at
the extremity of the plain, flanked by an orchard of
scrawny neglected apple trees, its ill-proportioned form,
and obtrusive angles sheltered by the most ample
elm that ever unfolded its rich volume of boughs. A
willow there was too, I remember, that hung its tresses
over the old well-curb, for there Fanny Atwood and I
have cracked many a last year's butternut, sweeter
to us far than the freshest, most flavorous nuts of the
south, or any thing else would now be.
It is difficult, in our levelling and disenchanted days,
to recall the awe that thirty years ago the puritan
clergy of New England inspired in the minds of
children
.
Who is there bred in the land of the pilgrims,
that has not in his memory an immaculate personage,
tall or short but always erect, with a three-cornered
cocked hat, long blue yarn stockings drawn over the
knee, silver shoe buckles and a silver headed cane,
looking stern and unrelenting, as if he embodied the
terrors of the law? Who does not remember
depressing
his voice and checking the little footsteps that
lightly pressed the ground, as he passed the
minister's
house, the domain that seemed to him to shut out
all human sympathies, to stand between heaven and
earth, a certain purgatory, at least to all youthful
sinners
?
With such prepossessions I entered Dr. Atwood's
family. The Doctor himself was absent on some
pastoral duty when I arrived. I was soon put at my
ease by the hospitalities of his social family. How the
prejudices of childhood melt away and disappear in
the first beam of kindness! A most kind and simple
hearted race were the Atwoods. Miss Sally, the oldest,
was housekeeper; a bountiful provider of
spring
beer
, cherry pies and gingerbread. Man and woman
too, and above all a child, is an eating animal. The
record of her culinary virtues remains long after every
other trace of good Miss Sally has faded from my
mind. The second sister was Miss Nancy, a weakly
person she was called, and truly was. I can see her
pale serious face now, in which sensibility to her own
ailments, and solicitude for those of her fellow mortals,
were singularly blended; her slender tall figure, as
she stood shaking that vial with contents so mysterious
to me, which she called her mixture; her hands all
veins and chords that seemed to have been made to
spread plasters. Miss Nancy, in poetic phrase, was
a culler of simples. She gathered herbs, (my friend
Fanny called them
sickness
,) for all the village, and
administered them too. She could tell with unerring
certainty when motherwort would kill, and boneset
would cure. Forgive me, gentle reader, (for Miss
Nancy could not,) if I have mistaken an alias for a
species. In brief, Miss Nancy was one of those
prudent
apprehensive people peculiarly annoying to
children. Her memory was a treasure house of hair
breadth escapes and fatal accidents; and her eye, like
that of a speculator devouring the prices of stocks,
would fix upon that imaginative column in the
newspapers
devoted to the enumeration of such fancy
articles as caution to youths; fatal sport;
hydrophobia
!
&c., &c. Malvina was the third daughter;
I knew little of her, for she was a lady of the shears,
and pursued her calling by keeping the even tenor of her
way through the neighbourhood, making auld claiths
look amaist as weel's the new. I should have said
that Malvina was among the few who would go through
life content with the sphere Providence had assigned
B 2
her, without one craving from that divinity that
stirs within; limiting her ambition to pleasing the
little boys, and satisfying their mammas, and her
desires
to her well-earned twenty-five cents per day.
But Malvina married and emigrated. Her husband
was, as I have heard, a disciple of Tom Paine, and
poor Melvina, who was only adequate to shape a sleeve
or collar, began to reason of fate and free will,
foreknowledge
absolute; and afterwards, when she visited
her friends, she bewailed their irrational views,
wondered they could believe the Bible! and would
have enlightened them with that precious text-book,
the Age of Reason, had not Dr. Atwood consigned it
forthwith to an auto-de-f.
The doctor, according to the common custom of New
England clergymen, who have an income of four or
five hundred dollars a year, had educated several sons
at college. One was a thriving attorney and counsellor
at law, in New York, and two others, (who closed the
account of the doctor's first marriage,) were keeping
school, and qualifying themselves for the learned
professions
.
The doctor in middle life, as it is by courtesy
called, but long after his sun had declined from its
meridian, had married a young and very pretty girl,
who, by all accounts, looked much beside her autumnal
consort, like a fresh blown rose attached to a stalk of
sere and yellow leaves. The human frailty the doctor
betrayed in his preference of this lamb of his flock
over certain quite mature candidates for his conjugal
favour, gave such scandal to his parish that the good
man was fain to leave Connecticut, the land of his
forefathers, and remove to Vermont, then called the
new state
, where his domestic arrangements were
viewed with more indulgence. His wife, who seems
to have had no fault but that one which was mending
every day, died in the course of a few years, after
having augmented the doctor's wealth by the addition
of one child.
This child was the gem of the family, and a gem of
purest ray serene, was my little friend Fanny.
Fanny
Atwood! Writing her name, even at this distance
of time, makes my heart beat quicker. Affection has its
bright, its immortal names, that will live after the
trump of fame is a broken instrument, and the names
it has pealed over the world are with all forgotten
things. Perhaps I commit a mistake in making Fanny
Atwood the heroine of a story. It may be that like
those wild flowers she so much resembled, that are so
delicate and sweet in their native green wood, but so
fragile that they fade and droop as soon as they are
exposed
to the eye of the sun, and appear spiritless and
insignificant when compared with the splendid belles of
the green-house, on which the art of the horticulturist
has been exhausted, so my little rustic favourite may
seem tame, and she and her fortunes be derided by the
fine ladies, if any such grace my humble tale with a
listening ear.
I have known those who have drank of the tainted
waters of a city till they confessed that the pure
element as it welled up from the green turf, or sparkled
in the crystal fountain of a mountain rock, was tasteless
and disagreeable! But I know those too, who, though
they have mastered the music of Rossini, have yet
ears and hearts for wood notes wild. Nature is too
strong for art, and those who are accustomed to the
refinements of artificial life, may look
without
a
disdainful smile on Fanny Atwood as she was when
I first saw her; as she continued, the picture of
simplicity
and all loveable qualities. She had a little
round Hebe form. Her neck, chest, shoulders and
arms were the very beau ideal of a French dress
maker, so fair and fat; her hands were formed in the
most delicate mould, and dimpled as an infant's; her
hair was of the tinge between flaxen and brown; glossy
and wavy. Her mouth bore the signet of the sweet
and playful temper that bade defiance to all the
curdling tendencies of life, it was certainly the fittest
organ for words o' kindness that could be formed.
She had a slight lisp; graceful enough in childhood,
but happily, as she grew up, it wore off. The line of
her nose was sufficiently Grecian to be called so by her
admirers, but her eyes, I am compelled to confess, even
while I yet feel their warm and gentle beam upon me,
were not according to the rule of beauty; they were
clear and bright as health and cheerfulness could make
them, but they lacked many shades of the violet, and
were smaller than the orthodox heroine dimensions.
If my bill of particulars fail to present the image of
my friend, let my readers embody health, good humour,
order, a disinterestedness, considerateness or
mindfulness
,
a quick sympathy with joy and sorrow, in the
image of a girl of nine years, and it cannot fail to
resemble Fanny Atwood. She would have been a
spoiled child, if unbounded love and indulgence could
have spoiled her; but she was like those fruits and
flowers which are only made more beautiful or flavorous
by the fervid rays of the sun. She sometimes tried
Miss Sally's patience by a too free dispensation of the
luxuries of her frugal pantry, and Miss Nancy's by
deriding her herb teas, even that sovereignest thing
on earth, her motherwort; and once, when in the act
of raising a dose of the panacea, the
mixture
, to her
lips, she let fall dose, vial and all;
accidentally
, no
doubt; but poor Miss Nancy! I think her nerves
never quite recovered the shock. However, these
offences were soon forgiven, and would have been, if
magnified a hundred fold, for in the touching language
of old Israel, Fanny was the only child of her
mother
,
and her mother was dead.
I was within a few months of Fanny's age when we
first met, and with the facility of childhood we became
friends in half an hour. She had presented me to her
two favourites, a terrier puppy and a black cat, between
whom she had so assiduously cultivated a friendship
that she had converted their natural gall into honey,
and they coursed up and down the house together to
the infinite amusement of my friend, and the perpetual
annoyance of the elderly members of the family.
Nothing
could better illustrate Fanny's power, than the
indulgence she obtained for these little pests. Miss
Sally prided herself on her discipline of animals, but
she was brought to wink at Fido's misdeeds, suffered
him to sleep all day by the winter's fire, and when she
once or twice resolutely ordered him out for the night,
she was persuaded by Fanny to get up out of her
warm bed and let him in. And the cat, though Miss
Nancy's aversion, fairly installed herself on a corner
of Fanny's chair, and was thrice a day fed from her
plate.
As I have said, Fanny and I made rapid progress in
our friendship. She had introduced me to her little
family of dolls, which were all patriotic, all of home
manufacture, and I had offered to her delighted vision
my
compagnon de voyage
a London doll; in our eyes,
the master piece of the arts. We were consulting
confidently on some matters touching our respective
families, when I heard the lumbering sound of the
doctor's chaise, and I felt a chill come over me like
that of poor Jack, the bean-climer of aspiring memory,
when seated at the giant's hearth, and chattering with
his lady, he first heard the homeward step of her
redoubtable
lord and master. My prejudiees against the
clerical order were certainly not dispelled by my first
impressions of Doctor Atwood. He wore a thick set
foxy wig, cut by a semi-circular around the forehead.
His chin was not a
freshly
mown stubble field, for it
was Saturday, and the doctor shaved but once a week.
His figure was tall and corpulent, and altogether he
presented a lowering and most forbidding aspect to
one who had been accustomed to a more advanced
state of civilization than his person indicated. I had
retreated to the furthest corner of the room, dropped
my head and hidden my doll in my handkerchief, when
Fanny, to my astonishment, dragging me into notice,
exclaimed in the most affectionate tone, Oh, father,
how glad I am you have come! I wanted you to see
C's doll; she is the most perfect beauty! are you
not glad she's come? Now meaning me, not the doll.
The doctor made no reply for a moment, and when
he did, he merely said, without a sign of courtesy or
even humanity, How d'ye do, child, pretty well?
Father! exclaimed Fanny in a tone which betrayed
her mortification and disappointment. I shrank away
to my seat, but Fanny remained hovering about the
place where her father stood, lost apparently in sullen
abstraction. The doctor sat down. Fanny seated
herself on his knee; I wondered she could. How
funny your wig looks! father, she said, it's all
awry. Then laughing, and giving it a fearless twirl,
she took a comb from the doctor's waistcoat pocket,
smoothed it down, threw her fat arms round his neck
and kissed him first on one cheek, then on the other,
saying, you look quite handsome, now, father!
Scanty as my literature was, a classical allusion
occurred
to me; Beauty and the Beast! thought I, but
far would it have been from the nature of that Beast
to have been as dull to the caresses of Beauty as the
doctor seemed to Fanny's. She was evidently
perplexed
by his apparent apathy; for a moment she laid
her cheek to his, then sprang from his knee and went
to a cupboard about ten inches square, made in the
chimney beside the fireplace, (an anomaly in
architecture
,
these puritan cupboards were,) and drew from it a
long pipe, filled, lighted, and put it in her father's lips.
He received it passively, smoked it with continued
unconsciousness, and when the tobacco was exhausted,
threw pipe and all out of the window. Fanny looked
at me and laughed, then suddenly changing to an
expression of solicitude, she leaned her elbow on the
doctor's knee, looked up in his face, and said in a
voice that must penetrate to the heart, what
is
the
matter, father?
The doctor seemed suddenly to recover his faculties;
to come to himself
, in common phrase, and with tears
gushing from his eyes, he said, Fanny, my child,
poor Randolph's mother is dead.
Dead
, father! What will Randolph do?
Do, Fanny? replied the doctor, brushing off his
tears, why he will do his duty; no easy matter in the
poor boy's case. The doctor then proceeded to relate
the scene he had just come from witnessing, and
which had melted one of the tenderest hearts that ever
was in a human frame, uncouth and repelling as that
frame was. The facts which will explain the doctor's
emotions are briefly these. There was a certain Squire
Hayford residing in Carrington, the proprietor of the
stately mansion we have noticed. He was a democrat,
according to the classification of that day, and one of
the most impassioned order. A democrat in theory,
but in his own little sphere as absolute a despot as ever
sat on a throne. He was the wealthiest man in
Carrington
,
owned most land, and had most ready money;
in short, he was the great man of the place, and, as
was happily said on another occasion, the smallest of
his species. Of all the men I ever met with he had
the most unfounded and absurd vanity. His opinions
were all prejudices, and in each and all of them he
held himself infallible. He was the centre of his
world, the sun of his system, which he divided into
concentric circles.
Himself
first, then
his
household,
his
town,
his
county,
his
state, &c. Fortunately for
himself, he had adopted the popular side in politics,
and with a character that would have been particularly
odious to the sovereign people, he made himself an
oracle among them. This man had one child, a
daughter, a gentle and lovely woman as she was
described
to me, who some fourteen years before my
story begins, had married a Mr. Gordon, from one
of the Southern States. It was a clandestine marriage.
Squire Hayford having refused his consent, because
Gordon
was a southerner, and he held all southerners
in utter contempt and aversion, and never graced them
with any other name than slave-drivers, with the
addition of such expletives as might give force to the
reproach. Gordon was a high spirited man and an
ardent lover, and he easily persuaded Miss Hayford to
escape from the unreasonable opposition of her father,
and transfer her allegiance to him. This was her first
disobedience, but disobedience to him was an
unpardonable
sin in the squire's estimation, and he
permitted his only child to encounter the severest evils,
and languish through protracted sufferings, before he
manifested the slightest relenting. She lost several
children; she became a widow, was reduced to
penury
,
and sacrificed her health in one of our southern
cities, in an attempt to gain a livelihood as governess.
Her father then sent her a pitiful sum of money, and
information that a small house in Carrington, belonging
to him was vacant, and she might come and occupy it
if she would. The kindness was scanty, and the
manner of it churlish enough; but disease and penury
cut off all fastidiousness, and Mrs. Gordon returned to
Carrington with her only son Randolph.
Here she languished month after month. The bare
necessities of existence were indirectly supplied by her
father, but he never visited her, never spoke to her,
and, what affected her more deeply, he never noticed
her son, never betrayed a consciousness of his
existence
.
Adversity, if it does not sever the ties of nature,
multiplies and strengthens them. Never was there a
tenderer union than that which subsisted between
Randolph and his mother, and nothing could have
been more natural than Fanny's exclamation when told
of Mrs. Gordon's death, for it seemed as if the life of
parent and child were fed from the same fountain.
As my readers are now acquainted with the relative
position of the parties, I shall give the doctor's account
to Fanny in his own words. I left the chaise at Mrs.
Gordon's door, my child, said he, that Randolph
might take her to ride. They had ridden but a short
distance when she complained of faintness, and
Randolph
turned back. She had fainted quite away just
as they stopped at their own door. There was a man
riding past; Randolph called to him for help. He
came and assisted in carrying the poor lady to her
bed. When she recovered her senses, she looked up
and saw the man; it was her father, Fanny!
Her father! what, that hateful old Squire Hayford?
Yes, my child. Providence brought him to her
threshold at the critical moment. When I called for
the chaise, I went in. I saw she was dying.
Randolph
was bathing her head with camphor, and his
tears dropped on the pillow like rain. Her father
stood a little way from the bed. He looked pale and
his lip quivered. Ah, Fanny, my child, death takes
hold of the heart that nothing else will reach. When
Mrs. Gordon heard my step she looked up at me and
said, `I believe I am dying; pray with me once more
Dr. Atwood; pray that my father may forgivethat
hemay' and here her voice faltered, but she
looked at Randolph, and I understood her, and went
to prayer.
But, father, what did Squire Hayford do? you know
he swore a horrid oath last Independence that he
would never hear `Parson Fed
[2]
[2]
Federalist.
pray again.'
Yes, yes, Fanny, I remember, and he
remembered
too, for he walked out of the door and stood in
the porch, but I took care to raise my voice so loud
that he could not help hearing me. The Lord assisted
me, my child; words came to me faster than I could
utter them; thoughts, but not my thoughts; words,
C
but not of my choosing, for they pierced even my
own heart. When I had done, Squire Hayford came
in, walked straight to the bed, and said, `Mary, I
forgive you; I wish your troubles may be all at an end,
but I am not answerable for your past sufferings; I
told you what you must expect when you married that
southern beggar.'
Father, exclaimed Fanny, why did you not stop
him?
I did long to knock him down, Fanny, and I thought
Randolph would, for his black eyes flashed fire; but
oh, how quick they fell again when his mother looked
up like a dying saint as she was, and said, `Father,
let the past be past.'
`Well,' said he, `so I will; and as I am a man of
deeds and not of words, I promise you I will do well
by your boy; I will take him home, and he shall be
the same as a son to me, provided'
Here he paused. I think she did not hear his last
word, for her face lighted up, she clasped her hands
and thanked God for crowning with such mercy
her dying hour; then she drew Randolph down to
her, kissed him, and said, `now, my son, I can die in
peace.' `But,' said her father, `you have not heard
me out, Mary. Randolph must give up the name of
Gordon for that of Hayford'
Oh, father, interrupted Fanny, he did not, did he?
Let me finish, child. The poor lady at the thought
of her son giving up his dead father's name, heaved a
sigh so deep and heavy, that I feared her breath would
have gone with it. She looked at Randolph, but he
turned away his eye. `My dear child,' she said,
`it must be; it is hard for me to ask and you to do,
but it must be; speak Randolph, say you accept the
terms.
Thus pressed, the poor boy spoke, and spoke out
his heart, `Do not ask me that, mother,' he said;
`give up my dear father's name! No, never, never!'
`My child, you must, you will be destitute;
without
a home, a friend, a morsel of bread.'
`I shall not be destitute, mother, I can work, and
is not Doctor Atwood my friend! and besides, mother,
I care not what becomes of me when you are gone.'
`But I do, my son; I cannot leave you so. Oh,
promise me, Randolph.'
`Do not ask me, mother; I cannot give up the
name I love and honour above all others, for that'
I know not what the poor boy might have said, for his
mother stopped him. `Listen to me, my son,' she
said, `my breath is almost spent; you know how I
have been punished for one act of disobedience; how
much misery I brought on your dear father, on
all of us; you may repair my fault. Oh, give me
peace, promise to be faithful in your mother's place
to her father.'
`I will promise any thing, dear mother; I will do
any thing but take his name.'
`All is useless without that;' her voice sunk to a
whisper,`dear, dear child,' she added, `it is my
last
wish.' I saw her countenance was changing,
and I believe I said, `she is going,' and poor
Randolph
cried out, `Mother, mother, I will do every
thing you askI promise' a sweet smile spread
over her face. He laid his cheek to her's, she tried
to kiss him, but her lips never moved again, and in a
few moments, my dear Fanny, she was with the saints
in heaven.
Fanny's tears had coursed down her cheeks as her
father had proceeded in his narration. Soon after I
heard her repeating to herself, Randolph Hayford,
Randolph Hayford; I will never call him anything
but Randolph; but I suppose I shall not often have a
chance to call him anything. That cross old Squire
Hayford hates you so, father, he'll never let Randolph
come and see us; he'll never let him go anywhere
but to some dirty democrat's.
I now look back, almost unbelieving of my own
recollections, at the general diffusion of the political
prejudices of those times. No age nor sex was exempt
from them. They adhered to an old man to the very
threshold of another world, and they sometimes clouded
the serene heaven of such a mind as my friend Fanny
Atwood's.
The rival parties in Carrington were so nearly
balanced, that each individual's weight was felt in the
scale. All qualities and relations were merged in the
political attribute. I have often heard, when the bell
tolled the knell of a departed neighbour, the most kind
hearted person say,
we
or
they
have lost a vote!
Good Doctor Atwood was as sturdy in his political as
in his religious faith. He had a vein of humanity like
my Uncle Toby's, that tempered his judgment in
individual cases, but in the abstract, I rather think he
believed that none but federalists and the orthodox,
according to the sound school of the Mathers and
Cottons, could enter the kingdom of heaven. With
this creed, with an ardent temperament that glowed
to the last hour of his life, and with the faculty of
expressing pithily what he felt strongly, and without
fear or awe of mortal man, he was, of course, loved
almost to idolatry by his own party, and hated in equal
measure by the rival faction.
I have said that the village street of Carrington
traversed a hill and plain. The democrats for the most
part occupied the hill. What an infected district it
then seemed to me! The federalists (alas! was it an
augury of their descending fortunes?) lived in the vale.
The most picturesque object in the village, and one as
touching to the sentimental observer as Sterne's dead
ass, was a superannuated horse; a poor commoner, who
picked up an honest living by the way side. His walk
was as regular as Edie Ochiltree's, or any other
licensed
gaberlunzie's
. He began in the morning, and
grazing along, he arrived about midday at the end of
his tour, he then crossed the street and returned, now
and then resting his weary limbs in the shadow of a
tree planted by the way side. Thus sped his innocent
life. It was an edifying sight to see the patience and
satisfaction with which he gleaned his scanty portion
of the bounties of nature. Jacques would have
moralized
on the spectacle. The children called him Clover,
why, I know not, unless it were an allusion to his
green old age. He was a great favourite with the little
urchins; the youngest among them were wont to
make their first equestrian essays on Clover's bare
back. My friend Fanny's gentle heart went out
towards him in the respect that waits on age. Many
a time have I known her to abstract a measure of oats
from the parson's frugal store, and set it under the elm
tree for Clover, and as she stood by him while he was
eating, patting and stroking him, he would look round
at her with an expression of mute gratitude and
fondness, that words could not have rendered more
intelligible.
Strange as it may seem, even poor Clover was
converted into a political instrument. This innocent
beast and of a good conscience, was made to supply
continual fuel to the inflammable passions of the fiery
politicians of Carrington. His sides were pasted over
with lampoons in which the rival factions vented their
wit or their malignity safe from personal responsibility,
for Clover could tell no tales. Thus he trudged from
the hill, a walking gazette, his ragged and grizzled
sides covered with these militant missives, and returned
bearing the responses of the valley, as unconscious of
his hostile burden, as the mail is of its portentous
contents. Sometimes, indeed, Clover carried that
which was more accordant with his kind and loving
nature.
As Fanny had predicted, after Randolph's removal
to the great house, his grandfather prohibited his visits
at Doctor Atwood's, but Fanny often met him in the
C 2
lagging walk to school, berrying, nutting, and on all
neutral ground, and when they did not meet, they
maintained a continual correspondence by Clover. The
art was simple by which they secured their billetdoux
from the public eye, but it sufficed. The inside
contained
the effusion of their hearts. The outside was
scribbled with some current political sarcasm or joke.
The initial letter of Randolph's superscription was
always F., Fanny's G., for she tenaciously adhered to
the name of Gordon. The communications were
attached by the corners to Clover. I found recently
among some forgotten papers one of Fanny's notes, and
childish as it is, I shall make no apology for inserting
it verbatim.
Dear RandolphI thank you a thousand times and
so does C, for the gold eagles. There never was
anything in the world so beautiful, I do'nt believe.
They are far before the grown up ladies. We shall
certainly wear them to meeting next Sabbath, and fix
them so every body in the world can see them, and not
let the bow of ribbon fall down over them, as Miss
Clarke did last Sabbath, cause she has got that old
democrat, Doctor Star, for a sweetheart; but I managed
her nicely, Randolph. In prayer time when she did
not dare move, I whirled round the bow so the eagle
stood up bravely, and flashed right in Doctor Star's
eyes. I did not care so very much about having an
eagle for myself, (though I do now since you have
given it to me,) but I thought it very important for
C to wear the federal badge, because her father is
a senator in Congress. Father is almost as pleased as
we are. I see Clover coming and I must make haste;
poor old fellow! I heard his tread when it stormed so
awfully last night, and I got father to put him up in our
stable. Was not he proper good? It was after prayers,
too, and his wig was off and his knee buckles out. There,
they all go out of Deacon Garfield's to read Clover's
papers. Good by, dear,
dear
Randolph.
F. A.
If my readers are inclined to smile at the defects of
my heroine's epistle, they must remember those were
not the days when girls studied Algebra, and read
Virgil in the original before they were ten years old.
Besides, I have not claimed for Fanny intellectual
brilliancy. The manifestations of her mind were
(where some bel esprits last look for it,) in the
conduct of her daily life.
But I am fondly lingering on the childhood of my
friend. I must resolutely pass over the multitude of
anecdotes that occur to me, to those incidents that are
sufficiently dignified for publication.
Eight years flowed on without working any other
change in the condition of my friends in Carrington
than is commonly effected by the passage of time.
Doctor Atwood continued his weekly ministrations,
varied only by a slight verbal alteration in his prayer.
During Mr. Adams's presidency, he implored the Lord
to
continue
to us rulers endued with the spirit of their
station. When Mr. Jefferson became chief magistrate,
he substituted
give
for continue. Miss Sally still
brewed and backed with her accustomed energy. Miss
Nancy by the too lavish consumption of her own
nostrums, had lost everything but her shadow. Squire
Hayford was more opinionated and insufferable than
ever. Poor old Clover was dead, and at Fanny's
request, had been honourably interred beneath the elm
tree, his favourite
poste restante
. Fanny had preserved
the distinctive traits of her childhood, and at seventeen,
was as good humoured, as simple, as lovely and, (as
more than one thought,) far more loveable than when
I first knew her.
The sad trials of Randolph's youth had early ripened
his character, and had given to it an energy and
self-government
that he could have derived alone from the
discipline of such circumstances. The lofty spirit of
his father had fallen on him like the mantle of an
ascending prophet. His mother's concentrated
tenderness
had fostered his sensibility, and the influence of
her dying hour passed not away with the days of
mourning, but stamped his whole after life.
Who has ever lost a friend, without that feeling so
natural, that a painter of nature has put it into the
mouth of a man lamenting over a dead beast? I am
sure thou hast been a merciful master to him, said I.
Alas! said the mourner, I thought so when he was
alive, but now that he is dead I think otherwise.
The solution of this universal lamentation and just
suffering, must be found in the fact that the very best
fall far short of the goodness of which their Creator has
made them capable. It is in the spirit of expiation that
far more deference is paid to the wishes of the dead
than the living; and affectionate and devoted as
Randolph was to his mother, I doubt if she had lived,
that she ever could have persuaded him to the sacrifices
and efforts he made for her sake when she was dead.
He immediately assumed the name of Hayford, without
expressing a regret, even to Fanny; and accustomed as
he had been to the control alone of his gentle mother,
he submitted without a murmur to the petty and
irritating tyrannies of his grandfather. He suppressed
the expression of his opinions and surrendered his
strongest inclinations at the squire's command. Never
was there a case in which the sanctifying influence of
a pure motive was more apparent. The same deference
which Randolph paid to his relative, might have been
rendered by a sordid dependant, but then where would
have been that moral power which gave Randolph an
ascendancy even over the narrow and unperceiving
mind of his grandfather, and which achieved another
and a more honourable triumph.
A Mrs. Hunt, a widowed sister of the squire, presided
over the female department of his family. She was a
well intentioned woman, a meek and patient drudge,
who had been content to toil in his house year after
year, for the poorest of all compensations,
presents;
the common and wretched requital for the services of
relations. Mrs. Hunt had been sustained in her
endurance by a largess that now and then fell upon her
eldest son, and by the hope that ultimately her brother's
fortune would descend to her unportioned children.
This hope was suddenly blighted by his adoption of
Randolph; and Randolph, of course, became the object
of her dislike, and he daily suffered those annoyances
and discomforts which a woman always has in her
power to inflict. To these he opposed a respectful
deportment; a mindfulness of her convenience and
comfort, and a generous attention to her children,
which smoothed her rugged path, and all unused as
she was to such humanities, won her heart. It was
not long before the good woman found herself going
to him, whom she had regarded as her natural enemy,
for aid and sympathy in all her troubles.
If I am prosing, my readers must forgive me. It has
always seemed to me that we may get the most useful
lessons from those who are placed in circumstances
not uncommon, nor striking, but to which a parallel
may be found in every day's experience. It is a
common doctrine, but one not favourable to virtue, that
characters are formed by circumstances. If it be true,
my friend Randolph was a noble exception; his
character controlled circumstances; and, by the
best of all alchymy, he extracted wholesome food
out of the materials that might have been poison to
another.
His boyish affection for Fanny Atwood had ripened
into the tenderest love, and was fully returned, without
my friend ever having endured the reserve and distrust
that are supposed to be necessary to the progress of
the passion. Trials their love had, but they came from
without. Dr. Atwood had heard the squire had said,
the parson might try his best to get his heir for his
daughter Fanny; he'd never catch
his heir
, though he
caught Randolph! The good doctor was a proud
father
,
and a poor man, and, though it cost him many a
heartache, he shut his doors against Randolph.
Meanwhile, the squire's self complacency in
Randolph
increased. The squire had the art of making
everybody's merit or demerit minister to this great
end of his being. He was proud of his talents, his
scholarship and his personal elegance, though his
facsimile
resemblance to his father was so striking, that
the squire was never heard to speak of his appearance,
except to say, what a crop of hair he hasjust like
all the Hayfords!
There was one peculiarity about Randolph, that
puzzled
his grandfather. The fellow is so inconsistent,
said he to himself one day, after he had been reviewing
his account books; when he has money of his own
earning, he pours it out like water; gave the widow
fifty dollars last week, but he seems as afraid of spending
my cash as if I exacted Jews' usury; quite contrary
to the old rule, `light come, light go.' I have footed
it right; eight years since Mary diedday after we
lost Martin's election by the parson's vote; can't be
mistaken; he's got through college, fitted for the law,
and I have paid out cash for him but ninety-nine
pounds, five shillings, and three pence, lawful! By
George! the widow's brood has cost me more in that
time. Ah! it's number one after all; is sure of it at
last, and that southern blood can't bear an obligation.
Trust me for seeing into a millstone. I can tell him
he'll have to wait; I feel as young as I did thirty years
ago; sound grindersgood pulsesteady gait. Ten
years to run up to three score, and ten may last to
eighty. Grandmother Brown lived to ninety and
upwards; why should not I? when I quit, am willing
Randolph, (wish his name was Silas,) should have it.
If it was not for that southern blood he'd be about the
likeliest of the Hayfords. All his obstinacy comes
from that `I'll not disobey you, sir, and even if I
would, Miss Atwood would not marry me without your
consent; but be assured, sir, I shall never marry any
other!' `We'll see, my lord; while I can say nay,
you shall never marry that old aristocrat's daughter.
Just one-and-twenty now; guess you'll sing another
tune before you are twenty-five. Time to go up to
the printing office; wonder if we shall have another
Hampden this weekconfounded smart fellow
that.
Then looking at his watch and finding the happy
hour for country ennuyes, the hour for the mail and
daily lounge, had arrived, the squire sallied forth to
take his morning walk to the printing office, the village
reading room.
There was a weekly journal published in Carrington,
the Star, or Sun, I forget which, but certainly
the ascendant luminary of the democrat party. There
had appeared, recently, in this journal, a series of
articles
written temperately, and with vigour and elegance,
on the safety of a popular government.
The writer advocated an unlimited trust in the
sanitive virtue of the people; he appeared familiar
with the history of the republics that had preceded
ours, and contended that there was no reason to infer
our danger from their brief existence. He maintained,
(and it will now perhaps be admitted with truth,) that
distrust of the people was the great error of the
federalists
;
that the
prestiges
of the old government still
hung about them, and that they were committing a
fatal mistake in applying old principles to a new
condition of things.
These articles were read, lauded and republished.
The name of the author was sought, but in vain.
Even the printer and editor, (I believe one individual
personated both these august characters,) were ignorant,
and could only guess that it was judge , or lawyer
, the lights of the state. But conjecture is not
certainty, and the author still remained the great
unknown
,
not only of Carrington, but of the county
and state.
The squire returned from his morning lounge with
a fresh journal, containing a new article from
Hampden
,
the signature of the unknown author. A fresh
newspaper! Its vapour was as sweet a regale to the
little vulgar pug-nose of our village politician as the
dews of Helicon to the votaries of the muses. It so
happened that Randolph was sitting in the parlour,
reading, when the squire came in. Have you seen
the paper, this morning, Randolph? he asked.
No; I have not.
I guess not, I have got the first that was struck off.
Another article from Hampden, I understand. He is
answered in the Boston Sentinel. They own he writes
`
plausibly, ably
and
eloquently;
' the d speaks
truth for once. I guess the Boston chaps find their
match at last. The squire had a habit not peculiar
to him, but rather annoying, of reading aloud a
passage
that either pleased or displeased him, without any
regard to the occupations of those around him. His
comments, too, were always expressed aloud. He
drew out his spectacles and sat down to the paper.
His sister, Mrs. Hunt, was sewing in one corner of
the room, and Randolph sitting opposite to him, but
apparently absorbed in his book. Too deuced cool,
grumbled the squire, after reading the first passage.
Ah, he warms in the harness; not up to the mark,
though; I wish he'd give 'em one of my pealers.
Good, good; wonder what the Centinel will say to
that. By George, capital! I could not have writ it
better. I would have put in more spice, though.
Ha! true as a prophet. Listen, Randolph. The
squire then read aloud. We are aware that
prediction
is not argument, but we venture to prophesy that
in twenty years from this time the federal party will
have disappeared. The grandsire will have to explain
the turn
Term
, sir, interposed Randolph.
Yes, yes, term. The grandsire will have to explain
the term to the child at his knee. We shall be a
nation
of republicans, and whenever
Wherever
, sir.
So it is; wherever an American is found, at home
or aboard
Abroad
, sir. This time there was a slight infusion
of petulance in Randolph's tone, and still more in the
squire's at the repeated interruptions as he proceeded.
At home or abroad, in office or out of it, in high
station or low, he will claim to be a Republican,
and cherish the title as the noblest and happiest a
civilian
Citizen
, sirnoblest and happiest a citizen can
claim.
Confound you, Randolph! exclaimed the squire,
dropping the paper and fixing his eyes on his
grandson
;
how do you know the words before I speak
them? This was rather an exclamation of vexation
than suspicion. Randolph was conscious that in
involuntarily
interposing to save his offspring from
murder he had risked a secret, and he answered the
squire's exclamation with a look of confusion that at
once flashed the truth upon his obtuse comprehension.
He jumped up, clapped Randolph on the shoulder,
exclaiming, you wrote it yourself, you dog, you can't
deny it. It's a credit to you, a credit to the name.
But you might have known I should have found you
out. Just like all the Hayfords, keep every thing snug
till out it comes with a crack.
I thought all along, meekly, said Mrs. Hunt,
who had been plying her needle unobserved and
unobserving
,
I thought all along cousin Randolph wrote
them pieces.
Now shut up, widow, retorted the squire, you
did not think no such thing; just like all fore-thoughts,
come afterwards. Now, ma'am please to step out;
D
I must have a little private conversation with Mr.
Hampden
.
Be kind enough before you go, aunt, said
Randolph
,
to promise me that you will say nothing of
what has just passed. I have made no admissions, and
I do not wish to be thought the writer of the
Hampden
articles.
Mrs. Hunt, of course, promised fidelity. As soon
as she was out of hearing, What does that mean?
asked the squire. It is all stuff to make a secret of
it any longer.'
I think not, sir. The articles have far more
reputation
and influence, (if I may believe they have
influence,) than if they were known to proceed from
a young man whose name has no authority.
Hoity-toity! who's got a better name than yours?
a'nt willing the Hayfords should have the credit, hey?
Randolph did not vouchsafe any reply to the squire's
absurd mistake, and after a few moments his gratified
vanity regained its ascendancy.
The pieces please me, said he, though if you
had told me you were writing them I could have given
you some hints that would have improved them. They
want a little more said about men, less of
principles
.
They want fire, too; egad, I'd send 'em red
hot bullets; but they'll do; you've come out like a
man, on the right side, and now I believe what I felt
scary about before. Here the squire paused, and
fixed one of his most penetrating glances upon
Randolph
.
I believe you will vote to-morrow, and vote
right. Randolph made no reply.
A few words will here be necessary to explain the
dilemma in which Randolph was about to be placed.
The annual election of a representative to the state
legislature was to occur the next day. The rival
parties in Carrington were known to their champions
to be exactly balanced. There was not a doubtful vote
except Randolph Hayford's. He had never yet voted,
not having till now arrived at the requisite age. He
had not thrown himself into the scale of either party.
His opinions were independent, and independently
expressed. The squire's hopes of his vote were very
much encouraged by the Hampden articles, but still
there were circumstances in this case that made him
somewhat apprehensive.
Your vote, resumed the squire, will decide the
election to-morrow. Again he paused, but without
receiving a reply. I can't have
much
doubt which
way
Hampden
will vote, but I like to make all sure
and fast. Randolph, I know what scion you want to
see engrafted on that tree. The squire pointed to
the only picture in his house, a family tree, that in a
huge black frame stretched its frightful branches over
the parlour fireplace. On these branches hung a
regiment
of militia captains, majors, colonels, sundry
justices of the peace; precious fruit all, supported by
an illustrious trunk, a certain
Sir
Silas Hayford, who
flourished in the reign of Charles the First. Strange
and inconsistent as it may appear with his ultra
democracy, never was there a man prouder of his
ancestral dignities, or more anxious to have them
transmitted, than our village squire.
Randolph, he continued, assured of success by
the falling of Randolph's eye, and a certain half
pleased, half anxious expression that overspread his
face. Randolph, I have always said that I never
would give my consent to your marriage with that old
aristocratic parson's daughter. But circumstances
alter cases. I am a man that hears to reason when I
approve of it. I have no fault to find with the girl;
never heard her speak; believe she's well enough.
Randolph bit his lips. How hard it is to hear an
idolized
object spoken of as if she were of the mass of
humankind
.
To come to the point, Randolph,if you'll
go forward to-morrow like a man, and give in your
vote for Martin and make Ross's scale kick the beam,
I'll withdraw my opposition to this match. Hear me
out. I'll do more for you. I'm pleased with you,
Randolph. I've just received the money for my
Genesee lands. I'll give you two hundred pounds to
buy your law library, and you may go next week to
any town in the state you like, and open your office,
and be your own man, and take your girl there as soon
as you like.
Good Heaven! exclaimed Randolph, you can
offer nothing more; the world has nothing more to
tempt me. And he left the room in a state of
agitation
in which the squire had never before seen him.
The squire called after him,Take time to consider,
Randolph. To-morrow morning is time enough for
your answer.
In the course of the evening, Randolph met Fanny
Atwood. Whether the meeting was accidental, I
cannot
pretend to say. It would seem to have been
disobedience in my friend to have kept up her
intercourse
with Randolph after the doctor had shut his
doors upon him. But Fanny well knew there was
nothing beside herself, the doctor loved so well as
Randolph; nothing that in his secret heart he so much
desired as to see them united, and that his resolute and
rather harsh procedure in excluding Randolph from
his house had been a sacrifice of his own inclinations
to his honest pride. This being the state of the
matter, it cannot appear strange that Fanny should be
willing to meet him when with rosy blush,
Summer eve is sinking;
When on rills that softly gush,
Stars are softly winking;
When through boughs that knit the bower,
Moonlight gleams are stealing.
Or at any of those times and places which nature's
and
our
poet have appointed to tell Love's delightful
story.
The lovers took a sequestered and favourite walk to
a little waterfall at some distance from the village.
Here, surrounded by moonlight, the evening fragrance
and soft varying and playful shadows, they seated
themselves on the fallen trunk of a tree, one of their
accustomed haunts.
When they first met, Fanny had said, So,
Randolph
,
your secret is out at last!
Out! is it?
Pshaw, you know it is. Your grandfather hinted
it at the post office, and the town is ringing with it.
I am sorry for it. I was aware that my
grandfather
knew it, but I have seen nobody else to-day.
Has your father heard it, Fanny?
Yes; finding it was out, I told him myself. Dear
father! he both laughed and cried.
Cried!
Yes; you know that is no uncommon thing for
him to do. He was grieved that you had come out
on the democratic side, for you know he thinks a
democrat next to an infidel; but then he was pleased
to find you could write such celebrated articles. He
has said all along that they had more sense and reason
in them than could be distilled from everything else
written by the democrats. Now he is amazed, he
says, that a boy, (you know he calls every one a boy
that is not forty,) should write so wisely, and above
all, so temperately.
Ah, my dear Fanny, adversity, though a `stern
and rugged nurse' she be, enforces a discipline that
makes us early wise. Heaven grant that her furnace
may not be heated so hot as to consume instead of
purifying.
What do you mean, Randolph? you are very sad
this evening. Are you not well? you are not troubled
about this secret. I thought you looked very pale;
what has happened to you?
Randolph kissed the hand that Fanny in her
earnestness
had lain on his. My dearest Fanny, he replied,
D 2
since you have exchanged those vows with me that
pledge us to `halve our sorrows as well as double our
joys,' you have condemned yourself to trials too severe
for your sweet and gentle spirit.
Randolph, if my spirit is sweet and gentle, it can
the better bear them; and besides, nothing can be a
very,
very
heavy trial that I share with you. But tell
me quick what it is? I am sure I shall think of some
way of getting rid of it.
Randolph shook his head, and then related his
morning's conversation withhis grand father. Now,
he said, you see the cruel predicament in which I am
placed. You, my beloved Fanny, the object of my
fondest hopes, all that makes life attractive and dear
to me, are placed within my grasp; an honourable
career is opened to me, escape from the galling
thraldom
of my grandfather's house, from the perpetual
annoyance of his vulgarity, his garrulity, jealousy, and
petty tyrannies; and this, without the slightest
deviation
in the spirit or even the letter from my promise
to my dying mother. Randolph paused. Fanny
watched every motion of his countenance with
breathless
expectation; she could not speak; she did not
know what remained to be said, but she guessed and
feared. He proceeded. But the price, Fanny, the
price I am to pay for these ineffable blessings! I must
give my vote to an unprincipled demagogue, and
withhold
it from an honest man. I must sacrifice the
principles that I have laid down to govern my conduct.
They may be stigmatized as juvenile, romantic, and
fantastical; as long as I believe them essential to
integrity
,
I cannot depart from them without a
consciousness
of degradation. My moral sense is not
yet dimmed by the fumes of party, and it seems to
me as plain a proposition as any other, that we ought
only to support such men and such measures as are for
the good of the country, and the whole country. It
seems to me, that no man enlists under the banner of
a party without some sacrifice of integrity. My
grandfather
says to me, in his vulgar slang, `between two
stools you will fall to the ground.' Be it so. It will
be ground on which I can firmly plant my foot, and
look up to heaven with a consciousness that I have not
offended against that goodness that made me a citizen
of a country destined to be the greatest and happiest
the world ever saw, provided we are true to our political
duties. Dearest Fanny, do not think I am haranguing
and not feeling. God knows I have had a sore conflict;
my heart has been wrung. You cover your face.
Have I decided wrong?
Oh, no, no; she replied in a voice broken by her
emotion. For all the world, I would not that you
should have decided otherwise. And yet, is it not
very,
very
hard? I mean for you, Randolph. For
myself, I have a pleasant home, and I am happy enough
while I can see you every day, and be sure each day that
we love one another better than we did the last.
Besides
;
she added, looking up with her sunny smile,
on some accounts, it is best as it is; it would almost
break father's heart to part from me; and, as he says,
dear Randolph, when the right time comes, `
Providence
will open a way for us.'
Then, Fanny, you approve my decision?
Approve it, Randolph! I do not seem proud,
perhaps; but it would humble me to the very dust to
have you think even of acting contrary to what you
believe to be right. Oh, if we could only live in a
world where it was all love and friendship and no
politics!
Randolph smiled at the simplicity of Fanny's wish,
and expressed, with all a lover's fervour, his admiration
of the instinctive rectitude of her mind. He confessed
that he had resolved and re-resolved his grandfather's
proposition, in the hope that he might hit upon some
mode of preserving his integrity and securing the bright
reward offered him, but in vain.
Our lovers must be forgiven if they protracted their
walk long after the orthodox hour for barring a
minister's
doors. My friend, still the spoiled child, found
her old sister Sally sitting up for her; and as they crept
up to their rooms, They say old maids are cross, said
Fanny, but they don't know you who say so. You
remember, sister, when you used to love to walk by
moonlight, with a certain Mr. ?
Whish, nonsense, Fanny, said our nun demure,
but she finished the ascent of the stairs with a lighter
step, and as Fanny kissed her for good night, she saw
that a slight blush had overspread her wan cheek at
the pleasurable recollections called up. So true is
woman
to the instincts of her nature.
On the next morning, Randolph was absent, and
Mrs. Hunt said, in answer to his grandfather's
inquiries
,
that he had ridden to the next village on business,
and had left word that he should return in time for
the election. The squire was excessively elated. He
was on the point of obtaining a party triumph by the
casting vote of his grandson; he should exhibit him
for the first time in the democratic ranks, enlisted for
the war, with the new blown honours of Hampden
thick upon him. There are elevated points in every
man's life, and this morning was the Chimborazo of
the squire's.
At the appointed hour the rival parties assembled at
the meeting house; that being in most of our villages
the only building large enough to contain the voters of
the town, is, notwithstanding the temporary
desecration
,
used as a political arena. There the rival parties
met, as (with sorrow we confess it,) rival parties often
meet in our republic, like the hostile forces of
belligerent
nations, as if they had no interest nor
sentiment
in common.
The balloting began. Randolph had not arrived.
The squire, though not yet distrustful, began to fidget.
He had taken his station beside the ballot box; a
station
which, in spite of its violation of the courtesies if
not the principle of voting by ballot, is often occupied by
eager village politicians, for the purpose of peering into
the box, and detecting any little artifice by which an
individual may have endeavoured to conceal his vote.
Here stood the squire, turning his eyes from the door
where they eagerly glanced in quest of Randolph, to the
box, and giving a smile or scowl to every vote that was
dropped in. What keeps the parson back? thought
he, knitting his grisled brows, as he looked at Doctor
Atwood, he is always the first to push forward.
This was true. The doctor's principles kindly
coincided
with his inclination in bringing him to the poll,
but once having put in his mite, as he said, into the
good treasury, he paid so much deference to his office,
as immediately to withdraw from the battle-field.
The doctor had controlling reasons for lingering on
this occasion. Fanny had acquainted him with
Randolph's
determination. The old man was touched
with his young favourite's virtue, and the more (we
must forgive something to human infirmity,) that
Randolph's casting vote would decide the election in
favour of the federal party. The balloting was drawing
to a close, and still Randolph did not appear. The
doctor now fully participated the squire's uneasiness.
He took off his spectacles, wiped them over and over
again, and strained his eyes up the road by which
Randolph was to return. It is not like him to flinch,
thought the sturdy old man, he is always up to the
mark. Still, as the delay was prolonged his anxiety
increased. Better have come boldly out on their side
than sneak off in this fashion. I might have known
that no one tainted with jacobinism could act an
upright
manly part. He writes well, to be sure; fine
sentiments, but nothing so namby pamby as sentiment
that is not backed up by conduct. Well, well; we
are all in the hands of the Lord, and he may see fit yet
to turn his heart; poor little Fanny; I'll throw in my
vote and go home to her. The doctor gave one last
look through the window, and now, to his infinite joy,
he descried Randolph approaching. In a few moments
more he entered the church. His vote had been a
matter much debated and of vital interest to both
parties
.
As he entered, every eye turned towards him,
and a general murmur ran round the church. He'll
vote for
us!
and he'll vote for
us!
passed from
mouth to mouth, and as usual the confident assertions
were vouched by wagers. Whatever wrestlings with
himself Randolph might have had in secret he was too
manly to manifest his feelings to the public eye, and
he walked up the aisle with his customary manner,
revealing nothing by look or motion to the eager eyes
of his observers; though there was enough to daunt
or at least to fluster a man of common mettle, in the
well known sound of the doctor's footsteps, shuffling
after him, and in the aspect of the squire standing bolt
upright before him; confidence and exultation seeming
to elevate him a foot-above his ordinary stature.
Ha, thought he, every man has his price; bait
your hook with a pretty girl, and you'll be sure to catch
these boys. At this critical moment, Randolph
dropped
in his vote. It was open, fairly exposed to the
squire's eye, and it bore in legible, indubitable
characters
,
the name of the Federal candidate. The doctor
involuntarily grasped his hand, and whispered, You
have done your duty, my son, God bless you!
Words cannot describe either the squire's amazement
or his wrath. Randolph had presumed too far when he
hoped that the decency due to a public meeting would
compel his relative to curb his passion, till reflection
should abate it. It burst forth in incoherent
imprecations
,
reproaches, and denunciations; and Randolph,
finding that his presence only served to swell the storm,
retreated.
The votes were now counted, and notwithstanding
Randolph's vote, and, contrary to all expectation, there
proved to be a
tie
. Some federalist had been recreant.
The balloting was repeated. Doctor Atwood had gone,
and the democratic candidate was elected by a majority
of one.
This unexpected good fortune turned the tide of the
squire's feelings. His individual chagrin was merged
in the triumph of his party. They adjourned to the
tavern to celebrate their victory in the usual mode of
celebrating events, by eating and drinking.
Excitement
had its usual effects on our unethereal squire, and
he indulged his stimulated appetite somewhat beyond
the bounds of prudence.
Even the tiger is said to be comparatively good
natured
on a full stomach. The squire's wrath was
appeased
by the same natural means; and when
Hampden
was toasted, he poured down a bumper, saying to his
next neighbour as he did so, I might have known that
fellow with his nonsensical notions would have voted
for the man he thought best of. The conviviality of
our politicians continued to a late hour. Libations
were poured out to all the bright champions of their
party. The moderns unfortunately swallow their
libations
.
Finally, the squire proposed a parting glass to
the confusion and overthrow of all monarchists,
aristocrats
,
federalists, or despots, by whatever name
called, and in the very act of raising it to his lips, he
was seized with an apoplexy, which, in spite of his
sound grinders, full pulse, steady gait, and
grandmother
Brown having lived to ninety, carried him off in
the space of a few hours, leaving his whole estate, real
and personal, to his legal and sole heir, Randolph
Hayford
.
And how did Randolph bear this sudden reverse of
fortune in his favour? This verification, as it truly
seemed, of the doctor's prophecy, that Providence
would open up a way for them.
In the first place, he laid the axe to the root of the
Hayford tree, renouncing at once and for ever the name,
(of which he had so religiously performed the duties,)
and resuming with pride and joy his honoured
patronymic
.
He then, by a formal deed of quit calm,
relinquished
all right and title to the estate, real and personal,
and goods and chattels of Silas Hayford, Esquire, in
favour of Martha Hunt, said Silas's sister.
Thus emancipated, and absolved from all further
duties and obligations to the name of Hayford, with a
character improved and almost perfected by the exact
performance of self-denying and painful duties, he
began his professional career, depending solely on his
own talents and efforts; thank heaven, a sure
dependence
in our favoured country.
My sweet friend, Fanny, who seemed to be the pet
of destiny, as well as of father, sisters, and friends, was
thus indulged in bearing the name of Gordon, to which
she so fondly adhered. She was soon transferred to
Randolph's new place of residence, and without
breaking
her old father's heart by a separation. He having
rashly preached an ultra federal sermon on a fast day,
that widened the breach between himself and the
majority
of his parish, so far, that it was impossible to close
it without emulating the deed of Curtius. To this the
good doctor had no mind, and just then most
fortunately
,
(we beg his pardon, his own word is best,)
providentially receiving a call to a vacant pulpit in
the place of Randolph's residence, he once more
transferred
his home; spent his last days near his favourite
child, and at last, in the language of scripture, fell
asleep on her bosom.
E
THE CATHOLIC IROQUOIS.
A few
years since a gentleman, on his way from
Niagara to Montreal, arrived at Coteau du Lac. While
the pilot, in conformity to the law, was obtaining a
clearance for the lower province, the clouds, which
had been all day threatening a storm, poured out their
stores of thunder, lightning, and rain with such
violence
,
that it was deemed most prudent to defer the
conclusion of the voyage till the following day. The
Boatmen's Inn was the only place of refuge, and the
stranger was at first glad of a shelter within it. But
he was an amateur traveller, and gentlemen of that
fastidious class do not patiently submit to
inconveniences
.
The inn was thronged with a motley crew
of Scotch and Irish emigrantsCanadiansand
boatmen
,
besides loiterers from the vicinity, who were just
reviving from the revels of the preceding night. The
windows were obscured with smoke, and the walls
tapestered with cobwebs. The millenium of spiders
and flies seemed to have arrived, for myriads of this
defenceless tribe buzzed fearlessly around the banners
of their natural enemy, as if, inspired by the kindliness
of my uncle Toby, he had said, poor fly this world
is wide enough for thee and me.
The old garments and hats that had been
substituted
for broken panes of glass, were blown in, and the
rain pattered on the floor. Some of the doors hung
by one hingeothers had no latches; some of the
chairs were without bottoms; and some without legs;
the bed-rooms were unswept; the beds unmade;
and in short the whole establishment, as a celebrated
field-preacher said of a very incommodious part of the
other world, was altogether inconvenient.
The traveller, in hopes of winning the hostess' good
will, and thereby securing a clean pair of sheets,
inquired
his way to the kitchen, where he found her
surrounded
by some half dozen juvenile warriors in a
state of open hostility, far more terrible than the war
of the elements. Having succeeded by means of a
liberal distribution of sugar-plumbs, in procuring a
temporary suspension of arms, he introduced himself
to his hostess by some civil inquiries, in answer to
which he ascertained that she was a New England
woman, though unfortunately she possessed none of
those faculties for getting along, which are supposed to
be the birthright of every Yankee. She did express
a regret that her children were deprived of school
and meeting privileges, and entertained something
of a puritanical aversion to her Catholic neighbours;
but save these relics of local taste or prejudice, she
retained none of the peculiarities of her native land.
The gentleman was not long in discovering that the
unusual ingress of travellers reduced them all to the
level of primitive equality, and that so far from the
luxury of clean sheets, he must not hope for the
exclusive
possession of any.
On further inquiry he learnt, that there was a French
village at a short distance from the inn, and after
waiting
till the fury of the storm had abated, he sallied
forth in quest of accommodation and adventure. He
had not walked far, when his exploring eye fell on a
creaking sign-board, on which was inscribed Auberge
et
laugement
. But lodgment it would not afford to
our unfortunate traveller. Every apartmentevery
nook and corner was occupied by an English party,
on their way to the Falls.
Politeness is an instinct in French nature, or if not
an instinct, it is so interwoven in the texture of their
character, that it remains, a fast colour, when all other
original distinctions have faded. The Canadian
peasant
,
though he retains nothing of the activity and
ingenuity
of his forefathers, salutes the stranger with an
air of courtesy rarely seen in any other uneducated
American. The landlord of the Auberge was an
honourable
exemplification of this remark. He politely
told the stranger that he would conduct him to a farm
house, where he might obtain a clean room and a nice
bed. The offer was gratefully accepted, and our
traveller
soon found himself comfortably established in a
neat white-washed cottage, in the midst of a peasant's
family, who were engaged in common rural
occupations
.
The wants of his body being thus provided
for, he resorted to the usual expedients to enliven the
hours that must intervene before bed-time. He
inquired
of the master of the house how he provided
for his family, and after learning that he lived, as his
father and grandfather had before him, by carrying
the few products of his farm to Montreal, he turned
to the matron, and asked her why her children were
not taught English. Ah! she replied, the
English
have done us too much wrong. She then
launched into a relation of her sufferings during the
last war. She had, like honest Dogberry, had her
losses, and found the usual consolation in recounting
them. The militia officers had spoiled her of her
flocks and herds, and
des veauxdes moutonsdes
dindonset des poulets
, bled afresh in her sad tale.
If her children were not taught English, one of them,
the mother said, had been sent to a boarding-school at
the distance of twenty miles, and she could now read
like any priest. Little Marie was summoned, and she
read with tolerable fluency from her school-book a
collection
of extracts from the fathers, while her simple
parents sat bending over her with their mouths wide
open, and their eyes sparkling and occasionally
turning
on the stranger with an expression of wonder and
delight, as if they would have said, did you ever see
any thing equal to that?
The good-natured stranger listened and lavished his
praises, and then, in the hope of escaping from any
further display of the child's erudition, he offered to
assist her elder sister, who was winding a skein of
yarnthis proved a more amusing resource. The
girl was pretty, and lively, and showed by the upward
inclination of the corners of her arch mouth, and the
flashes of her laughing eye, that she could understand
the compliments, and return the raillery of her
assistant
.
The pretty Louise had been living at the
Seigniorie
with madame, a rich widow
si richesi
bonne
, she said, but
trop agee pour Monsieur, parce
qu'elle a peut tre trente ans; et d'ailleurs, elle n'est
pas assez belle pour Monsieur
. Monsieur was a
bachelor of forty years' standing, and his vanity was
touched by Louise's adroit compliment. The skein
slipped off his hands, Louise bent her head to arrange
it, her fair round cheek was very near Monsieur's lips,
perhaps her mother thought too near, for she called to
Louise to lay aside her yarn and prepare the tea, and
after tea the pretty girl disappeared. Our traveller
yawned for an hour or two over the only book the
house afforded, Marie's readings from St. Augustine
and St. Chrysostom, and then begged to be shown to
his bed. On entering his room, his attention was
attracted
to an antique, worm-eaten, travelling port-folio.
It was made of morocco, and bound and clasped with
silver, and, compared with the rude furniture of the
humble apartment, it had quite an exotic air. He took
it up, and looked at the initials on the clasp. That is
a curious affair, said his landlord, and older than
either you or I.
Some relic, I suppose, said the stranger, which
you have inherited.
Something in that way, replied the landlord
E 2
there is a big letter in it which has been like so much
blank paper to us, for we have never had a scholar in
the family that could read it. I have thought to take
it some day to Pere Martigne at the Cedars, but I shall
let it rest till next year when Mariebless her! will
be able to read writing. The stranger said that if
his landlord had no objection, he would try to read
it. The old man's eyes glistenedhe unclasped the
port-folio, took out the manuscript, and put it into the
stranger's hands. You are heartily welcome, he
said, it would at best be an uncouth task for Marie,
for, as you see, the leaves are mouldy, and the ink has
faded.
The stranger's zeal abated when he perceived the
difficulty of the enterprise. It is some old family
record, I imagine, he said, unfolding it with an air of
indifference.
Heaven knows, replied the landlord, I only
know that it is no record of my family. We have
been but simple peasants from the beginning, and not
a single line has been written about us, except what is
on my grandfather's grave-stone at the CedarsGod
bless him! I remember as well as if it were
yesterday
,
his sitting in that old oaken chair by the
casement
,
and telling us all about his travels to the great
western lakes, with one Bouchard, a young
Frenchman
,
who was sent out to our trading establishments
people did not go about the world then, as they do
now-a-days, just to look at rapids and waterfalls.
Then this, said the stranger, in the hope of at last
obtaining a clew to the manuscript, this I presume is
some account of the journey?
Oh no, replied the old man. Bouchard found
this on the shore of Lake Huron, in a strange wild
placesit down, and I will tell you all I have heard
my grandfather say about it; bless the good old man,
he loved to talk of his journey. And so did his
grandson, and the stranger listened patiently to the
following
particulars, which are only varied in language
from the landlord's narration.
It appeared that about the year 1700, young
Bouchard
and his attendants, on their return from Lake
Superior, arrived on the shore of Lake Huron, near
Saganaw Bay. From an eminence, they descried an
Indian village, or to use their descriptive designation,
a smoke. Bouchard despatched his attendants with
Seguin, his Indian guide, to the village, to obtain
canoes
to transport them over the lake, and in the mean
time he sought for some place that might afford him
shelter and repose. The shore was rocky and
precipitous
.
Practice and experience had rendered
Bouchard
as agile and courageous as a Swiss mountaineer,
and he descended the precipice leaping from crag to
crag as unconscious of an emotion of fear, as the wild
bird that flapped her wings over him, and whose
screeches alone broke the stillness of the solitude.
Having attained the margin of the lake, he loitered
along the water's edge, till turning an angle of a rock,
he came to a spot which seemed to have been
contrived
by nature for a place of refuge. It was a little
interval of ground in the form of an amphitheatre,
nearly infolded by the rocks, which as they projected
boldly into the lake at the extremities of the
semicircle
,
looked as if their giant forms had been set there
to defend this temple of nature. The ground was
probably
inundated after easterly winds, for it was soft
and marshy, and among the rank weeds that covered
it there were some aquatic flowers. The lake had
once washed the base of the rocks here as elsewhere;
they were worn perfectly smooth in some places,
and in others broken and shelving. Bouchard was
attracted by some gooseberries that had forced
themselves
through crevices in the rocks, and which seemed
to form, with their purple berries and bright green
leaves, a garland around the bald brow of the
precipice
.
They are among the few indigenous fruits of
the wilderness, and doubtless looked as tempting to
Bouchard, as the most delicious fruits of the
Hesperides
would, in his own sunny valleys of France. In
reconnoitring for the best mode of access to the
fruit, he discovered a small cavity in the rock, that
so much resembled a birth in a ship, as to appear to
have been the joint work of nature and art. It had
probably supplied the savage hunter or fisherman with
a place of repose, for it was strewn with decayed
leaves, so matted together as to form a luxurious couch
for one accustomed for many months to sleeping on a
blanket, spread on the bare ground. After possessing
himself of the berries, Bouchard crept into the recess,
and, (for there is companionship in water,) he forgot,
for a while, the tangled forests, and the wide unbroken
wilderness that interposed between him and his
country
.
He listened to the soft musical sounds of the
light waves, as they broke on the shelving rock and
reedy bank; and he gazed on the bright element
which reflected the blue vault of Heaven, and the
fleecy summer cloud, till his senses became oblivious
of this, their innocent and pure indulgence, and he
sunk into a deep sleep, from which he was awakened
by the dashing of oars.
Bouchard looked out upon the lake, and saw,
approaching the shore, a canoe in which were three
Indiansa young man who rowed the canoe, an old
man, and a maiden. They landed not far from him,
and without observing him, turned towards the
opposite
extremity of the semicirclethe old man
proceeded
with a slow measured step, and removing a
sort of door, formed of flexible brush-wood and
matting
,
(which Bouchard had not before noticed,) they
entered an excavation in the rocksdeposited
something
which they had brought in their hands
prostrated
themselves for a few moments, and then slowly
returned to the canoe; and as long as Bouchard could
discern the bark, glancing like a water-fowl over the
deep blue waters, he heard the sweet voice of the girl,
accompanied at regular intervals by her companions
hymning, as he fancied, some explanation of their mute
worship, for their expressive gestures pointed first to
the shore, and then to the skies.
As soon as the canoe disappeared, Bouchard crept
out of his birth and hastened to the cell. It proved
to be a natural excavation, was high enough to admit
a man of ordinary stature, and extended for several
feet, when it contracted to a mere channel in the rocks.
On one side, a little rivulet penetrated the arched roof,
and fell in large crystal drops into a natural basin
which it had worn in the rock. In the centre of the
cell there was a pyramidal heap of stoneson the top
of the pile lay a breviary and santanne; and on the
sides of it were arranged the votive offerings Bouchard
had seen deposited there. He was proceeding to
examine
them, when he heard the shrill signal whistle
of his guidehe sounded his horn in reply, and in a
few moments Sequin descended the precipice and was
at his side. Bouchard told him what he had seen, and
Sequin after a moment's reflection, said, this must
be the place of which I have so often heard our
ancients
speaka good man died here. He was sent
by the Great Spirit to teach our nation good things,
and the Hurons yet keep many of his sayings in their
hearts. They say he fasted all his life time, and he
should feast now, so they bring him provisions from
their festivals. Let us seewhat offerings are these?
Sequin first took up a wreath of wild flowers, and
evergreens interwoventhis, he said, was a
nuptial
offering, and he inferred that the young people
were newly married. Next was a calumetthis,
said Sequin, is an emblem of peacean old man's
giftand these, he added, unrolling a skin that
enveloped some ripe ears of Indian corn, are the
emblems of abundance, and the different occupations
of the man and woman. The husband hunts the deer
the wife cultivates the maize, and those, he
concluded
,
pointing to some fresh scalps, and smiling at
Bouchard's shuddering, those are the emblems of
victory. Bouchard took up the breviary, and as he
opened it, a manuscript dropped from between its
leaveshe eagerly seized, and was proceeding to
examine it, when his guide pointed to the lengthening
shadows on the lake, and informed him that the canoes
were to be ready at the rising of the full moon.
Bouchard
was a good Catholic, and like all
good
Catholics,
a good Christian. He reverenced all the saints in the
calendar, and he loved the memory of a good man,
albeit never canonized. He crossed himself and
repeated
a paternoster, and then followed his guide to
the place of rendezvous. The manuscript he kept as
a holy relic, and that which fell into the hands of our
traveller, at the cottage of the Canadian peasant, was
a copy he had made to transmit to France. The
original
was written by Pere Mesnard, (whose blessed
memory had consecrated the cell on Lake Huron,) and
contained the following particulars.
This holy man was educated at the seminary of St.
Sulpice. The difficult and dangerous enterprise of
propagating his religion among the savages of the
western world appears early to have taken possession
of his imagination, and to have inspired him with the
ardour of an apostle, and the resolution of a martyr.
He came to America under the auspices of Madame de
Bouillon, who had, a few years before, founded the
Hotel Dieu at Montreal. With her sanction and aid
he established himself at a little village of the Utawas,
on the borders of lake St. Louis, at the junction of the
Utawa river and the St. Lawrence. His pious efforts
won some of the savages to his religion, and to the
habits of civilized life, and others he persuaded to bring
their children to be trained in a yoke which they could
not themselves bear.
On one oceasion an Utawa chief appeared before
Pere Mesnard with two girls whom he had captured
from the Iroquoisa fierce and powerful nation, most
jealous of the encroachment of the French, and
resolute
to exclude from their territory the emissaries of
the Catholic religion. The Utawa chief presented
the children to the father, saying they are the
daughters
of my enemyof Talasco, the mightiest chief of the
Iroquoisthe eagle of his tribehe hates Christians
he calls them dogsmake his children Christians,
and I shall be revenged. This was the only revenge
to which the good father would have been accessory.
He adopted the girls in the name of the church and St.
Joseph, to whom he dedicated them, intending that
when they arrived at a suitable age to make voluntary
vows they should enroll themselves with the
religieuses
of the Hotel Dieu. They were baptized by
the Christian names of Rosalie and Franoise. They
lived in Pere Mesnard's cabin, and were strictly trained
to the prayers and penances of the church; Rosalie
was a natural devoteethe father has recorded
surprising
instances of her voluntary mortifications.
When only twelve years old, she walked on the ice
around an island, three miles in circumference, on her
bare feetshe strewed her bed with thorns, and seared
her forehead with a red hot iron, that she might, as
she said, bear the mark of the slave of Jesus. The
father magnifies the piety of Rosalie with the
exultation
of a true son of the church, yet, as a man, he
appears to have felt far more tenderness for Franoise,
whom he never names without some epithet,
expressive
of affection or pity. If Rosalie was like the
sunflower
,
that lives but to pay homage to a single object,
Franoise resembled a luxuriant plant, that shoots out
its flowers on every side, and imparts the sweetness of
its perfume to every passer-by. Pere Mesnard says
she could not pray all the timeshe loved to rove in
the woodsto sit gazing on the rapids, singing the
wild native songs for which the Iroquois are so much
celebratedshe shunned all intercourse with the
Utawas
,
because they were the enemies of her people.
Pere Mesnard complains that she often evaded her
penances, but, he adds, she never failed in offices of
kindness.
On one occasion, when the father had gone to the
Cedars on a religious errand, Franoise entered the
cabin hastilyRosalie was kneeling before a
crucifix
.
She rose at her sister's entrance, and asked her
with an air of rebuke, where she had been sauntering?
Franoise said she had been to the Sycamores, to get
some plants to dye the quills for Julie's wedding
moccasins
.
You think quite too much of weddings, replied
Rosalie, for one whose thoughts should all be upon
a heavenly marriage.
I am not a nun yet, said Franoise, but oh!
Rosalie, Rosalie, it was not of weddings I was
thinking
as
I came through the wood I heard voices
whisperingour names were pronouncednot our
Christian names, but those they called us by at
Onnontague
.
You surely dared not stop to listen, exclaimed
her sister.
I could not help it, Rosalieit was our mother's
voiceAn approaching footstep at this moment
startled both the girls. They looked out, and beheld
their mother, Genanhatenna, close to them. Rosalie
sunk down before the crucifix, Franoise sprang
towards
her mother in the ecstacy of youthful and
natural joy. Genanhatenna, after looking silently at
her children for a few moments, spoke to them with
all the energy of strong and irrepressible feeling. She
entreated, she commanded them to return with her to
their own people. Rosalie was cold and silent, but
Franoise laid her head on her mother's lap, and wept
bitterly. Her resolution was shaken, till
Genanhatenna
arose to depart, and the moment of decision
could not be deferred, she then pressed the cross that
hung at her neck to her lips and said, mother, I have
made a Christian vow, and must not break it.
Come with me then to the wood, replied her
mother, if we must part, let it be therecome
quicklythe young chief Allewemi awaits mehe
has ventured his life to attend me here. If the
Utawas
see him their cowardly spirits will exult in a
victory
over a single man.
Do not go, whispered Rosalie, you are not safe
beyond the call of our cabins. Franoise's feelings
were in too excited a state to regard the caution, and
she followed her mother. When they reached the
wood Genanhatenna renewed her passionate entreaties.
Ah! Franoise, she said, they will shut you
within stone walls, where you will never again breathe
the fresh airnever hear the songs of birds, nor the
dashing of waters. These Christian Utawas have slain
your brothersyour father was the stateliest tree in
in our forests, but his branches are all lopped, or
withered
,
and if you return not, he perishes without a
single scion from his stock. Alas! alas! I have borne
sons and daughters, and I must die a childless mother.
Franoise's heart was touchedI willI will
return
with you, mother, she said, only promise me
that my father will suffer me to be a Christian.
That I cannot, Franoise, replied Genanhatenna,
your father has sworn by the God Areouski,
[3]
[3]
The God of War
that
no Christian shall live among the Iroquois.
Then, mother, said Franoise, summoning all her
resolution, we must partI am signed with this holy
sign, she crossed herself, and the daughter of Talasco
should no longer waver.
Is it so? cried the mother, and starting back from
Franoise's offered embrace, she clapped her hands
and shrieked in a voice that rung through the wood,
F
the shriek was answered by a wild shout, and in a
moment
after Talasco and the young Allewemi rushed
on them. You are mine, said Talasco, in life and
in death you are mine. Resistance would have been
vain. Franoise was placed between the two Indians,
and hurried forward. As the party issued from the
wood, they were met by a company of Frenchmen,
armed, and commanded by a young officer eager for
adventure
.
He perceived at a glance Franoise's
European
dressknew she must be a captive, and
determined
to rescue her. He levelled his musket at
Talasco, Franoise sprang before her father, and
shielded him with her own person, while she explained
in French that he was her father. Rescue me, she
said, but spare himdo not detain himthe Utawas
are his deadly foesthey will torture him to death,
and I, his unhappy child, shall be the cause of all his
misery.
Talasco said nothing. He had braced himself to the
issue, whatever it might be, with savage fortitude.
He disdained to sue for a life which it would have
been his pride to resign without shuddering, and when
the Frenchmen filed off to the right and left, and
permitted him to pass, he moved forward without one
look or word that indicated he was receiving a favour
at their hands. His wife followed him. Mother
one parting word, said Franoise, in a voice of tender
appeal.
One word, echoed Genanhatenna, pausing for an
instant, Yes, one word
Vengeance
. The day of
your father's vengeance will comeI have heard the
promise in the murmuring stream and in the rushing
windit will come.
Franoise bowed her head as if she had been smitten,
grasped her rosary, and invoked her patron saint. The
young officer, after a moment's respectful silence, asked
whither he should conduct her? To Pere
Mesnard's
she
said.
Pere Mesnard's, reiterated the officer. Pere
Mesnard is my mother's brother, and I was on my
way to him when I was so fortunate as to meet
you.
The officer's name was Eugene Brunon. He
remained
for some days at St. Louis. Rosalie was
engrossed
in severe religious duties, preparatory to her
removal to the convent. She did not see the strangers,
and she complained that Franoise no longer
participated
her devotions. Franoise pleaded that her time
was occupied with arranging the hospitalities of their
scanty household; but when she was released from
this duty by the departure of Eugene, her spiritual
taste did not revive. Eugene returned successful from
the expedition, on which he had been sent by the
government; then, for the first time, did Pere
Mesnard
perceive some token of danger, that St. Joseph
would lose his votary; and when he reminded Fran
oise that he had dedicated her to a religious life, she
frankly confessed that she and Eugene had reciprocally
plighted their faith. The good Father reproved and
remonstratedand represented in the strongest
colours
,
the sin of taking the heart from the altar, and
devoting it to an earthly love,but Franoise
answered
that she could not be bound by vows she had
not herself made. Oh! Father, she said, let
Rosalie
be a nun and a saintI can serve God in some
other way.
And you may be called to do so in a way, my
child, replied the Father with solemnity, that you
think not of.
And if I am, said Franoise smiling, I doubt
not, good Father, that I shall feel the virtue of all your
prayers and labours in my behalf. This was the
sportive reply of a light, unapprehensive heart, but
it sunk deeply into the Father's mind, and was indelibly
fixed there by subsequent circumstances. A year
passed onRosalie was numbered with the black nuns
of the Hotel Dieu. Eugene paid frequent visits to
St. Louis, and Pere Mesnard finding further opposition
useless, himself administered the holy sacrament of
marriage. Here the Father pauses in his narrative, to
eulogize the union of pure and loving hearts, and
pronounces
that, next to a religious consecration, this is
most acceptable to God.
The wearisome winter of Canada was pastsummer
had come forth in her vigour, and clothed with
her fresh green the woods and valleys of St. Louis;
the full Utawa had had thrown off its icy mantle, and
proclaimed its freedom in a voice of gladness. Pere
Mesnard had been, according to his daily custom, to
visit the huts of his little flock. He stopped before the
crucifix which he had caused to be erected in the centre
of the villagehe looked about upon the fields
prepared
for summer cropsupon the fruit trees gay with
herald blossoms, he saw the women and children
busily at work in their little garden patches, and he
raised his heart in devout thankfulness to God, who
had permitted him to be the instrument of redeeming
these poor savages from a suffering life. He cast his
eye on the holy symbol before which he knelt, and
saw, or fancied he saw, a shadow flit over it. He
thought it was a passing cloud, but when he looked
upward, he perceived the sky was cloudless, and then
he knew full well it was a presage of coming evil. But
when he entered his own cabin, the sight of Franoise
dispelled his gloomy presentiments. Her face, he
says, was as bright and clear as the lake, when not a
breath of wind was sweeping across it, and the clear
sun shone upon it. She had, with her simple skill,
been ornamenting a scarf for Eugene. She held it up
to Pere Mesnard as he entered. See, Father, she
said, I have finished it, and I trust Eugene will never
have a wound to soil it. Hark! she added, he will
be here presently, I hear the chorus of his French
boatmen
swelling on the air. The good Father would
have said, you think too much of Eugene, my child,
but he could not bear to check the full tide of her
youthful happiness, and he only said with a smile,
when your bridal moon is in the wane, Franoise, I
shall expect you to return to penances and prayers.
She did not heed him, for at that instant she caught a
glimpse of her husband, and bounded away, fleet as a
startled deer, to meet him. Pere Mesnard observed
them as they drew near the cabin. Eugene's brow
was contracted, and though it relaxed for a moment at
the fond caresses of Franoise, it was evident from his
hurried step and disturbed mien, that he feared some
misfortune. He suffered Franoise to pass in before
him, and unobserved by her, beckoned to Pere
Mesnard
.
Father, he said, there is danger near.
An Iroquois captive was brought into Montreal
yesterday, who confessed that some of his tribe were
out on a secret expedition; I saw strange canoes moored
in the cove at Cedar Islandyou must instantly return
with Franoise in my boat to Montreal.
What! exclaimed the Father, think you that I
will desert my poor lambs at the moment the wolves
are upon them!
You cannot protect them, Father, replied
Eugene
.
Then I will die with them.
Nay, Father, urged Eugene, be not so rash.
Goif not for your own sake, for my poor Franoise
what will become of her if we are slain?The
Iroquois
have sworn vengeance on her, and they are
fierce and relentless as tigers. Go, I beseech you
every moment is winged with death. The boatmen
are ordered to await you at Grassy Point. Take your
way through the maple woodI will tell Franoise
that Rosalie has sent for herthat I will join her
to-morrow
any
thing to hasten your departure.
Oh, my sonI cannot gothe true Shepherd will
not leave his sheep.
F 2
The good Father continued inexorable, and the only
alternative was to acquaint Franoise, and persuade
her to depart alone. She positively refused to go
without
her husband. Eugene represented to her that he
should be for ever disgraced if he deserted a settlement
under the protection of his government, at the moment
of peril.My life, Franoise, he said, I would lay
down for youbut my honour is a trust for youfor
my countryI must not part with it. He changed
his intreaties into commands.
Oh, do not be angry with me, said Franoise;
I will go, but I do not fear to die here with you,
She had scarcely uttered these words when loud yells
were heardIt is my father's war-whoop, she cried
St. Joseph aid us!we are lost.
Flyfly, Franoise, exclaimed EugeneTo
the maple wood, before you are seen.
Poor Franoise, threw her arms around her husband
clung to him in one long, heart-breaking embrace,
and then ran towards the wood. The terrible war-cry
followed, and there mingled with it, as if shrilly
whispered
in her ear, Vengeancethe day of your father's
vengeance will come. She attained the wood, and
mounted a sheltered eminence, from which she could
look back upon the green valley. She stopped for an
instant
.
The Iroquois canoes had shot out of the island
cove, and were darting towards St. Louis, like vultures
eager for their prey. The Utawas rushed from their
huts, some armed with muskets, others simply with bows
and arrows. Pere Mesnard walked with a slow but
assured step towards the crucifix, and having reached
it, he knelt, seemingly insensible to the gathering
storm, and as calm as at his usual vesper prayer. Ah,
thought Franoise, the first arrow will drink his
lifeblood
.Eugene
was every where at the same instant
urging some forward, and repressing others; and in
a few moments all were marshalled in battle array
around the crucifix.
The Iroquois had landed. Franoise forgot now
her promise to her husband, forgot every thing in her
intense interest in the issue of the contest. She saw
Pere Mesnard advance in front of his little host, and
make a signal to Talasco. Ah, holy Father, she
exclaimed
,
thou knowest not the eagle of his tribe
thou speakest words of peace to the whirlwind.
Talasco drew his bowFranoise sunk on her knees,
God of mercy shield him, she cried. Pere
Mesnard
fell pierced by the arrowthe Utawas were
panic struck. In vain Eugene urged them forward
in vain he commanded them to discharge their
muskets
.
All with the exception of five men turned and
fled. Eugene seemed determined to sell his life as
dearly as possible. The savages rushed on him and
his brave companions with their knives and
tomahawks
.
He must die! exclaimed Franoise; and
instinctively she rushed from her concealment. A
yell of triumph apprized her that her father's band
descried hershe faltered notshe saw her husband
pressed on every side. Oh, spare himspare him!
she screamedhe is not your enemy. Her father
darted a look at herA Frenchman!a Christian!
he exclaimed, and not my enemy, and turned again
to his work of death. Franoise rushed into the
thickest of the frayEugene uttered a faint scream at
the sight of her. He had fought like a blood hound
while he believed he was redeeming moments for her
flight; but when the hope of saving her forsook him,
his arms dropped nerveless, and he fell to the ground.
Franoise sunk down beside himshe locked her
arms around him, and laid her cheek to his. For one
moment her savage foes fell back, and gazed on her in
silencethere was a chord in their natures that
vibrated
to a devotedness which triumphed over the fear
of death; but their fierce passions were suspended
only for a moment. Talasco raised his tomahawk
Do not strike, father, said Franoise, in a faint calm
voice, he is dead. Then let him bear the
death-scar
,
replied the unrelenting savage, and with one
stroke he clove her husband's head asunder. One
long loud shriek pealed on the air, and Franoise sunk
into as utter unconsciousness as the mangled form she
clasped. The work of destruction went onthe huts
of the Utawas were burned, and women and children
perished in one indiscriminate slaughter.
The Father relates that he was passed, wounded,
and disregarded, in the fury of the assaultthat he
remained
in a state of insensibility till midnight, when
he found himself lying by the crucifix with a cup of
water, and an Indian cake beside him. He seems at
a loss whether to impute this succour to his saint, or
to some compassionate Iroquois. He languished for a
long time in a state of extreme debility, and when he
recovered, finding every trace of cultivation
obliterated
from St. Louis, and the Utawas disposed to
impute
their defeat to the enervating effect of his peaceful
doctrineshe determined to penetrate further into the
wilderness; faithfully to sow the good seed, and to
leave the harvest to the Lord of the field. In his
pilgrimage he met with a Utawas girl who had been
taken from St. Louis with Franoise, and who related
to him all that happened to his beloved disciple after
her departure, till she arrived at Onnontagu, the chief
village of the Iroquois.
For some days she remained in a state of torpor,
and was borne on the shoulders of the Indians. Her
father never spoke to hernever approached her, but
he permitted Allewemi to render her every kindness.
It was manifest that he intended to give his daughter
to this young chieftain. When they arrived at
Onnontagu
,
the tribe came out to meet them, apparelled in
their garments of victory, consisting of beautiful skins
and mantles of feathers, of the most brilliant colours.
They all saluted Franoise, but she was as one deaf,
and dumb, and blind. They sung their songs of
greeting
and of triumph, and the deep voice of the old chief
Talasco swelled the chorus. Franoise's step did not
falter nor her cheek blench; her eyes were cast down,
and her features had the fixedness of death. Once,
indeed, when she passed her mother's hut, some
tender
recollection of her childhood seemed to move her
spirit, for tears were seen to steal from beneath her
eye-lids
.
The wild procession moved on to the green, a
place appropriated in every Indian village to councils
and sports. The Indians formed a circle around an
oak treethe ancients were seatedthe young men
stood respectfully without the circle. Talasco arose,
and drawing from his bosom a roll, he cut a cord that
bound it, and threw it on the groundBrothers and
sons, he said, behold the scalps of the Christian
Utawas!their bodies are mouldering on the sands of
St. Louisthus perish all the enemies of the Iroquois.
Brothers, behold my childthe last of the house of
Talasco. I have uprooted her from the strange soil
where our enemies had planted her; she shall be reset
in the warmest valley of the Iroquois, if she marries
the young chief Allewemi and abjures that sign, and
he touched with the point of his knife the crucifix that
hung at Franoise's neck. He paused for a moment,
Franoise did not raise her eyes, and he added, in a
voice of thunder, Hear me, child, if thou dost not
again link thyself in the chain of thy peopleif thou
dost not abjure that badge of thy slavery to the
Christian
dogs, I will sacrifice theeas I swore before I
went forth to battle, I will sacrifice thee to the God
Areouskilife and death are before theespeak.
Franoise calmly arose, and sinking on her knees,
she raised her eyes to Heaven, pressed the crucifix
to her lips, and made the sign of the cross on her
forehead. Talasco's giant frame shook while he looked
at herfor one brief moment the flood of natural
affection
rolled over his fierce passions, and he uttered a
piercing cry as if a life-cord were severed, but after
one moment of agony, the sight of which made the
old men's heads to shake, and young eyes to overflow
with tears, he brandished his knife, and commanded
the youths to prepare the funeral pile. A murmur
arose among the old men.
Nay, Talasco, said one of them, the tender
sapling
should not be so hastily condemned to the fire.
Wait till the morning's sunsuffer thy child to be
conducted to Genanhatenna's hutthe call of the
mother bird may bring the wanderer back to the
nest.
Franoise turned impetuously towards her father,
and clasping her hands, she exclaimed, Oh do notdo
not send me to my motherthis only mercy I ask of
youI can bear any other torturepierce me with
those knives on which the blood of my husband is
scarcely dryconsume me with your firesI will
not shrink from any tormenta Christian martyr can
endure as firmly as the proudest captive of your
tribe.
Ha! exclaimed the old man, exultingly, the pure
blood of the Iroquois runs in her veinsprepare the
pilethe shadows of this night shall cover her ashes.
While the young men were obeying the command,
Franoise beckoned to Allewemi. You are a
chieftain
,
she said, and have powerrelease that poor
Utawas child from her captivitysend her to my
sister Rosalie, and let her say to her, that if an earthly
love once came between me and Heaven, the sin is
expiatedI have suffered more in a few hoursin a
few moments, than all her sisterhood can suffer by
long lives of penance. Let her say that in my
extremity
I denied not the cross, but died courageously.
Allewemi promised all she asked, and faithfully
performed
his promise.
A child of faitha martyr does not perish without
the ministry of celestial spirits. The expression of
despair vanished from Franoise's face. A supernatu
ral joy beamed from her eyes, which were cast
upward
her
spirit seemed eager to spring from its
prison-house
she
mounted the pile most cheerfully, and
standing erect and undaunted, Happy am I, she
exclaimed
,
thus permitted to die in my own country,
and by the hand of my kindred, after the example of
my Saviour, who was nailed to the cross by his own
people. She then pressed the crucifix to her lips,
and signed to her executioners to put fire to the pile.
They stood motionless with the fire-brands in their
handsFranoise appeared to be a voluntary sacrifice,
not a victim.
Her father was maddened by her victorious
constancy
.
He leaped upon the pile, and tearing the
crucifix
from her hands, he drew his knife from his girdle,
and made an incision on her breast in the form of a
crossBehold! he said, the sign, thou lovestthe
sign of thy league with thy father's enemiesthe
sign that made thee deaf to the voice of thy kindred.
Thank thee, my father! replied Franoise, with
a triumphant smile; I might have lost the cross thou
hast taken from me, but this which thou hast given me,
I shall bear even after death.
[4]
[4]
This circumstance in the martyrdom of an Indian girl, is related
by Charlevoix.
The pile was firedthe flames curled upwards; and
the
Iroquois Martyr
perished.
THE COUNTRY COUSIN.
He is a man, and men
Have imperfections; it behooves
Me pardon nature then.
The Patient Countess
.
L'homme honore la vertu
,
Dieu la recompense
.
The
dark empire of superstition has passed away.
This is the age of facts and evidence, experience and
demonstration, the enlightened age,
par excellence
.
Ghosts, apparitions, banshees, phocas, cluricaunes,
fairies, good people all, are now departed spirits.
The fairies, the friends of poets and story-tellers, the
patrons, champions, and good geniuses of children, no
longer keep their merry revels on the green sward by
the glow-worm's lamp; they are gone, exhaled like
the dews that glittered on last summer's leaves. The
dainty spirits that knew to swim, to dive into the
fire, to ride on the curled clouds, to put a girdle round
about the earth in forty minutes, have no longer a
being save in poetry. Like the Peri of the Persian
mythology, they forfeit their immortality when they
pass the bounds of their paradisethat paradise the
poet's imagination.
Though in the full meridian of our enlightened
day, we look back with something like regret to the
imaginative era of darkness, when spirits, embodied in
every form that fear or fancy could invent, thronged the
paths of human life, broke its monotony, and coloured
its dull surface with the bright hues and deep shadows
of magic light. We almost envy the twilight of our
Indian predecessors, whose quickening faith, like the
ancient philosophy, infused vitality into external nature,
imparting a portion of the Infinite Spirit to mountain,
valley, stream, and flower, that faith that gave discourse
and reason to trees, and stones, and running brooks.
Strange that in the progress of light, mind should
surrender its dominion to matter! that the metaphysics
of nature should yield to the physical sciences! that
the materialism of the mineralogist, the botanist, the
geologist, should prevail over the spirituality of the
savage! But so it is. The suggestions of superstition
so universal in man's natural state of ignorance, are
silenced by the clear, cold demonstrations of knowledge.
Who now ventures to tell a fairy tale beyond the
purlieus of the nursery? Who would hope to raise a
ghost above the subterranean region of the kitchen?
The murdered lie as quietly in their graves as if they
had been dismissed to their rest anointed and annealed;
and even Love's martyrs, the most persevering of all
night-walkers, no more revisit the glimpses of the moon.
And yet there seems to be a deep foundation in nature
for a belief in mysterious visitations, in our unknown
and incomprehensible connexion with spiritual beings.
The mighty mind of Johnson was duped by the ghost
of Cocklane, and seized, as he himself confesses, on
every tale of the reappearance of the dead to support
his religious faith! What are we to infer from the
horoscope of the hero of Guy Mannering, what from
the Lady of Avenel, and all the strange prophecies
fulfilled of Sir Walter Scott, but that the wild and
fantastic superstitions of his native land, that meet
nurse of a poetic child, still control his imagination.
Even Napoleon, who feared no power embodied in
flesh and blood, bowed like an Oriental slave before
the dark, mysterious despot Destiny.
We have made this long introduction to a ghost story
it was once our good fortune to hear well told, to
G
persuade our readers that we have drunk deep enough
of the spirit of the age to laugh, when we are in the
presence of the honoured public, at the superstition and
credulity of others, though we may still cherish some
relic of it in our secret soul.
Somewhere between twenty and thirty years ago
there is, alas! a period when accurate dates become a
sort of
memento mori
we, or rather Ifor, like
a late popular writer, we detest that reviewer in the
abstract, the cold, and critical, and pompous
we
I
was on a visit to a friend of my parents who resided
in New York, Mrs. Reginald Tudor. She was an
Englishwoman by birth, but had long been a resident
in this country, and, though of a noble family, and
educated with aristocratic prejudices, she was, in all acts
of kindness, condescension, and humanity, a Christian;
and is not Christianity the foundation, the essence of
republicanism? Her instincts were aristocratic, or those
principles of conduct that are so early inculcated and
acted on that they become as impulsive and powerful
as instincts; but when a deed of kindness was to be
done, she obeyed the levelling law of the religion of
universal equality. As Mrs. Reginald Tudor, the lady
of polite society, she was versed and strict in all artificial
distinctions and nice observances; but as a Christian,
friend, and benefactress, no fiery revolutionist ever so
well illustrated the generous doctrine of equality; for
hers was the perfect standard of rectitude, and every
one who needed the tender charities of life from her,
was her brother and her sister. Forgive her then,
gentle reader, a slight contempt of republican manners,
and a little pride in her titled ancestry and noble
English relatives.
Like most old people, Mrs. Tudor talked always of
the past, and the friends of her youth. Her
grandfather
,
whose pet she had been sixty years since, was
her favourite topic. Her stories began with My dear
grandfather, Lord MorelandLord Moreland was
the invariable sequence. But this was an innocent
vanity, and should not cast a shade over my honoured
friend's memory. The only evil attending this foible,
so ill adapted to our country, was that it had infected
her grandaughter, my friend Isabel Williamson.
Isabel, at the period of which I write, was, a beautiful
girl of eighteen, an only child, and as such cherished
and caressed, but not spoiled by her parents and
grandmother
.
Nothing could spoil so frank and generous a
disposition, so noble-minded a creature. But Isabel
was touched with the family taint of pride. She had
a feeling very closely bordering on contempt for every
thing American, and, though born in the city of New
York, though her mother and her maternal ancestors
were American, she always called herself English,
preferred all English usages, however ill suited to
our state of society, had some pretty affectations of
Anglican phraseology, imported her dresses, hats,
shoes, from England, employed English teachers, and
preferred English men and admirers.
At the time I was with her, her parents were away
from home on a long absence, and during my visit her
cousin Lucy Atwell arrived in town from the West.
The West, a designation that has removed with our
emigrants to Missouri, then meant one of the middle
district counties of the state of New York. Lucy came,
consigned for life, to Isabel's parents. She was a meek,
timid, country girl, of about seventeen, made an orphan
by sudden bereavement, and by an accumulation of
misfortunes left pennyless. This was an irresistible
appeal to Isabel's heart. Grandmamma, she said to
Mrs. Tudor, we must provide for poor Lucy.
Certainly, Isabel, I was sure you would say so.
I have been thinking, resumed Isabel, that
Mrs. Arnott's would be such a good place for Lucy
to board.
My dear Isabel, we must keep her with us.
Grandmamma!
Why not, my child?
Isabel well knew the why not, operative on her
mind, but she did not care to tell it, and she offered
the most plausible reason that occurred to her. You
know, Ma'am, it must be so unpleasant for a person to
live as a dependent in the family of relatives.
That depends, Isabel, on the tempers of the parties.
If you are not wanting in kindness and consideration,
I am sure, from little Lucy's sweet face, she will not
fail in gratitude and contentment; at any rate she must
stay with us.
Do you not think, said Isabel to me when we
were alone together, that grandmamma is getting
childish? She was so decided, so obstinate to-day,
about Lucy.
The following day I perceived that Isabel suffered
a series of mortifications on her cousin's account. In
the first place nothing could be more decidedly
countryfied
,
not to say vulgar, for I cannot bear to apply
that word even for once to one so pretty, gentle, and
essentially refined as Lucynothing could be more
countryfied
, more ill made, and unbecoming than our
little rustic's dress. The date of our story was long
before the artful looms of Europe had prepared every
variety of texture, and brought the light silk and
delicate
barege
level to the means of the most humble
purchaser. It was the age of cotton cambrics, and
bombazettes, and our country cousin was dressed in a
stiff, glazed, black cotton cambric, with a vandyke of
the same, a crimped
leno
frill, and white knit yarn
stockings. It was then the fashion to dress the hair
low, with braids and bands after the classic models;
Lucy's was drawn up like a tower on the top of her
head, and walled in by a horn comb. Isabel spent too
much money, time, and thought on her dress not to
pride herself on its style, and never was there a more
striking contrast than the two cousins presented, when
they were both seated together in the parlour. Isabel,
arrayed in high fashion and taste, with her toy
work-basket
filled with the elegant implements of idlesse
work, and Lucy, in the costume we have described,
diligently knitting a full sized, substantial cotton
stocking
.
But in spite of this homely vulgarity, there was
something of nature's aristocracy in her graceful and
delicate outline, in her serious eye, and thoughtful,
fair young brow, and I felt hurt and mortified for my
dear friend Isabel, when I perceived a little flutter and
fidgetiness about her at every rap at the street door,
indicating too plainly her dread of having her cousin
seen by her fashionable acquaintance. Isabel was not
sufficiently a woman of the world, and she had too
much good feeling to desembarrass herself of this
concern
,
as a true woman of
ton
does, by the current jokes
on country cousins.
It was a day of trial to Isabel. The heavens were
serene, the air balmy, and the walking fine; and it
seemed as if all our acquaintances, and especially those
who for very delicateness were afraid of the rough
visitation of the winds, had selected this day to pour in
upon us. Mrs. Tudor was at her usual station on a
corner of the sofa, and, punctilious in the formal
politeness
of the day, she most precisely introduced every
visiter to Miss Lucy AtwellMiss Williamson's
niece; and each time, Lucy, according to her notion of
good manners, laid aside her knitting-work, rose and
dropped her little dot of a courtesy; and, though Isabel
affected to laugh and talk in her usual careless style,
I could perceive in her face, as in a mirror, her
consciousness
of poor Lucy's every word and motion.
Isabel's Anglo-mania had led her to avoid every
Americanism, word or phrase; and the concludes,
calculates, and guesses, which were in all poor
Lucy's replies to the few questions addressed to her,
grated on her cousin's ear. It is difficult to recall, after
time and matured sense has released us from the
galling
fetters that are imposed by the false notions and
G 2
artificial distinctions of fashionable society, it is difficult
to recall the feelings that, like the emotions of a
troubled
dream, were then as real to us, as they now are
illusory and ridiculous. It now seems to me
incredible
that my friend Isabel, the noble woman whom I
have since seen wrestling with fearful calamities, and
enduring calmly and sweetly the darkest night of
adversity
,
should at eighteen have wasted tears, and a
flood of them, on the mortifications I have recorded.
But so it was. They were, however, shed in private,
and known only to myself and to her grandmother,
with whom she again expostulated on the subject of
Lucy's removal to some other home. Mrs. Tudor was
mild, but firm in her first decision. In the evening,
at the usual hour for retiring, the good old lady invited
us to her apartment. This was her frequent custom,
and a great pleasure to us, for there is always
somethink
in the sociality of one's own room, far more
unbending
,
intimate, and endearing, than in the parlour
intercourse. Mrs. Tudor left her stateliness, her only
infirmity, below stairs, and in her own apartment was
the true grandmother, easy, communicative, and loving.
It was late, I believe near the witching time of night,
when we, Isabel, Lucy, and myself, drew our low
chairs around Mrs. Tudor's matronly rocking-chair.
The oil in the lamp was expended, a stick of wood was
burning, as all wood burns after twelve o'clock, fitfully,
and the bright, changeful flame threw such strange
distorted figures on the wall, that braver spirits than
ours might have been frightened at a shadow. Our
conversation turned, I don't know how, but it then
seemed naturally enough, on ghost stories. Mrs. Tudor
was the benefactress of the rising generation; her mind
was stored with strange and forgotten events; she had
treasures of marvellous appearances, which had no
record
but in her memory. After relating various
anecdotes
till we were all in a state of considerable
excitement
,
till Isabel had forgotten her coldness, and Lucy
her timidity, Mrs. Tudor said; There is one ghost
story that I have never told, not even to you, Isabel,
for whose insatiable curiosity I have produced every
other treasure from my storehouse. This is connected
with many sacred recollections, it deeply affected my
imagination at the time, and related to persons in
whom I had some interest. There are many
preliminary
circumstances before I can come at the
supernatural
incidentit is lateshall I tell it to-night?
Oh yes! was the unanimous voice, and Mrs.
Tudor proceeded.
When I lived in London, I had an intimate friend
who was, like myself, a widow, with an only son.
Mrs. M`Arthurthat was her namehad set her heart
on having her son fix himself in the calm quiet of
home and domestic life, such as suited her matured
and feminine tastes, but was not at all adapted to a
young man of unchecked ambition and ardent passions.
M`Arthur's mind was early steeped in the military
spirit of tales and songs of chivalry, and as soon as he
was old enough to think of a profession, he avowed
his willthe will, and the wish of a widow's only son
is fateto be a soldier. My friend opposed him at
first, but he who was never denied anything, was not
long opposed in his most impetuous passion, and his
poor mother, fearing all things and hoping nothing,
procured a captaincy for him, and soon after had her
heart almost broken by his being ordered on the
American service. Your father, Isabel, came to this
country at the same time, and was ever after intimately
associated with M`Arthur, and from him I have
received
the particulars that I shall relate to you.
Captain M`Arthur was appointed to command a
detachment that was sent to wrest the possession of a
small town from the Americans. The male
inhabitants
,
notwithstanding the confusion of a surprise,
made a valorous resistance, but, overcome by
numbers
and discipline, all who could fly, fled to support
the banner of their country in a more fortunate field,
and defend her where defence would be available.
Ah! said Isabel, whose partialities were always
in the English ranks, the Yankees often practised
that better part of valourdiscretion.
Not till its bolder part was useless, retorted the
gentle Lucy.
The fray is past, fair champions, said I, do not
interrupt the story.
No, girls, continued Mrs. Tudor, my story has
little to do with the war, though a good deal with the
passions it engendered. Captain M`Arthur had
gallantly
achieved his object. He obtained undisputed
possession of the town, but in effecting this, he received
a dangerous wound, and was carried bleeding and
insensible
to the best house the place afforded, situate at
the entrance of the town, and belonging to one Amos
Blunt, a bold yeoman, who had been first and last to
fight in defence of his home, and who, as he caught
from a distant hill a last look of the roof that sheltered
his two lovely and now defenceless daughters, swore
eternal hatred to the English. Fatally and cruelly did
he keep his vow.
To return to M`Arthur. The sad chances of the
battle had made his life to depend on those very
daughters
of the yeoman, Emma and Anna Blunt.
Unskilful
surgical treatment aggravated his wound; a violent
fever ensued, and for many weeks the gay and gallant
young officer was as dependent as an infant on the
tender vigilance of his pretty nurses.
The two sisters, as I have heard, were alike in
nothing but their devoted affection to each other; even
their looks were as dissimilar as distinct races, as
unlike, Isabel, as you and your cousin Lucy. You
might, indeed, if I remember their pictures accurately,
stand for their living portraits, so fair, so like a
snow-drop
,
or rather so like that meek representative of all
spiritual purity and womanly tenderness, the Madonna,
so like my sweet Lucy was Emmayes, just so
sensitive
and blushing at her own praises, even from the
lips of an old woman; and my dear Isabelbut you
cannot so well bear flattery. It is enough to say that
Anna had a brow of lofty daring, a quick, glancing,
laughter-loving eye, a rich damask on her cheek that
expressed the kindling and burning of her feelings;
lips that a Grecian artist would have chiselled to utter
the laws of love, rather than its prayers; in short, a
face and shape that a painter would have chosen for a
Semiramis, or Zenobia, or Clotilda.
Grandmamma! exclaimed Isabel, are you
describing
two daughters of a farmer?
Even so, Isabel; and truly you must remember,
my dear, what Isabel was prone to forget, nature
has no aristocratic moulds; the peasant is born with
as fine limbs and beautiful features as his lord.
Besides
,
you must know, these girls had not impaired
their natural beauty by household drudgery. Their
father was wealthy; they were his only children, and
motherless from extreme childhood, their stern father,
stern to everything but them, had lavished his wealth
to procure for them whatever advantages of education
the country then afforded.
You must allow, that when the romantic M`Arthur
awoke from his long delirium, and beheld these
beautiful
forms flitting around his pillow, he was in more
danger than he had been from their father's sword.
In the flush of health and unbroken spirits, Anna would
have been most attractive to him; but in the
gentleness
,
the patient watchings, the soft, low toned voice,
the uniform tranquillity of Emma, there was something
so suited to the nurse and leech, so adapted to the
abated spirit of the invalid, that his susceptible heart
was touched, and, in the progress of a slow
convalescence
,
entirely captivated, and honestly surrendered.
It was not in human nature, certainly not in
Emma's tender nature, to resist the fondness of the
most interesting man she had ever seen. She requited
it, with a strength and depth of devotion, that, I believe,
my dear girls, men seldom, if ever, feel.
The rash, impetuous lover proposed an immediate
marriage. His intentions were strictly honourable;
for Emma's sake he was willing to forget his noble
birth, the wishes of his far-off, widowed, but, alas!
proud mother, the duties of his official station,
propriety
,
expediency, the world, for love. But Emma was
of another temper. She could have surrendered every
other happiness in life to be M`Arthur's wife, she
could have died for him, but she would not deviate
one point from the straight line of filial duty. She
would not hear M`Arthur's vows, acknowledge him as
a lover, nor think of him as a husband, till she had her
father's sanction. This was strange to the indulged
youth, who had never regarded any sanction but that of
his own inclinations; he felt himself thwarted by her
determination, and half offended by the absolute
necessity
of waiting till the consent of her father could
be obtained. However, there was no alternative.
He addressd an earnest letter to Amos Blunt; Emma
added a modest, but decided, postscript; and a trusty
American boy was hired to convey it a distance of
little less than a hundred miles, where Blunt was
stationed
.
In the then condition of the country, this was
a long and uncertain journey, and during the weary
weeks of waiting, M`Arthur lost all patience. In this
tedious interim the fearful Emma truly anticipated
the result of their appeal to her father, and, with
maidenly
modesty withdrew herself from every
demonstration
of her lover's tenderness. He called this
preciseness
and coldness, and his pride, even more than
his love, was offended.
While Emma with the resolution of a martyr,
secluded
herself in her own apartment, M`Arthur, still
confined to the house, was limited to the society of
Anna. The vigour of his spirit returned with his
improving
health, and then he found that her gay and
reckless spirit harmonized far better with his natural
temper, than the timid disposition of her sister.
Anna's beauty was more brilliant, her conversation
more lively and taking, andhave I prepared you for
it, my dear girls?when the parental fiat arrived, the
peremptory, unchangeable, no, it was received by
him with indifference, I am afraid with a secret
satisfaction
.
Poor Emma! the cold, precise Emma,
fainted
in her sister's arms; and for many successive days
she seemed hovering between life and death. To
disobey
,
or evade, or attempt to soften her father's will,
was to her impossible; but to endure it, appeared
equally impossible. She must suffer, might die, but
would submit.
At first she dreaded the remonstrances of her lover,
then she expected them, and expressed this
expectation
to Anna, first in broken sentences and then in
more significant looks; but Anna made no reply to her
words or questioning glances. She loved Emma
better than anything butM`Arthur. She hung over
her with devoted tenderness, and, I doubt not, with a
self-reproach she could not stifle.
By slow degrees Emma recovered her self-control,
and, armed with all the fortitude she could gather or
assume, she prepared to meet her lover's gazethat
gaze was altered, the lover
her
lover no longer. How
sure and rapid is the intelligence of true affection! A
short, slight observation proved to her that M`Arthur's
love was transferredtransferred to her sister. The
infidelity of the two beings she most loved on earth,
almost broke her heart; but, as the most touching of
writers has said of the sweetest manifestation of
character
,
the temper of Emma was like an olian harp
whose sounds die away in the tempest, and are heard
again in every gentle breeze. She said nothing,
she looked nothing; she was much alone, and found
her troubled spirit found rest where it is only to be
in every modification of human misery, in those high
communings that are on the spiritual mount, far above
the atmosphere of mortal passions. Anna felt the
rebuke of Emma's silence and downcast eye far more
than she would the gentlest even of reproachesan
involuntary look. She accused herself, she wept, she
fell at her sister's feet, she offered to abjure her lover
for ever. Emma folded her in her arms, and it was
long before either could speak or listen; but when
Emma could utter her resolves gently, softly, tenderly,
as they were spoken, it was evident they were
unalterable
.
That
bond, Anna, is severed for ever; we
are sisters, our God has united us by this tie, our sin
alone can destroy or weaken it; it has been rudely
jarred, but it is not harmedis it Anna? Anna only
replied by a more fervent embrace, a freer burst of tears.
Emma was long silent, but when she at last spoke, no
one would have detected in the tones of her voice a
feeling stronger than sisterly tenderness.
During their interview, Anna confessed that the
inconstant, but really ardent, and I must say really
honourable lover
Oh! say nothing in his favour! say nothing in his
favour! interrupted, in one voice, the indignant young
auditors.
Ah! my dear girls, replied Mrs. Tudor, we learn,
as we go on in life, to look far more in sorrow than in
anger, on the transgressions of our fellow beings; we
know better how to estimate human infirmity and the
power of temptation; but I have no time to moralize.
I will only beg you to remember, when you have still
more cause for indignation against poor M`Arthur,
that he was then scarce twenty-two, that he was
spoiled
by fortune, by admiring friends, and by that chief
spoiler, a doting, widowed mother; and, lest you should
be too harsh, let me tell you, that he has since
redeemed
,
by a virtuous life, the follies, aye, the sins of
his youth.
Where was I? Oh! on the point of telling you
that Anna confessed M`Arthur had urged an
immediate
marriage, without a reference to her father, which,
he maintained, experience had taught them would be
useless. The military events of the day, he said,
indicated that the British forces would soon be
withdrawn
from town, and his last letters from his
commanding officer, intimated that he would then
probably be transferred to the southern army.
He intreated, with all the vehemence of love, that
Anna would give him a right to claim her, as his wife,
when the disastrous war should be over. Anna had
half consented to sacrifice her filial duty. Against
this Emma remonstrated most earnestly. She adjured
her sister not to provoke the wrath of Heaven, so sure
speedily to overtake filial disobedience. She saw
M`Arthur; and, with the unfaltering, and almost
irresistible
voice of determined virtue, intreated him not
to tempt her sister to this departure from filial duty.
`But of what use,' asked M`Arthur, `will be an
appeal to your father, when his old prejudices will be all
justified by,' his voice sunk to an almost inaudible tone,
`by the demerit that none but an angel would forgive?'
`Emma hesitated for a few moments, and then
said, with decision, `I will go to him myself.'
`You, Emma! You cannot, you shall not; there
are a thousand dangers!'
`There are none that need to deter me. I will go.
My father, though terrible to his enemies and stern to
the world, never denied me anything that I asked
myself from him. I am sure I can make such
representations
that he will give me his consent. I will
hear nothing more from you,no, I will not hear your
thanks till I return; provide a proper guard to attend
me as far as your lines extend, I shall have nothing to
fear after I get among our own people.
M`Arthur would have poured out his admiration
and gratitude, but Emma fled from it all, and hastily
H
prepared herself for her romantic expedition. A small
detachment of the regular army, and a large body of
militia, to which her father was attached, had
approached
within fifty miles of town; but for a
young girl to traverse this distance in the unsettled
state of the country, required all the spirit that a noble
purpose inspires, and all the courage of heaven-born
innocence. Poor Emma endured manifold fears, and
encountered some dangers; but this detail I reserve
for some other time. At the expiration of the third
day she arrived safely at the American quarters.
When her father's first surprise and joy at seeing
her was over, she communicated, with her own sweet
grace and earnestness, the purpose of her journey.
No words can ever describe her father's rage. I would
not repeat to you, if I could, his horrible language.
He commanded her, on pain of his everlasting
displeasure
,
never again to mention the name of M`Arthur.
He looked upon his daughters as bewitched by a spell
of the arch enemy. He said M`Arthur's conduct
was just what he should have expected from an
English
scoundrel, from any, or all of the miscreants.
Every breath that Emma dared to utter, swelled the
torrent of his rage. He swore to revenge her wrongs,
to avenge his polluted home; and, finally, he concluded
by pronouncing curses, loud and deep, and as poor
Emma thought, interminable on Anna, if she did not
immediately break off all connexion with M`Arthur,
and abjure him forever.
Emma trembled and wept. She knew how
unrelenting
was her father's determination, and her whole
anxiety now was to save her sister from these terrible
curses, as fearful to the duteous Emma as the wrath of
Heaven. She set out on her return without any delay.
A variety of circumstances protracted her journey.
When she arrived at the point where M`Arthur's
guard was to meet her, no guard was there, and her
progress was arrested by an American officer, a friend
of her father's, who absolutely forbade her proceeding.
The British, he said, were daily contracting their
lines. There were almost hourly skirmishes between
small detachments of soldiers, and nothing could be
more perilous than for a young woman to traverse
even the short distance that remained to her home.
She was conducted to a comfortable lodging in a kind
family, but no kindness or security could tranquilize
her troubled and anxious mind. She knew too well
the impetuous temper of M`Arthur to hope he would
have patience to await her return, and she feared that
her light-hearted, reckless, sanguine sister, would,
trusting implicitly to her success, yield to the
importunities
of her lover. For three weeks she was
compelled
to endure these apprehensions; to endure the
thought that she was freighted with those curses that
were to fall on her sister's head like the withering
vengeance
of Heaven.
At last she was permitted to proceed, and she
arrived
at town without the slightest molestation
or accident. As soon as she entered it, she saw that
the aspect of things was entirely changed. The
military
array that had given to the quiet scene a temporary
life and bustle, had vanished. The street was as quiet
as a sabbath morning. A few well known faces
appeared
peeping from the doors and windows. Emma
did not stop to ask any explanation, she did not even
see their welcoming nods and smiles; and though an
old man, the walking chronicle of the town, quickened
his pace towards her, as if he would be the first to
communicate
what tidings there were, she hurried her
horse onward. Her home was on the outskirts of the
town. When she reached it, her servant girl met her
at the gate, and broke forth in exclamation ofEmma
knew not what. She cast one wild glance around the
parlour, screamed Anna's name, and flew to her
apartment
.
The one fear that she had gone with M`Arthur
prevailed over every other. She opened her chamber
door, she was there, buried in her shawl, and weeping
aloud. At the sight of Emma she uttered an
exclamation
of surprise and joy, and her voice dying away
in bitter grief, `Oh! Emma, my sister,' she murmured,
`he is gone, my husband is gone!' `Your
husband!
'
cried Emma, and it was long, long, my dear girls,
before she uttered another word. It was as she had
apprehended
.
M`Arthur had been impatient of her
delay
,
and had persuaded Anna to a private marriage,
only one week after Emma had left them. Emma
did not reproach her sister, she would not have added
a feather's weight to the inevitable consequences of
her rashness. Those consequences it was now her
anxious care to avert. She only communicated to
Anna so much of her father's reply as expressed his
firm negative. This was fearful enough to Anna; but
as her marriage had been strictly private, she hoped to
keep it from his knowledge, and Emma, to shield her
sister, prepared herself, for the first time in her life, for
evasion and concealment.
There was now no obstacle to her father's return.
He came home the next day, and his wrath against the
enemy grew at every trace of their footsteps. He
suspected
nothing, but he was for some time less kind
and frank to his daughters than formerly. He never
alluded to their guest by words, but, when anything
having the most distant relation to his residence with
them occurred, he would contract his brow, become
suddenly pale, bite his lips, and indicate, in ways too
obvious to his gentle daughters, that his hatred burnt
as fiercely as ever.
Sally, the servant, made her appearance before him
one day in a holiday suit, with a gay locket dangling
from her neck. `Ah! Sally,' said Blunt, `where did
you get that pretty finery in these hard times?'
The girl knew her master's infirmity, she saw
the colour mount to her young ladies' cheeks, and she
stammered out, as if she had stolen it, `Captain M`
Arthur
gave it to me, Sir.' Blunt tore it from her neck,
and crushed it under his foot.
Some weeks after this startling demonstration of
his unabated hatred, and several months after M`
Arthur's
departure, a little crippled boy, who lived on an
adjoining farm, came into Blunt's parlour with a pretty
flute sticking in his hat-band. `Ah! Jerry, my boy,'
said the old man kindly, for, like the lion, he was
tender
to all small and defenceless creatures. `Ah!
Jerry
,
that is the little flute that makes such pleasant music
for us of these moonlight evenings, and that piped such
a merry welcome to us the day we came home, is it?
let's see it, Jerry.' Jerry gave it to him. Emma
and Anna trembled. `Oh!' said Jerry, `if you could
only have heard the captain play it, Sir; he gave it to
me for finding Miss Anna's ring.'
The poor boy's flute was instantly crackling in the
flames, and a fiery, suspicious, questioning glance
darted
at Anna. It fell on the ringthe fatal wedding
ring. Oh! my dear girls, I cannot describe the scene
that followed. All Blunt's honest feelings were
wounded
,
all his fierce passions excited. Emma, fearless for
herself, wept and interceded for her sister; but her
voice could no more be heard than the wail of an infant
amidst the raging of the ocean. Anna was cast out
from his door, commanded never again to enter his
presence, every name of dishonour was heaped upon
her, and, while she lay on his door step, fainting in
her sister's armsfor Emma, in spite of his commands,
supported herthe last sounds she heard were her
father's curses.
Emma watched over Anna's fate with more than
a sister's love. She procured a humble, but decent
lodging for her, and expended her youth and strength
in secretly working to obtain a pittance for her support.
Blunt had peremptorily forbidden her ever to impart
one shilling of his substance to his discarded child.
Obedience to this command was the hardest of all
H 2
Emma's trials; but she held fast her integrity, and was
compelled to see daily delicacies that she loathed, to
live in overflowing plenty, without daring to give a
crumb that fell from her father's table to her poor
sister.
Three months after Anna was driven from her
father's house, she gave birth to a child, a boy, and,
as if to fill up the measure of her sorrows, he was born
blind. The poor, suffering, crushed mother; wore
away her life in watching over her stricken boy, in
sorrow for the past, and despair for the future. Five
weary years were passed without one word of
intelligence
from her husband. Newspapers were then rare,
and few found their way to town, and in those
few Emma, who diligently inquired, could never
ascertain
that any mention was made of M`Arthur. He
might have perished in battle, might have returned to
England, or, worse than all, might have forgotten his
wife. Time had no tendency to soften the heart of
Amos Blunt, time only
cut in
deeper the first decisions
of his iron will. His property, though necessarily
impaired by the war, was still far superior to his
neighbours'
;
Emma was to inherit it all, and Emma, the
dutiful and still lovely Emma was sought by many an
earnest suitor. But she was alike deaf to all. She had
no heart for anything but duty to her father and love
to her sister, and the tenderest love to the little blind
boy. For them she toiled, and with the inexhaustible
ingenuity of affection, she devised for him every
pleasure of which his darkened childhood was
susceptible
.
She contrived toys to delight his ear. She
sung for him for hours together. Every body in the
country round loved Miss Emma, and the little rangers
of flood and field brought her wild fruit and sweet
flowers for her favourite.
The child seemed to be infected with his mother's
melancholy. He would lie on the floor for hours in
most unnatural inactivity; but when he heard Emma's
step, his feet danced, his hands were outstretched,
his lips were raised, every limb, every feature
welcomed
her, all but that sparkling gem that most brightly
and piercingly speaks the feelings of the soul. Emma
would take him from his drooping mother's side, and
try by exercise, and the free enjoyment of the
genial
air, to win the colour to his cheek, but alas! in
vain.
Finally, my dear girls, that power, at whose touch
the sternest bend, laid his crushing hand on Blunt.
A slow, but mortal disease seized him; he knew he
must die. He had long before made his will, and given
everything to Emma, but on condition that she never
should transfer one penny of his property in any form
to her sister. If she violated this condition, his estate
was to be divided into one hundred dollar annuities,
to be given to such survivors of the war as had served
in the revolutionary army from the beginning of the
contest, and could give sufficient testimony of their
having killed each ten Englishmen.
Among Emma's most constant and heartily
devoted
lovers was one Harry Lee. He was the
favourite
of her father. He had fought, and had triumphed
beside him; and to give Emma to Harry before he
died, was the father's most earnest wish. On this
subject
he became every day more and more importunate.
At first, Emma, who really felt a strong friendship
for Lee, only said, `Father, Harry knows I cannot
love him.'
`What does that signify?' the old man would
reply; `Harry knows you say that, to be sure; but
he is willing to take you without it; a dutiful child
will make a dutiful wife; and I tell Harry love is
nothing but a jack-o'-lantern business.'
When this conversation was renewed in every
form that could express that this was Blunt's strongest
and almost only earthly wish, it occurred to Emma it
was possible that, by a sacrifice of her feelings in this
affair, she might induce her father to relent towards
Anna. This was the hardest sacrifice a woman could
makebut she was a noble creature.
Oh! grandmamma, exclaimed Isabel, too, too
nobleI cannot believe you are telling us a true story
I cannot believe that any woman so wronged as
Emma, would have made such exertions, such
sacrifices
.
I believe it, said Lucy Atwell, her face kindling
with an expression of fervent feeling, I know there
has been one woman capable of any virtuemy
mother
,
she added, dropping her face on Mrs. Tudor's
lap.
We were all affected at this involuntary tribute to
her mother, for whom she was still in deep mourning,
and it was some moments before Mrs. Tudor
proceeded
,
and then in a faltering voice; It is, in spite of your
unbelief, Isable, `an o'er true tale.' Emma prepared
herself for a scene, and then, her face beaming with
her celestial spirit, and her voice sustained by firm
resolve
,
she told her father that she would comply with
his wishesthat she would marry Harry Lee, if he
would provide by will for her sister, and revoke those
terrible curses that had already blasted her innocent
offspring with blindness, and were consuming her life.
The old man heard her without interruption, and
without reply; a deadly paleness overspread his
countenance
,
large drops of sweat rolled from his face, his
breathing was difficult, and it seemed that the terrible
conflict of unexpressed feeling must snap the worn
thread of life. Emma was dreadfully alarmed; she
dared not then urge him further but used every means
to tranquilize and revive him.
For two days these convulsive agitations continued,
more or less violent. He spoke not one word to
Emma, he did not even look at her; but still there
was something in the gentle touch of his hand as he
received the cordials she gave, that kept her hope alive
but just alive, for the physician had pronounced him
dying. He revived, as is usual before the last struggle,
and, looking Emma, for the first time since she had
spoken on the forbidden topic, full in the face, he bade
her bring him a certain sealed packet from his desk.
She obeyed. It was his will. With his trembling
hands he tore it to fragments, and said, as he did so,
`The law will do right to youboth.' Emma fell
on her knees; `Oh, dear father!' she cried, `say you
forgive her.'
`I can't, Emma; but I haveI have prayed God
to forgive her; now, my good child, pray for your
father.' Emma began that sacred petition, that blessed
essence of all prayer, `Our Father,' and her parent,
in a low dying whisper, repeated the words after her.
When she came to the clause, `forgive us our
trespasses
as we'`Stop,' he cried, in his own energetic
voice, for then he, for the first time, understood the
full import of those words, `stop!
that
I may not
say.' At this moment Anna, the poor, disobedient,
discarded, suffering child, rushed with her boy in her
arms to the bedside. She knelt by Emma, she stretched
out her hands, and her lips trembled with the prayer
she could not utter. Pale, emaciated, her form
attenuated
,
her eye sunkenwas this the bright, blooming,
gay Anna? To her father's eye she looked
heaven-stricken
,
and indeed accursed. He groaned from his
inmost soul. `Oh! I do forgive, but,' as he closed
his eyes, `I never will forget;' and thus divided
between the obdurate passions of earth, and the
victorious
spirit of Heaven, he heaved his last breath.
Mrs. Tudor paused, her auditors were silent,
appalled
by the history of passions too stern to have come
within the scope of their young experience, or even
their imaginations. Isabel was the first to resume her
interest in the progress of the story, and to revert to
M`Arthur, who, in his character of an English officer,
had peculiar claims in her eyes. Grandmamma,
she said, I hope we have got over the dreadful part
of the story, through the thick of it; Anna must die,
that I seepoor, poor girl! I am sure she suffered
more than she sinnedand I foresee how it will end,
M`Arthur will return, find his wife dead, and marry
Emma.
But, said Lucy, that was impossible, you know,
after her promise to marry Harry Lee.
Oh! he was a generous fellow; I dare say he gave
that up, and it would be a different case, you know,
after poor Anna died. Ah! I know now how it will
all be. Grandmamma began by saying it was a ghost
story, and the only one she ever heard she fully
believed
.
`Alas! poor ghost!' we did all forget thee.
Anna's ghost appeared to Emma, and bade her marry
M`Arthur, or perhaps the old man'soh! I should hate
to see him come back.
Well, my dear Isabel, if you are not more
interested
in your own speculations than in my story, I
will proceed; and, in the first place, I assure you the
old man's spirit never revisited the earth. I am a
little astonished that you should, for a moment, think
M`Arthur worthy of the saintly Emma; but, since
you have such a predilection for him, I will let you
know your instincts do not entirely err. He did
afterwards
become all that Ithatthat his mother ever
hoped of him.
He was, as he had expected to be, transferred to
the army of the south. The ardour of his attachment
to his wife was unabated for a long time; but he
received
no communications from her, and his own
letters
and remittances never reached her. After the
lapse of two years the impression made by his short
intercourse with Anna, in some measure faded. He
distinguished himself in his military career, was loaded
with favours by his commanding officer, he associated
exclusively with the high-born, gay, and, I fear, in too
many cases, unprincipled young men of the army, and
his own natural pride and self-indulgence were
fostered
;
andit must be toldhe looked back on his
humble alliance with mortification and deep regret.
He never communicated it to a human being. At last
came that monitor, so friendly, so necessary to human
virtue, that messenger of Heavensickness. For
months he was confined and wasting away under the
effects of the fever of the southern climate, and it was
not till about the period of the peace that he had health
and strength to execute a resolution he had formed and
cherished in the salutary solitude of his sick-room.
A few weeks after Amos Blunt's death, M`Arthur,
mounted on a fine, but way-worn steed, reined him up,
at an inn, a few miles distant from town. It
was late, on a mild star-lit evening. Two or three
men were sitting in the porch of the inn. His
intention
was to make some inquiries in relation to his wife's
family, but he could not utter them. He merely asked,
`How far is it to town?' `Five miles and
better.' He did summon courage to add, `How far
to Amos Blunt's? he lives, I think a little on this side
of the town?' `Yes; it is four miles to Amos Blunt's,
to where he did live; the old man is dead, but you'll
find some of the family there.'
M`Arthur turned his horse's head abruptly, and
spurred him on, afraid to hear another word; and he
hurried him forward, or slackened his pace, as his
hopes or fears prevailed. His mind was overshadowed
with dark apprehensions; the lapse of years had given
a new colouring to life, the pangs of awakened
conscience
a new aspect to his past career. He now looked,
with something bordering on contempt, on his boyish,
impetuous, and inconstant passion, and with deep
anguish
on his rash marriage and criminal neglect. He
felt that he deserved the judgments of Heaven; he
believed he was going to receive them.
His road gradually wound up a mountain. The
feeble star-light was shut out by the towering pines,
the lighter beeches, and the straggling dwarf oaks, that,
with all their summer's growth of foliage, overhung
the path. The woods were alive with the autumn
insects
,
whose monotonous notes, associated as they are
with the first fading and decay of nature, are always
sad. To M`Arthur they seemed creatures of evil
omen, and a whip-poor-will, who had lingered behind
his tribe, for it was now September, and was perched
on a blasted and riven oak, repeating his piercing
plaint, was a bird of evil augury to his disturbed
imagination
.
What sweet intimations these `wood notes
wild' would have conveyed to the sense of a
returning
happy and hopeful lover! and how true it is that
the mind does not receive, but gives its impressions to
the outward world! When M`Arthur attained the
summit of the mountain, the wide amphitheatre in
in which town lay, was outspread before him.
The waning moon had just risen above the horizon,
but was veiled by a mass of dense clouds, their silvered
edges just giving the intimation of her sweet presence.
Above the moon there was a singular illumination of
the atmosphere, resembling a column of golden mist,
now streaming up like the most brilliant northern
lights, and then fading and melting away in the clear
depths of ether. The phenomenon was beautiful, but
it was singular, and, to M`Arthur it appeared
unnatural
and portentous; so apt is man, even in his misery,
to magnify himself, and so quick is his conscience to
interpret and apply the manifestations of nature in the
glorious heavens, as if they were a `hand-writing on
the wall.'
Every variety of evil that could have happened to
his wife, by turns offered itself to M`Arthur's
imagination
;
but the fear that she might be dead, that she
had passed the barrier whence the voice of forgiveness
and love never comes, was stronger than any other.
As he proceeded, the moon rose triumphantly above
the clouds, and lent him her clear and steady light.
He passed a rustic bridge, a sudden turn in the road,
and mounted a little knoll that brought him in full
view of Blunt's house. There it stood, just as he had
left it, an irregular and spacious building, with its
wealth of outhouses and its court yard, sparingly
dotted with a few lilacs. Not a single `little beam'
of cheering, hope-inspiring light streamed from any of
its windows; all was dark and sullen.
Before M`Arthur reached the house, he had to
pass a spot associated with his tenderest
recollections
,
and now with his saddest fears. It was a smooth
green area of about forty yards in breadth, level to the
road-side, but elsewhere enclosed by a steep rocky
bank, thickly set with maples, beech, and lime trees.
Two old and magnificent elms sheltered this little
sanctuary from the road. Amos Blunt, rough as he
was, blind and deaf to all the beauties and appeals of
nature, at some soft moment, had his heart touched by
the genius of this sacred spot, and there he had said
he would bury his dead. There M`Arthur had often
been with the two sisters to visit their mother's grave;
the sight of her grave inspired them with tenderness
unmingled with gloom, and there they had often
talked with him of death, as young persons, my dear
girls, talk of it, to whom it is a matter of sentiment,
not of experience.
M`Arthur felt a coldness and shivering come
over him, as he approached the little wicket gate,
where he knew he could see distinctly every mound
of earth. `I will not look that way,' he said to
himself
,
`I cannot bear to learn my fate here.' But he
could not command his eye. It turned by irresistible
instinct, and was fixed. He saw a figure approaching
a grave, that, dim as the light was, appeared newly
made. The figure had the height and movement of
his wife. It was enveloped in a winding-sheet and,
having reached the grave, laid down beside it, and
rested its head on it. M`Arthur's fears now all
I
vanished, for they had sprung, not from cowardice,
but affection. He was not superstitious, all the habits
of his mind and his life were opposed to superstition;
and his first impression was that he was tricked by his
sickly fancy, that his gloomy portents, the lateness of
the hour, the associations of the place, and his coward
conscience had conjured up the apparition before him.
He dismounted from his horse, turned his eyes from
the figure to assure himself, by each familiar and
sensible
appearance, of the reality of the scene, and then,
resolved not to be the sport of idle fancies, again turned
towards the grave.
The figure was still extended there. He
approached
so near as to discern the features. It was no
illusion of his disordered imaginationthe
death-stricken
cheek laid on the glittering and broken sods.
It was the form of his wife, such as she was at parting,
save the mortal paleness, and the signet sage that sad
thought had stamped on her brow. Her face wore
the peace and serenity of death, without its sternness;
her eyelashes rested on her cheek as if the lids had
fallen naturally in sleep. There was nothing of the
rigidity of death about the figure; even the
winding-sheet
in which it was enfolded, had nothing of the
precision of the drapery of death, but was wrapped
about the form with a careless grace. One arm was
thrown over the grave, as if encircling some loved
object
,
with a consciousness of possession and security,
and on the finger gleamed the wedding ring! M`
Arthur
at first gazed at the apparition with a critical eye.
Incredulity was roused, and reason questioned,
revolted
from being duped by a mere phantasm of the
brain; but as he gazed, as he marked each well
remembered
feature, his incredulity was overcome, his reason
assented to the convictions of his senses, and yielding
himself to the power of this awful visitation from the
dead, he prostrated himself on the earth, and breathed
a prayer he could not utter, that Heaven would
vouchsafe
to interpret the purpose of this spectral apparition
to his senses. Again he lifted his head and looked at
that silent, immoveable figure. In the eagerness of
excited feelings, he drew nearer to it, he knelt beside
it, he bent over it, and gazed till the awe and shrinking
from a preternatural appearance gave place to a gush
of tenderness and bitter grief and broken ejaculation
to the spirit of his wife.
At the sound of his impassioned voice, the figure
became instinct with life, the blood mounted to her
lips and cheeks, and Anna, his living Anna, stood
before
him. Her eye glanced wildly around, then fell
on the new made grave, then fixed on her husband,
and, uttering a shriek, expressive of her alarmed and
uncertain feelings, she sunk senseless in his arms. She
was livinghe might hear the accents of forgiveness
and love from her lips, and, nerved by this blessed
assurance, he bore her in his arms to her father's house.
Emma, first awakened by his footsteps, was at the
door.
I need not, my dear girls, detain you with any
unnecessary particulars. The grave, as you have no
doubt conjectured, was the little blind boy's. He
had been interred there the preceding day; and his
poor mother, exhausted by many nights' watchings,
had in a deep sleep, risen, wrapped the sheet over her
night dress, and, led by her feverish dreams, had gone
to the grave over which her imagination and affections
hovered.
We were all silent for a few moments, partly
absorbed
in the pleasure of finding the story turn out
better for the happiness of all concerned than we had
expected, and partlyI must confess itdisappointed
that it was, after all, no ghost story. Isabel, as usual,
was the first to speak. And M`Arthur,
grandmamma
,
said she, was M`Arthur always afterwards
faithful and kind?
Always, my dear Isabel. He took his wife to
England, where she was honourably received by his
mother, and she has since been ever tenderly
cherished
.
And Emma, asked Lucy, the sweet, excelling,
sacrificing Emma, of course she married as she
promised
?
Yes, my dear girl, she did so; and in her growing
affection for her excellent husband, she found what is
not always the consequence of a first and romantic
passion, a stable and tranquil happiness.
But, asked Isabel, what did Anna  what
could she do, to testify her gratitude to that angelic
sister?
There are feelings, Isabel, for which there is no
adequate expression, but Anna manifested in every
mode their relative condition permitted her, love and
gratitude; and Emma was satisfied, for when a sudden
reverse of fortune befell her, and was followed by a
mortal sickness, she bequeathed her only daughter to
her sister, in the reposing confidence that she would
share an equal care, an almost equal love with her own
child.
Isabel looked eagerly in Mrs. Tudor's faceshe
started up, Grandmamma! she exclaimed, it is so
I know it is. You have been telling us of our
mothers!
It was plain enough that she had guessed rightly.
She turned to Lucy and folded her in her arms. I
saw in Isabel's glowing face, and fine up-raised eye,
the quick succeeding thoughts that were afterwards
embodied in sisterly affection and kindness to Lucy;
and Lucy's saintly face shone with a holy triumph
such as the virtue of a parent may inspire.
The reason why these circumstances had never
before been related to the daughters was obvious; the
reason why Mrs. Tudor had now disclosed them, and
deferred the
expose
, by using assumed names, was as
apparent, and fully approved by its permanent happy
influence.
Isabel, with the generosity of a noble nature,
assumed
her mother's debt; and the only vestige I
perceived of the worldliness that tinged her first
intercourse with Lucy, was in the elaborate care with
which she lavished all the elegant refinements of
fashion on the native graces of the
Country Cousin
.
I 2
OLD MAIDS.
To be the mistress of some honest man's house, and the means
of making neighbours happy, the poor easy, and relieving strangers,
is the most creditable lot a young woman can look to, and I heartily
wish it to all here.
Pirate
.
Mrs. Seton
, Emily Dayton is engaged to
William
Moreland!
To William Moreland. Well, why should she
not be engaged to William Moreland?
Why should she, rather?
I know not Emily Dayton's `why,' but ladies'
reasons for marrying are as `thick as blackberries.'
A common motive with girls under twenty is the clat
of an engagementthe pleasure of being the heroine
of bridal festivitiesof receiving presentsof being
called by that name so enchanting to the imagination
of a miss in her teens`
the bride
.'
But Emily Dayton, you know, is past twenty.
There is one circumstance that takes place of all
reasonperhaps she is in love.
In love with William Moreland! No, no, Mrs.
Setonthere are no `merry wanderers of the night' in
these times to do Cupid's errands, and make us dote
on that which we should hate.
Perhaps then, as she is at a
rational
age, three or
four and twenty, she may be satisfied to get a kind
sensible protector.
Kind and sensible, truly! He is the most testy,
frumpish, stupid man you can imagine.
Does she not marry for an establishment?
Oh no! She is perfectly independent, mistress of
every thing at her father's. No, I believe her only
motive is that which actuates half the girlsthe fear
of being an old maid. This may be her last chance.
Despair, they say, makes men madand I believe it
does women too.
It is a fearful fate.
An old maid's? Yes, most horrible.
Pardon me, Anne, I did not mean that; but such
a fate as you anticipate for Emily Morelandto be
yoked in the most intimate relation of life, and
for
life
, to a person to whom you have clung to save you
from shipwreck, but whom you would not select to
pass an evening with. To such a misery there can be
no `end, measure, limit, bound.'
But, my dear Mrs. Seton, what are we to do?
all women cannot be so fortunate as you are.
Perhaps not. But so kind is the system of
compensation
in this lifesuch the thirst for happiness,
and so great the power of adaptation in the human
mind, that the conjugal state is far more tolerable than
we should expect when we see the mismated parties
cross its threshold. Still there can be no doubt that
its possible happiness is often missed, and such is my
respect for my sex, and so high my estimate of the
capabilities of married life, that I cannot endure to
see a woman, from the fear of being an old maid,
driven into it, thereby forfeiting its highest
blessings
.
You must nevertheless confess, Mrs. Seton, that
there are terrors in the name.
Yes, I know there are; and women are daily
scared by them into unequal and wretched
connexions
.
They have believed they could not retain
their identity after five and twenty. That unless
their individual existence was merged in that of the
superior animal, every gift and grace with which God
has endowed them would exhale and leave a `
spectral
appearance'a sort of slough of womanan
Aunt Grizzel, or Miss Lucretia McTab. I have
lived, my dear Anne, to see many of the mists of old
superstitions melting away in the light of a better
day. Ghost is no longer a word to conjure with
witches have settled down into harmless and unharmed
old women; and I do not despair of living to see the
time when it shall be said of no woman breathing, as
I have heard it said of such and such a lady, who
escaped
from the wreck at the eleventh hour, that she
`married to die a
Mrs.
'
I hate, too, to hear such things
said
, but tell me
honestly, Mrs. Seton, now when no male ears are
within hearing, whether you do not, in your secret
soul, think there is something particularly unlovely,
repelling, and frightful, in the name of an old maid.
In the name, certainly; but it is because it does
not designate a condition but a species. It calls up
the idea of a faded, bony, wrinkled, skinny,
jaundiced
personage, whose mind has dwindled to a point
who has outlived her natural affectionssurvived
every love but love of self, and self-guarded by that
Cerberus suspicionin whom the follies of youth are
fresh when all its charms are gonewho has retained,
in all their force, the silliest passions of the silliest
womenlove of dress, of pleasure, of admiration;
who, in short, is in the condition of the spirits in the
ancients' Tartarus, an impalpable essence tormented
with the desires of humanity. Now turn, my dear
Anne, from this hideous picture to some of our
acquaintance
who certainly have missed the
happiest
destiny of woman, but who dwell in light, the
emanation
of their own goodness. I shall refer you to
actual living examplesno fictions.
No fictions, indeed, for then you must return to
the McTabs and Grizzles. Whatever your
philanthropy
may hope for that most neglected portion
of our sex, no author has ventured so far from nature
as to portray an attractive old maid. Even
Mackenzie
,
with a spirit as gentle as my Uncle Toby's, and as
tender as that of his own `Man of Feeling,' has written
an essay in ridicule of `old maids.'
And you are not perhaps aware, Anne, that he
has written a poem called the `Recantation,' and
dedicated it to his single daughter, a most lovely
woman, who was the staff and blessing of his old
age. In your wide range of reading cannot you
think of a single exception to the McTabs and
Grizzles
?
Miss Farrer's `Becca Duguid,' but she is scarcely
above contempt, trampled on by the children, and the
tool of their selfish and lazy mammas.
There is one author, Anne, the most beloved, and
the most lamented of all authors, who has not
ventured
to depart from nature, but has escaped prejudice,
and prejudice in some of its most prevailing forms.
He has dared to exhibit the Paynim Saladin as
superior
to the Christian crusader. He has dispelled the
thick clouds that enveloped the `poor Israelite,' the
most inveterate of all prejudices, transmitted from age
to age, and authorised by the fancied sanctions of
religion
.
I said the clouds were dispelled, but do they not
rather hang around the glorious Rebecca, the
unsullied
image of her Maker, as the clouds that have
broken
away from the full moon encircled her, and are
converted by her radiance to a bright halo?
Mrs. Seton! Mrs. Seton! you are, or I am
getting
lost in all this mist and fog. What have
Paynims
and Jews to do with old maids? I do not
remember an old maid in all Sir Walter's novels,
excepting, indeed, AlisonMartha TrapboisMeg
Dodsone of Monkbarns' womankind, and Miss
Yellowley, a true all-saving, fidgetting, pestering old
maid, and the rest of them are entertaining but
certainly
not very exalting members of any sisterhood.
But these are not my examples, Anne. I confess
that they are fair examples of follies and virtues that,
if not originated, are exaggerated and made
conspicuous
by single life. I confess too that for such
foibles matrimony is often a kind and safe shelter.
But to my examples. Sir Walterand who is more
poetically just than Sir Walter?has abandoned to
the desolate, tragic, and most adhorred fate of old
maids, his three first female charactersfirst in all
respects, in beauty, in mind, in goodness, first in our
hearts. The accomplished Flora M`Ivorthe
peerless
Rebecca, and the tender, beautiful Minna.
Bless me! I never thought of this.
No, nor has one in a thousand of the young ladies
who have admired these heroines laid the moral of
their story to heart. Perhaps not one of the fair young
creatures who has dropped a tear over the beautiful
sentence that closes the history of Minna,
[5]
[5]
Thus passed her life, enjoying, from all who approached her, an
affection enhanced by reverence, insomuch that when her friends
sorrowed for her death, which arrived at
a late period of her
existence
,
they were comforted by the fond reflection, that the humanity
which she then laid down, was the only circumstance which had
placed her, in the words of scripture, `A little lower than the angels.'
has been
conscious that she was offering involuntary homage to
the angelic virtues of an
old maid
. The very term
would have wrought a disenchanting spell.
I confess, Mrs. Seton, I am in what is vulgarly
called a `blue maze.' My perceptions are as
imperfect
as the man's in scripture who was suddenly cured
of blindness. Besides I was never particularly skilful
at puzzling out a moral; will you have the goodness
to extract it for me?
Certainly, Anne, as I am the lecturer, this is my
duty. First, I would have young ladies believe that
all beautiful and loveable young women do not of
course get marriedthat charms and virtues may exist,
and find employment in single lifethat a single
woman, an old maid, (I will not eschew the name,)
may love and be loved if she has not a husband, and
children of her own. I would have her learn that if,
like Flora M`Ivor, she has been surrounded by
circumstances
that have caused her thoughts and affections to
flow in some other channel that love, she need not
wed a chance Waverly to escape single life; that if,
like Rebecca, she is separated by an impassable gulf
from him she loves, she need not wed one whom she
does not love, but like the high souled Jewess she may
transmute `young Cupid's fiery shafts,' to chains that
shall link her to all her species; and if like poor Minna
she has thrown away her affections on a worthless
object
,
she may live on singly, and so well that she will
be deemed but `little lower than the angels.'
After all it is not such high natures as these that
need to be fortified by argument, or example. They
are born equal to either fortune. But I would entreat
all my sexthose even who have the fewest and
smallest
giftsto reverence themselves, to remember that
it is not so much the mode of their brief and precarious
existence that is important, as the careful use of those
faculties that make existence a blessing here, and
above all hereafter, where there is certainly `no
marrying
,
nor giving in marriage;' but I am growing
serious, and of course, I fear, tiresome to young ears.
Oh, no, no, Mrs. Seton. These are subjects on
which girls are never tired of talking nor listening;
besides, you know you promised me some examples
such as Miss Hamilton and Miss Edgeworth, I
suppose.
No, Anne, these belong to the great exceptions
I have mentioned, `equal to either fortune,' who, in
any condition, would have made their `owne renowne,
and happie days.'
I could adduce a few in our own country, known
to both of us, who are the ornament of the high
circles in which they move, but for obvious reasons I
select humble personsthose who, like some little
rivulet unknown to fame, bless obscure and
sequestered
places. There is Violet FlintI always
wondered
how she came by so appropriate a name. That little
flower is a fit emblem for hersmiling in earliest
spring, and in latest fallrequiring no culture, and
yet rewarding itneglected and forgotten when the
gay tribes of summer are caressed, and yet always
looking from its humble station with the same
cheerful
facebright and constant through the sudden
reverses of autumn, and the adversity of the roughest
winter. Such is the flower, and such is Violet Flint.
But as I am now in realities, I must call her by the
old maidenish appellation that, spoiling her pretty
name, they have given to her, `Miss Vily.' She
lives, and has for the last twenty years lived, with her
brother Sam. He married young, a poor invalid,
who, according to Napoleon's scale of merit, is a great
woman, having given to the commonwealth nine or
tenmore or lessgoodly sons and daughters. After
the children were born, all care of them, and of their
suffering mother, devolved on Violet. Without the
instincts, the claims, the rights, or the
honours
of a
mother, she has not only done all the duties of a
mother, but done them on the sure and broad basis of
love. She has toiled and saved, and made others
comfortable and enjoying, while she performed the
usually thankless task of ordering the economy of a
very frugal household. She has made the happy
happier, tended the sick, and solaced the miserable.
She sheltered the weak, and if one of the children
strayed she was the apologist and intercessor. With
all this energy of goodness the cause is lost in the blessed
effectsshe never appears to claim applause or notice.
She is not only second best; but when indulgence or
pleasure is to be distributed, her share is last and
leastthat is, according to the usual selfish reckoning.
But according to a truer and nobler scale, her amount
is greatest, for she has her share in whatever happiness
she sees in any living thing.
How many married dames are there who repeat
every fifteen minutes,
my
husband,
my
children,
my
house, and glorify themselves in all these little
personalities, who might lay down their crowns at
the feet of Violet Flint!Miss Vily, the
old maid
.
The second example that occurs to me, is Sarah
Lee. Sarah has not, like Violet, escaped all the
peculiarities
that are supposed to characterise the `
Single-sides
.'
With the chartered rights of a married lady
to fret, to be
particular
, and to have a way of her
own, her temper would pass without observation; but
being an old maid, she is called, and I must confess is,
rather
touchy
. But what are these sparks, when the
same fire that throws them off keeps warm an
overflowing
stream of benevolence?look into her room.
Oh, Mrs. Seton! I have seen it, and you must
confess
it is a true `Singleside' repository.
Yes, I do confess itnor will I shrink from the
confession, for I wish to select for my examples, not
any bright particular star, but persons of ordinary gifts,
in the common walks of life. Had Sarah been
married
she would have been a thrifty wife, and
painstaking
mother, but she wore away her youth in
devotion
to the sick and oldand now her kindness, like
the miraculous cruise, always imparting and never
diminishing, is enjoyed by all within her little sphere.
Experience has made her one of the best physicians I
know. She keeps a variety of labelled medicines for
the sick, plasters and salves of her own compounding,
and materials with which she concocts food and
beverages
of every description, nutritious and diluent; in
short, she has some remedy or solace for every ill that
flesh is heir to. She has a marvellous knack of
gathering
up fragments, of most ingeniously turning to
account
what would be wasted in another's hands. She
K
not only has
comfortables
for shivering old women,
and well patched clothes for neglected children, but
she has always some pretty favour for a bridesome
kind token for a new-born baby. And then what a
refuge is her apartment for the slip-shod members of
the family who are in distress for scissors, penknife,
thimble, needle, hook and eye, buttons, a needle-full
of silk or worsted of any particular colour. How
many broken hearts she has restored with her
inexhaustible
glue-potmending tops, doll's broken legs,
and all the luckless furniture of the baby-houseto
say nothing of a similar ministry to the `minds
diseased'
of the mammas. Sarah Lee's labours are not
always in so humble a sphere`He who makes two
blades of grass grow where one grew before,' says a
political economist, `is a benefactor to his race.' If
so, Sarah Lee takes high rank.
Two blades of grass! Her strawberry beds
produce
treble the quantity of any other in the village.
Her potatoes are the `greatest yield'her corn the
earliesther peas the richesther squashes the
sweetest
her
celery the tenderesther raspberries and
currants the greatest bearers in the country. There
is not a thimble-full of unoccupied earth in her
garden
.
There are flowers of all hues, seasons, and
climes. None dienone languish in her hands.
My dear Anne, I will not ask you if an
existence
so happy to herself, so profitable to others, should
be dreaded by herself, neglected or derided by others.
Yet Sarah Lee is an
old maid
.
You are, I confess, very happy in your instances,
Mrs. Seton, but remember the old proverb, `one
swallow
does not make a summer.'
I have not done yetand you must remember
that in our country, where the means of supporting a
family are so easily attained, and when there are no
entails to be kept up at the expense of half a dozen
single sisters, the class of old maids is a very small one.
Many enter the ranks, but they drop off in the natural
way of matrimony. Few maintain the `perseverance
of saints.' Among those few is one, who, when she
resigns the slight covering that invests her spirit, will
lay down `all she has of humanity'our excellent
friend, Lucy Ray.
She is now gently drawing to the close of a long
life, which I believe she will offer up without spot or
blemish. She began life with the most fragile
constitution
.
She has had to contend with that nervous
susceptibility of temperament that so naturally
engenders
selfishness and irascibility, and all the miseries and
weaknesses of invalidism. Not gifted with any personal
beauty, or grace, she was liable to envy her more
fortunate
cotemporaries. Without genius, talents, or
accomplishments
to attract or delight, she has often been
slightedand what is far worse, must have been always
liable to the suspicion of slights. But suspicion, that
creator and purvey or of misery, never darkened her
serene mind. She has lived in others and for others,
with such an entire forgetfulness of self, that even the
wants and weakness of her mortal part seem scarcely
to have intruded on her thoughts. She has resided
about in the families of her friendsa mode of life
which certainly has a tendency to nourish jealousy,
servility, and gossipping. But for what could Lucy
Ray be jealous or servile? She craved nothing
she asked nothing, but, like an unseen, unmarked
Providence, to do good; and as to gossipping, she had
no turn for the ridiculous, no belief of evil against
any human beingand as to speaking evil, `on her
lips was the law of kindness.' You would hardly
think, Anne, that a feeble, shrinking creature, such
as I have described, and truly, Lucy Ray, could have
been desired, as an inmate with gay young people, and
noisy, turbulent children. She was always welcome,
for, like her Divine Master, she came to minister
not to be ministered unto.
Lucy, like the Man of Ross, is deemed passing rich
by the children, and an unfailing resource to the poor
in their exigencies, though her income amounts to
rather less than one hundred dollars!!
We sometimes admire the art of the Creator more
in the exquisite mechanism of an insect than in the
formation of a planet, and I have been more struck
with the power of religion in the effect and exaltation
it gave to the humble endowments of this meek
woman
,
than by its splendid results in such a life as
Howard's. Lucy Ray, by a faithful imitation of her
master, by always aiding and never obstructing the
principle of growth in her soul, has, through every
discouragement and disability, reached a height but
`little lower than the angels;' and when her now
flickering light disappears, she will be lamented almost
as tenderly (alas! for that almost) as if she were a
mother; and yet, Anne, Lucy Ray is an
old maid
.
You half persuade me to be one too, Mrs.
Seton
.
No, Anne, I would by no means persuade you or
any woman to
prefer
single life. It is not the `
primrose
path.' Nothing less than a spirit of meekness,
of self renunciation, and of benevolence, can make a
woman, who has once been first, happy in a
subordinate
and
second best
position. And this under
ordinary circumstances is the highest place of a single
woman. Depend upon it, my dear young friend, it
is safer for most of us to secure all the helps to our
virtues that attend a favourable position; besides,
married
life is the destiny Heaven has allotted to us, and
therefore best fitted to awaken all our powers, to
exercise
all our virtues, and call forth all our sympathies.
I would persuade you that you may give dignity and
interest to single life, that you may be the cause of
happiness to others, and of course happy yourselffor
when was the fountain dry while the stream continued
to flow? If single life, according to the worst view of it,
is a moral desert, the faithful, in their passage through
it, are refreshed with bread from Heaven and water
from the rock.
I shall conclude with a true story. The parties are
not known to you. The incidents occurred long ago,
and I shall take the liberty to assume names; for I
would not, even at this late day, betray a secret once
confided to me, though time may long since have
outlawed it. My mother had a school-mate and friend
whom I shall call Agnes Gray. Her father was a
country clergyman with a small salary, and the
blessing
that usually attends ita large family of children.
Agnes was the eldest, and after her following a line
of boys, as long as Banquo's. At least, some ten
years after Agnes, long waited and prayed for,
appeared
a girl, who cost her mother her life.
The entire care of the helpless little creature
devolved on Agnes. She had craved the happiness
of possessing a sister, and now, to a sister's love, she
added the tenderness of a mother. Agnes' character
was formed by the discipline of eircumstancesthe
surest of all discipline. A host of turbulent boys,
thoughtless and impetuous, but kind-hearted, bright,
and loving, had called forth her exertions and
affections
,
and no one can doubt, either as lures or
goads, had helped her on the road to heaven. Nature
had, happily, endowed her with a robust constitution,
and its usual accompaniment, a sweet temper; so that
what were mountains to others, were mole hills to
Agnes. `The baby,' of course, was the pet lamb of
the fold. She was named, for her mother, Elizabeth;
but, instead of that queenly appellation, she was
always addressed by the endearing diminutive of Lizzy.
Lizzy Gray was not only the pet of father, brothers,
and sister at homebut the plaything of the village.
The old women knit their brightest yarn into
tippets
and stockings for the `minister's motherless little
one' (oh, what an eloquent appeal was in those words!)
K 2
the old men saved the `red cheeked' apples for her
the boys drew her, hour after hour, in her little
wagon, and the girls made her rag babies. Still she
was not in any disagreeable sense an
enfant gatee
.
She was like those flowers that thrive best in warm
and continued sunshine. Her soft hazle eye, with its
dark sentimental lashes, the clear brunette tint of her
complexion, and her graceful flexible lips, truly
expressed
her tender, loving, and gentle spirit. She
seemed formed to be sheltered and cherishedto love
and be loved; and this destiny appeared to be secured
to her by her devoted sister, who never counted any
exertion or sacrifice that procured an advantage or
pleasure for Lizzy. When Lizzy was about fourteen,
a relative of the family, who kept a first rate boarding
school in the city, offered to take her for two years,
and give her all the advantages of her school, for the
small consideration of fifty dollars per annum. Small
as it was, it amounted to a tithe of the parson's income.
It is well known, that, in certain parts of our
country
,
every thing (not always discreetly) is sacrificed to
the hobbyeducation. Still the prudent father, who
had already two sons at college, hesitateddid not
consent till Agnes ascertained that by keeping a little
school in the village she might obtain half the required
sum. Her father, brothers, and friends all
remonstrated
.
The toils of a school, in addition to the care
and labour of her father's family, was, they urged, too
much for herbut she laughed at them. `What was
labour to her if she could benefit Lizzydear Lizzy!'
All ended, as might be expected, in Lizzy going to
the grand boarding school. The parting was a great
and trying event in the family. It was soon followed
by a sadder. The father suddenly sickened and died
and nothing was left for his family hut his house and
well kept little garden. What now was to be done?
College and schools to be given up?No such thing.
In our country, if a youth is rich he ought to be
educated; if he is poor he
must
be. The education is
the capital whereby they are to live hereafter. It is
obtained in that mysterious but unfailing way`by
hook and by crook.'
The elder Grays remained in collegeAgnes
enlarged
her schoollearned lessons in mathematics and
Latin one day, and taught them the next; took a poor,
accomplished young lady from some broken down
family
in town into partnership, and received a few
young misses as boarders into her family. Thus, she
not only was able to pay `dear Lizzy's' bills regularly,
but to aid her younger brothers. Her energy and
success set all her other attractions in a strong light,
and she was admired and talked about, and became
quite the queen of the village.
I think it was about a year after her father's death,
that a Mr. Henry Orne, a native of the village, who
was engaged in a profitable business at the south,
returned
to pass some months at his early home. His
frequent visits to the parsonage, and his attentions, on
all occasions, to Agnes, soon became matter of very
agreeable speculation to the gossips of the village.
`What a fine match he would be for Agnes!such an
engaging, well-informed young man, and so well off!'
Agnes' heart was not steel; but though it had been
exposed to many a flame she had kindled, in had never
yet melted.
Pardon me, Mrs. Seton, for interrupting you
was Agnes pretty?
Pretty? The word did not exactly suit her. At
the time of which I am now speaking, she was at the
mature age of five and twenty; which is called the
perfection of womanhood. Prettiness is rather
appropriate
to the bud than the ripened fruit. Agnes, I
have been told, had a fine personsymmetrical
features
,
and so charming an expression that she was not
far from beautiful, in the eyes of strangers, and quite
a beauty to her friends and lovers. Whether it were
beauty, manners, mind, or heart, I know notone
and all probablybut Henry Orne soon became her
assiduous and professed admirer. Till now Agnes
had lived satisfied and happy with subordinate
affections
.
She had never seen any one that she thought
it possible she could love as well as she loved those
to whom nature had allied her. But now the sun
arose, and other lights became dimnot `that she
loved Csar less, but she loved Rome more.' Their
mutual faith was plighted, and both believed, as all
real lovers do, that the world never contained so
happy, so blessed a pair, as they were.
Lizzy's second year at school was nearly ended,
and one month after her return the marriage was to
be solemnised. In the mean time Agnes was full
of the cares of this world. The usual preparations
for the greatest occasion in a woman's life are quite
enough for any single pair of hands, but Agnes had
to complete her school term, and the possibility of
swerving from an engagement never occurred to her.
Lizzy arrived, as lovely a creature as she had
appeared in the dreams of her fond sister. In the
freshness
and untouched beauty of her young existence,
just freed from the trammels of school, her round
cheek glowing with health, and her heart overflowing
with happiness. `Here is my own dear Lizzy,' said
Agnes, as she presented her to Henry Orne, `and if
you do not love me for any thing else, you must for
giving you such a sister.'
Henry Orne looked at Lizzy and thought, and
said, `the duty would be a very easy one.' `For
the next month,' continued Agnes, `I shall be
incessantly
occupied, and you must entertain one another.
Henry has bought a nice little pony for me, Lizzy,
and he shall teach you to ride, and you shall go over
all his scrambling walks with himto Sky-cliff,
Roseglen
,
and Beech-covethe place he says nature made
for lovers; but my poor lover has had to accommodate
himself to my working day life and woo me in beaten
paths.'
The next month was the most joyous of Lizzy's
life; every day was a festival. To the perfection of
animal existence in the country, in the month of June,
was added the keen sense of all that physical nature
conveys to the susceptible mind.
Wherever she was, her sweet voice was heard
ringing in laughter, or swelling in music that seemed
the voice of irrepressible joythe spontaneous
breathing
of her soul. To the lover approaching his
marriage
day Time is apt to drag along with leaden foot,
but to Henry Orne he seemed rather to fly with
Mercury's wings at his heels; and when Agnes found
herself compelled by the accumulation of her affairs,
to defer her wedding for another month, he submitted
with a better grace than could have been expected.
Not many days of this second term had elapsed, when
Agnes, amidst all her cares, as watchful of Lizzy as a
mother of an only child, observed a change stealing
over her. Her stock of spirits seemed suddenly
expended
,
her colour fadedher motions were languid,
and each successive day she became more and more
dejected. `She wants rest,' said Agnes to Henry
Orne; `she has been unnaturally excited, and there is
now a reaction. She must remain quietly at home
for a time, on the sofa, in a darkened room, and you,
Henry, I am sure, will, for my sake, give up your
riding and walking for a few days, and stay within
doors, and play on your flute, and read to her.' Agnes'
suggestions were promptly obeyed, but without the
happy effect she anticipated. Lizzy, who had never
before had a cloud on her brow, seemed to have passed
under a total eclipse. She became each day more sad
and nervous. A tender word from Agnesa look,
even, would make her burst into tears.
`I am miserable, Henry,' said Agnes, `at this
unaccountable
change in Lizzythe doctor says she is
perfectly free from diseaseperhaps we have made
too sudden a transition from excessive exercise to none
at all. The evening is dry and fine, I wish you would
induce her to take a walk with you. She is distressed
at my anxiety, and I cannot propose any thing that
does not move her to tears.'
`It is very much the same with me,' replied
Henry
,
sighing deeply, but if you wish it I will ask her.'
He accordingly did soshe consented, and they went
out together.
Agnes retired to her own apartment, and there,
throwing herself upon her knees, she entreated her
Heavenly Father to withdraw this sudden infusion of
bitterness from her brimming cup of happiness. `Try
me in any other way,' she cried, in the intensity of
her feeling, and, for the first time in her life, forgetting
that every petition should be in the spirit of `Thy will
be done,' `try me in any other way, but show me the
means of restoring my sistermy child to health and
happiness!'
She returned again to her little parlour. Lizzy
had not come in, and she sat down on the sofa near an
open window, and resigned herself to musings, the
occupation
,
if occupation it may be called, of the idle, but
rarely, and never of late, of Agnes!
In a few moments Lizzy and Henry returned,
and came into the porch, adjoining the parlour.
They perceived the candles were not lighted, and
concluding Agnes was not there, they sat down in the
porch.'
`Oh, I am too wretched!' said Lizzy. Her voice
was low and broken, and she was evidently weeping.
`Is it possible,' thought Agnes, `that she will express
her feelings more freely to Henry than to me? I will
listen. If she knows any cause for her dejection, I
am sure I can remove it.'
`Why, my beloved Lizzy,' replied Orne, in a
scarcely audible voice, `will you be so wretched
why will you make me so, and for ever, when there
is a remedy?'
`Henry Orne!' she exclaimed, and there was
resolution and indignation in her voice. `If you
name that to me again, I will never, so help me
God, permit you to come into my presence without
witnesses. No, there is no remedy, but in death.
Would that it had come before you told me you
loved mebefore my lips confessed my sinful love
for youno, nothe secret shall be buried in my
grave.'
`Oh, Lizzy, you are madAgnes does not, cannot
love as we do. Why sacrifice two to one? Let me,
before it is too late, tell her the whole, and cast
myself
on her generosity.'
`Never, neverI now wish, when I am in her
presence, that the earth at her feet would swallow me
up; and how can you, for a moment, think I will ask
to be made happythat I could be made happy, at her
expense? No, I am willing to expiate with my life,
my baseness to herthat I shall soon do so is my
only comfortand you will soon forget memen can
forget
, they say'
`Neveron my knees, I swear never!'
`Stop, for mercy's sake, stop. You must not
speak another such word to meI will not hear it.'
She rose to enter the house. Agnes slipped through
a private passage to her own apartment.
She heard Lizzy ascending the stairs. She heard
Henry call after her, `One word, Lizzyfor mercy's
sake, one
last
word.' But Lizzy did not turn. Agnes
heard her feebly drag herself into the little
dressing-room
adjoining their apartment, and after, there was
no sound but the poor girl's suppressed, but still
audible
sobs.
None but He who created the elements that
compose
the human heart, and who can penetrate its
mysterious depths, can know which of the sisters was
most wretched at that moment. To Agnes who had
loved deeply, confidingly without a shadow of fear
or distrust, the reverse was total. To Lizzy who had
enjoyed for a moment the bewildering fervours of a
young love, only to feel its misery, that misery was
embittered by a sense of wrong done to her sister.
And yet it had not been a willing, but an involuntary
and resisted, and most heartily repented wrong. She
had recklessly rushed down a steep to a fearful
precipice
,
and now felt that all access and passage to
return was shut against her. Agnes without having
had one dim fearwithout any preparation, saw an
abyss yawning at their feetan abyss only to be closed
by her self-immolation.
She remained alone for many hoursshe
resolved
her
spirit falteredshe re-resolved. She
thought of all Lizzy had been to her, and of all she had
been to Lizzy, and she wept as if her heart would
break. She remembered the prayer that her
impatient
spirit had sent forth that evening. She prayed
again, and a holy calm, never again to be disturbed,
took possession of her soul.
There is a power in goodness, pure self-renouncing
goodness, that cannot be `overcome, but overcometh
all things.'
Lizzy waited till all was quiet in her sister's
room. She heard her get into bed, and then stole
softly to her. Agnes, as she had done from Lizzy's
infancy, opened her arms to receive her, and Lizzy
pillowed her aching head on Agnes' bosom, softly
breathing,`My sistermother!'
`My own Lizzy
my child
,' answered Agnes.
There was no tell-tale faltering of the voice. She felt
a tear trickle from Lizzy's cold cheek on to her bosom,
and not very long after both sisters were in a sleep
that mortals might envy, and angels smile on.
The rest you will anticipate, my dear Anne. The
disclosure to the lovers of her discovery, was made by
Agnes in the right way, and at the right time. Every
thing was done as it should be by this most admirable
woman. She seemed, indeed, to feel as a guardian
angel might, who, by some remission of his vigilance,
had suffered the frail mortal in his care to be beguiled
into evil. She never, by word, or even look,
reproached
Lizzy. She shielded her, as far as possible,
from self-reproach, nor do I believe she ever felt more
unmixed tenderness and love for her, than when, at
the end of a few months, she saw her married to Henry
Orne.
My story has yet a sad supplement. Madame
Cotin, I believe it is, advises a story teller to close the
tale when he comes to a happy day; for, she says, it
is not probable another will succeed it. Poor Lizzy
had experience of this sad mutability of human life.
Hers was checquered with many sorrows.
Lapses from virtue at eight and twenty, and at
sixteen
,
afford very different indications of the character;
you cannot expect much from a man, who, at eight
and twenty, acted the part of Henry Orne. He was
unfaithful in engagements with persons less merciful
than Agnes Gray. He became inconstant in his
pursuits
self-indulgent,
and idle, and finally intemperate,
in his habits. His wifeas wives willloved him to
the end.
Agnes retained her school, which had become in
her hands a profitable establishment. There she
laboured
,
year after year, with a courageous heart, and
serene countenance, and devoted the fruit of all her
toils to Lizzy, and to the education of her children.
I am telling no fiction, and I see you believe me,
for the tears are trembling in your eyesdo not
repress
them, but permit them to embalm the memory of
an
old maid
.
L
THE CHIVALRIC SAILOR.
[6]
[6]
The original title of this story was Modern Chivalry. After
its publication, the author discovered she had unwarily adopted a title
already appropriated.
But when the hour of trouble comes to the mind or the body
and when the hour of death comes, that comes to high and lowOh,
my leddy, then it is'na what we hae dune for oursells, but what we
hae dune for others, that we think on maist pleasantly.
Heart of Midlothian
.
The
assertion that a tale is founded on fact, is a
pious fraud of story tellers, too stale to impose on any
but the very young, or very credulous. We hope,
therefore, not to be suspected of resorting to an
expedient
that would expose our poverty without relieving
it, when we declare that the leading incidents of the
following tale are truethat they form, in that district
of country where some of the circumstances transpired,
a favourite and well authenticated traditionand that
our hero boasts with well-earned self-complacency,
that there is no name better known than his from
Cape May to the Head of Elk. That name,
however
honourable as it is, must be suppressed, and we
here honestly beg the possessor's pardon for
compelling
him for the first time in his life, to figure under
false colours.
In the year 1768, an American vessel lying in the
Thames and bound to Oxford, a small sea-port on the
eastern shore of Maryland, was hailed by a boat
containing
a youth, who, on presenting himself to the
captain, stated that he had a fancy for a sailor's life,
and offered his services for two years, on the simple
condition of kind treatment. The captain, though
himself a coarse illiterate man, perceived in the air
and language of the lad indications of good breeding,
and deeming him some disobedient child, or possibly
a runaway apprentice, declined receiving him. But
William Herrion, as he called himself, was so earnest
in his solicitations, and engaging in his manners, and
the captain, withal, in such pressing need of a
cabin-boy
,
that he waved his scruples, quieted his conscience
with the old opiate that it was best not to be more nice
than wise, and without inquiring too curiously into
the boy's right of self-disposal, drew up some
indentures
,
by which he entitled himself to two years'
service.
The boy was observed for the first day to wear a
troubled countenance. His eye glanced around with
incessant restlessness, as if in eager search of some
expected
object. While the ship glided down the
Thames, he gazed on the shore as if he looked for
some signal on which his life depended, and when she
passed Gravesend, the last point of embarcation, he
wept convulsively. The captain believed him to be
disturbed with remorse of conscience; the sailors, that
these heart-breakings were lingerings for his native
land, and all hinted their rude consolations. Soothed
by their friendly efforts, or by his own reflections, or
perhaps following the current of youth that naturally
flows to happiness, William soon became tranquil, and
sometimes even gay. He kept, as the sailors said, on
the fair weather side of the captain, a testy, self-willed
old man, who loved but three things in the world
his song, his glass, and his own way.
All that has been fabled of the power of music over
stones and brutes, was surpassed by the effect of the
lad's melting voice on the icy heart of the captain,
whom forty years of absolute power had rendered as
despotic as a Turkish Pacha. When their old
commander
blew his stiffest gale, as the sailors were wont
to term his blustering passions. Will could, they said,
sing him into a calm. Will of course became a doting
piece to the whole ship's company. They said he
was a trim built lad, too neat and delicate a piece of
workmanship for the stormy sea. They laughed at
his slender fingers, fitter to manage threads than ropes,
passed many jokes upon his soft blue eyes and fair
round cheeks, and in their rough language expressed
Sir Toby's prayer, that Jupiter in his next
commodity
of hair, would send the boy a beard. In the
main Will bore their jokes without flinching, and
returned them with even measure, but sometimes
when they verged to rudeness, his rising blush or a
tear stealing from his downcast eye, expressed an
instinctive
and unsullied modesty, whose appeal touched
the best feelings of these coarse men.
The ship made a prosperous voyage, and in due
time arrived off the American coast. It is a common
custom with sailors to greet the first sight of land with
a sacrifice to Bacchus. The natural and legalized
revel was as extravagant on this, as it usually is on
similar occasions. The captain with unwonted good
humour, dealt out the liquor most liberally to the crew,
and bade William sing them his best songs. Will
obeyed, and song after song, and glass after glass
carried
them, as they said, far above high water mark.
Their language and manners became intolerable to
William, and he endeavoured to steal away with the
intention of hiding himself in the cabin, till the revel
was over. One of the sailors suspecting his design,
caught him rudely and swore he would detain him in
his arms. William struggled, freed himself, and darted
down the companion way, the men following and
shouting.
The captain stood at the entrance of the cabin door.
William sunk down at his feet terrified and exhausted,
and screaming protect meoh! for the love of
heaven
,
protect me.
The captain demanded the occasion of the uproar,
and ordered the men to stand back. They, however,
stimulated to reckless courage, and in sight of land
and independence, no longer fearing his authority,
swore that they would not be balked of their frolic.
Poor Will, already feeling their hands upon him,
clung in terror to the captain, and one fear
overcoming
another, confessed that his masculine dress
was a disguise, and wringing his hands with shame
and anguish, supplicated protection as a helpless girl.
The sailors touched with remorse and pity,
retreated
;
but the brutal captain spurned the trembling
supplicant with his foot, swearing a round oath that
it was the first time he had been imposed on, and it
should be the last. Unfortunately the old man,
priding
himself on his sagacity, was as confident of his
own infallibility as the most devoted Catholic is of
the Pope's. This was his last voyage, and after
playing
Sir Oracle, for forty yearsto have been palpably
deceivedincontrovertibly outwitted by a girl of
fifteen
,
was a mortification that his vanity could not
brook. He swore he would have his revenge, and
most strictly did he perform his vow. He possessed
a plantation in the vicinity of Oxford; thither he
conveyed
the unhappy girl, and degraded her to the rank
of a common servant, among the negro slaves in his
kitchen.
The captain's wrath was magnified, by the
stranger's
persisting in refusing to disclose the motive of
her deception, to reveal her family, or even to tell her
name. Her new acquaintance were at a loss what to
call her, till the captain's daughter, who had been
on a visit to Philadelphia, and seen the Winter's Tale
performed there, bestowed on her the pretty appellative
of Hermione's lost child, Perdita.
The captain, a common case, was the severest
sufferer
by his own passions. His wife complained that
his venture, as she provokingly styled poor Perdita,
L 2
was a useless burden on her householda fine lady
born and bred, and like feathers, and flowers, and all
French goods, pretty to look at, but fit for no use in the
world. The captain's daughters, partly instigated by
compassion, and partly by the striking contrast between
the delicate graces of the stranger and their own buxom
beauty, incessantly teased their father to send her
back to her own country; and neighbours and
acquaintances
were forever letting fall some observation on
the beauty of the girl, or some allusion to her story,
that was as a spark of fire to the captain's gunpowder
temper.
Weeks and months rolled heavily on without a
dawn of hope to poor Perdita. She was too young
and inexperienced herself, to contrive any mode of
relief, and no one was likely to undertake voluntarily
the difficult enterprise of rescuing her from her
thraldom
.
Her condition was thus forlorn, when her story
came to the ears of Frank Stuart, a gallant young
sailor on board the Hazard, a vessel lying in the stream
off Oxford, and on the eve of sailing for Cowes in the
Isle of Wight. Frank stood deservedly high in the
confidence of his commander, and on Sunday, the day
preceding that appointed for the departure of the ship,
he obtained leave to go on shore. His youthful
imagination
was excited by the story of the oppressed
stranger, and he strolled along the beach in the
direction
of her master's plantation, in the hope of
gratifying
his curiosity by a glimpse of her. As he
approached
the house, he perceived that the front blinds
were closed, and inferring thence that the family were
absent, he ventured within the bounds of the plantation,
and saw at no great distance from him a young female
sitting on a bench beneath a tree. She leaned her head
against its trunk, with an air of dejectedness and
abstraction
,
that encouraged the young man to hope he
had already attained his object. As he approached
nearer, the girl started from her musings, and would
have retreated to the house, but suddenly inspired by
her beauty and youth with a resolution to devote
himself
to her service, he besought her to stop for one
instant and listen to him. She turned and gazed at
him as if she would have perused his heart.
Frankness
and truth were written on his face by the finger
of heaven. She could not fear any impertinence from
him, and farther assured by his respectful manner, when
he added, I have something particular to say to you
but we must luff and bear away, for we are in too
plain sight of the look out there, and he pointed to
the houseshe smiled and followed him to a more
secluded
part of the grounds. As soon as he was sure
of being beyond observation, Do you wish, he
asked with professional directness, to return to old
England?
She could not speak, but she clasped her hands,
and the tears gushed like an open fountain from her
eyesyou need not say any moreyou need not
say any more, he exclaimed, for he felt every tear to
be a word spoken to his heartIf you will trust
me, he continued, I swear, and so God help me as
I speak the truth, I will treat you as if you were my
sister. Our ship sails to-morrow morning at day light,
make a tight bundle of your rigging, and meet me at
twelve o'clock to-night at the gate of the plantation.
Will you trust me?
Heaven has sent you to me, replied the poor girl,
her face brightening with hope, and I will trust
you.
They then separatedPerdita to make her few
preparations
,
and Frank to contrive the means of
executing
his romantic enterprize.
Precisely at the appointed hour the parties met at
the place of rendezvous. Perdita was better furnished
for her voyage than could have been anticipated, from
the durance she had suffered. A short notice and a
scant wardrobe, were never known to oppose an
obstacle
to a heroine's compassing sea and land; but as
we have dispensed with the facilities of fiction, we
are bound to account for Perdita's being in
possession
of the necessaries of life, and it is due to the
captain's daughter to state, that her feminine sympa
thy had moved her from time to time to grant
generous
supplies to Perdita, which our heroine
acknowledged
on going away, by a letter enclosing a valuable
ring.
A few whispered sentences of caution, assurance,
and gratitude, were reciprocated by Frank and
Perdita
,
as they bent their hasty steps to the
landing-place
where he had left his boat; and when he had
handed her into it, and pushed from the shore on to
his own element, he felt the value of the trust which
this beautiful young creature had reposed in him.
Never in the days of knightly deeds was there a
sentiment
of purer chivalry, than that which inspired
the determined resolution and romantic devotion of
the young sailor. He was scarcely twenty, the age
of fearless project, and self-confidence. How soon
is the one checked by disappointmentsthe other
humbled by experience of the infirmity of human
virtue!
Stuart had not confided his designs to any of his
shipmates. He was therefore obliged warily to
approach
the ship, and to get on board with the least
possible noise. He had just time to secrete Perdita
amidst bales of tobacco, in the darkest place in the
hold of the vessel, when a call of all hands on deck,
summoned him to duty. He was foremost at his
post, and all was stir and bustle to get the vessel
under way. The sails were hoistedthe anchor
weighed, and all in readiness, when a signal was heard
from the shore, and presently a boat filled with men
was seen approaching. The men proved to be
Perdita's
master, with a sheriff, and his attendants. They
produced a warrant empowering them to search the
vessel. The old captain affirmed that the girl had
been seen on the preceding day, talking with a young
spark, who was known to have come on shore from
the Hazard. In his fury he foamed at the mouth,
swore he would have the runaway dead or alive, and
that her aider and abettor should be given over to
condign
punishment. The master of the Hazard
declared
,
that if any of his men were found guilty, he would
resign them to the dealings of land law, and to prove
that if there were a plot, he was quite innocent, he
not only freely abandoned his vessel to the search,
but himself was most diligent in the inquest. The
men were called up, confronted and examined; not
one appeared more cool and unconcerned than Frank
Stuart, and after every inquiry, after ransacking, as they
believed, every possible place of concealment, the
pursuers
were compelled to withdraw, baffled and
disappointed
.
The vessel proceeded on her voyage.Frank
requested
the captain's permission to swing a hammock
alongside his birth, on the pretence that the birth was
rendered damp and unwholesome by a leak in the deck
above it. This reasonable petition was of course
granted
,
and when night had closed watchful eyes, and
dropped her friendly veil, so essential to the
clandestine
enterprises of the most ingenious, Frank
rescued
Perdita from a position, in which she had suffered
not only the inconveniences, but the terrors of an
African slave; and wrapping her in his own
dreadnought
,
and drawing his watchcap over her bright
luxuriant hair, he conducted her past the open door
of the captain's state-room, and past his sleeping
companions
,
to his own birth; then whispering to her,
that she was as safe as a ship in harbour, he gave
her some bread and a glass of wine, for which he had
bartered his allowance of spirits, and laid himself down
in his own hammock, to the companionship of such
thoughts as are ministering angels about the pillow of
the virtuous.
The following day a storm arosea storm still
remembered
,
as the most terrible and disastrous that
ever occurred in Chesapeake Bay. There were
several
passengers of consequence on board the Hazard,
among others two deacons who were going to the
mother country to receive ordersfor then, we of the
colonies, who have since taken all rights into our
own hands, dared not exercise the rights God had
given us, without the assent of the Lords Bishops.
Night came on, the storm increased, and then, when
the ship was in extremity, when death howled in
every blast, when the timid shrieked and the brave
stood stillthen was the unwearied activity, the
exhaustless
invention, and the unconquerable resolution
of Frank Stuart, the last human support and help of
the unhappy crew. The master of the Hazard was
advanced in life, and unnerved by the usual feebleness
and timidity of age. He had but just enough presence
of mind left, to estimate the masterly conduct of
young Stuart, and he abandoned the command of
the vessel to him, and retired to what is too often
only a last resourceto prayers with the
churchmen
.
Once or twice Stuart disappeared from the deck,
ran to whisper a word of encouragement to his
trembling
charge, and then returned with renewed vigour
to his duty. Owing, under Providence, to his
exertions
,
the Hazard rode out a storm which filled the
seaman's annals with many a tale of terror. Gratitude
is too apt to rest in second causes, in the visible
means of deliverance, and perhaps an undue portion
was now felt towards the intrepid youth. The
passengers
lavished their favours on himthey supplied
his meals with the most delicate wines and fruits, and
the choicest viands from their own stores; he, with
the superstition characteristic of his profession, firmly
believed that heaven had sent the storm to unlock
their hearts to him, and thus afford him the means of
furnishing Perdita with dainties suited to her delicate
appetite so that she fared, as he afterwards boasted,
like the daughter of a king in her father's palace.
Stuart was kept in a state of perpetual alarm by the
mate of the vessel. He knew that this fellow, one of
those imbeciles that bend like a reed before a strong
blast, had been hostile to him ever since the storm,
when the accidental superiority of his station had been
compelled to bow to Frank's superior genius. He
was aware that the mate had, by malicious insinuations,
estranged the captain from him, and he was but too
certain that he should have nothing to hope, if his
secret were discovered by this base man. Perhaps
this apprehension gave him an air of unwonted
constraint
in the presence of his enemy; certain it is,
the mate's eye often rested on him with an
expression
of eager watchfulness and suspicion, and Stuart,
perceiving it, would contract his brow and compress
his lips, in a way that betrayed how hard he strove
with his rising passion. The difficulty of concealment
was daily increasing, as one after another of his
messmates
,
either from some inevitable accident, or from
a communication becoming necessary on his part,
obtained
possession of his secret. But his ascendency
over them was complete, and by threats or
persuasions
,
he induced them all to promise inviolable
secresy
,
There is an authority in a determined spirit,
to which men naturally do homage. It is heaven's
own charter of a power, to which none can refuse
submission
.
Frank never permitted his comrades to approach
Perdita, or to speak a word to her; but in the depths
of the night, when the mate's and the old captain's
senses were locked in sleep, he would bring her forth
to breathe the fresh air. Seated on the gunwale, she
would bestow on him the only reward in her gift
the treasures of her sweet voice; and Frank said the
winds sat still in the sails to listen. There were times
when not a human sound was heard in the ship,
when these two beings, borne gently on by the
tides in mid ocean, felt as if they were alone in the
universe.
It was at such times that Frank felt an
irrepressible
curiosity to know something more of the
mysterious
history of Perdita, whose destiny heaven, he
believed, had committed to his honour; and once he
ventured to introduce the topic nearest his heart, by
saying, you bade me call you Perdita, but I do not
like the name; it puts me too much in mind of those
rodomontade novels that turn the girls' heads and set
them a sailing, as it were, without chart or compass,
in quest of unknown worldsHe hesitated; it was
evident he had betaken himself to a figure, to avoid
an explicit declaration of his wishesafter a
moment's
pause he addedit suits me best to be
plain-spokenit is not the name that I object to so
much, butbut hang itI think you know Frank
Stuart now, well enough to trust him with your real
name.
The unhappy girl cast down her eyes, and said that
Perdita suited her better than any other name.
Then you will not trust me?
Say not so, my noble, generous friend, she
exclaimed
trust
you!have I not trusted you!you
know that I would trust you with any thing that was
my ownbut my namemy father's name, I have
forfeited by my folly.
Oh nothat you shall not saya brave ship is
not run down with a light breeze, and a single folly
of a young girl cannot sink a good namea folly!
he continued, thus indirectly pushing his inquiries,
if it is a folly, it's a common onethere's many a
stouter heart than your's, that's tried to face a gale of
love, and been obliged to bear about and scud before
the wind.
Who told you?how did you discover?
demanded
Perdita, in a hurried, alarmed manner.
Frank's generous temper disdained to surprise the
unwary girl into confidence, and he immediately
surrendered
the advantage he had gained. Nobody has
told me, he said, I have discovered nothingI
only guessed, as the yankees say; now wipe away
your tearsthe sea wants no more salt water, and
believe
me, Frank Stuart has not such a woman's spirit
in him, that he cannot rest content without knowing a
secret.
In spite of Frank's manly resolution, he did
afterwards
repeatedly intimate the longings of his curiosity,
but they were always met with such unaffected distress
on the part of Perdita, that he said he had not the heart
to press them.
As the termination of the voyage approached, Stuart
became more intensely anxious lest his secret should be
discovered. The mildest consequence would be, that
he should forfeit his wages. That he cared not for
like Goldsmith's poor soldier, he could lie on a bare
board, and thank God he was so well off. While
he had youth and health, he said, and there was
a ship afloat on the wide sea, he was provided for.
But his companions who had been true to him might
forfeit their pay; for, by their fidelity to him, they had
in some measure become his accessories. But he
found consolation even under this apprehension;
the honest lads, he said, would soon make a
full purse empty, but the memory of a good action
was a treasure gold could not buya treasure that
would stick by them forevera treasure for the
port of heaven. There was, however, one
apprehended
evil, for which his philosophy offered no
antidote.
He was sure the captain would deem it his duty or
M
make it his will, (even Frank's slight knowledge of
human nature told him that will and duty were too
often convertible terms,) to return the fugitive to her
self-styled master in Maryland. Nothing could
exceed
the vigilance with which he watched every
movement
and turn that threatened a detection, or the
ingenuity
with which he evaded every circumstance
that tended to itbut alas! the race is not always to
the swift, nor the battle to the strong.
One night when it was blowing a gale, a particular
rope was wanted, which the mate remembered to have
stowed away in the steerage. Frank eagerly offered
to search for it, but the mate was certain that no one
but himself could find it, and taking a lantern he went
in quest of it. Frank followed him with fear and
trembling. He has since been in many a desperate
sea-fight, but he declares he never felt so much like a
coward as at that moment. The mate's irritable
humour had been somewhat stirred by Frank's
persisting
in his offer to go for the rope, and when he
turned and saw him at his heels, he asked him angrily,
what he was dogging him for? The ship rolls so
heavily, replied Frank, in a subdued tone, that I
thought you might want me to hold the lantern for
you. Frank's unwonted meekness conciliated the
mate, and though he rejoined, I think I have been
used to the rolling of a ship a little longer than you,
young man, he spoke good-naturedly, and Frank
ventured to proceed.
Most fortunately, as Frank thought, the mate
directed
his steps to the side of the ship opposite Perdita,
but making a little circuit in his return, he passed
between Frank's hammock and Perdita's birth. At
this moment the poor lad's heart, as he afterwards
averred, stopped beating. The ship rolled on that
side, and the mate catching hold of the birth to save
himself from falling, exclaimed, What lazy devil is
here, when every hand is wanted on deck; and
raising his lantern to identify the supposed delinquent
sailor, he discovered the beautiful girl. For a moment
he was dumb with amazement, but soon recalling the
search at Oxford, the whole truth flashed upon him:
he turned to Frank, and shaking his fist in his face,
Ah, this is you, Stuart! he said, and enforced his
gesture with a horrible oath.
Yes, retorted Frank, now standing boldly forth,
it is me, thank Godand then drawing a curtain
that he had arranged before Perdita's birth, he bade
her fear nothing.
Oh, Frank, she exclaimed, I cannot fear where
you are. This involuntary expression of confidence
went to her protector's heart. There is no man so dead
to sentiment, as not to be touched by the trust of
woman, especially if she be young and beautiful.
Frank was at the age when sentiment is absolute, and
he was resolved to secure his treasure at every hazard.
Perdita's declaration, while it stimulated his zeal,
awakened the mean jealousies of the mate.
And so, my pretty miss, he said, you fear
nothing
where this fellow isI can tell you, for all that
he may boast, and you may believe, he is neither
master nor mate yet, and please the Lord I'll prove
as much to him this very night.
And how will you prove it? asked Stuart, in a
voice which, though as calm as he could make it,
resembled
the low growl of a bull dog before he springs
on his victim.
I'll prove it, my lad, by telling the whole story
of your smuggled goods to the captain. A pretty
piece of work this, to be carried on under the nose of
your officers. It's no better than a mutiny, for I'll
warrant it the whole ship's crew are leagued with
you.
Stuart reined in his passions, and condescended to
expostulate. He represented to the mate that he could
gain nothing by giving information to the captain.
He described, with his simple eloquence, the
oppression
the poor girl had already suffered; the cruelty of
disappointing her present hopes, just as they were on
the point of being realized, for the ship was not more
than twenty-four hours' sail from Cowes; he appealed
to his compassion, his generosity, his manliness, but
in vain, he found no accessible point. The mean pride
of having discovered the secret, and the pleasure of
humbling Stuart, mastered every good feeling of the
mate, if indeed he possessed any, and he turned away,
saying, with a sort of chuckling exultation, that he
should go and do his duty.
Stop, cried Frank, grasping his arm with a gripe
that threatened to crush it. Stop, and hear me; I
swear by Him that made me, if you dare so much as
to hint by word, look or movement, the secret you
have discovered here, you shall not cumber the earth
another daydaysaid Ino not an hourI'll send
you to the devil as swift as a canon ball ever went to
the markLook, he continued, tearing away the
curtain he had just drawn before Perditacould any
thing short of the malice of Satan himself contrive to
harm such helpless innocence as thatdo you hear
mehe added, in a voice that outroared the storm
in God's name look at me, and see I am in
earnest
.
The mate had no doubt to satisfy, he trembled like
an aspen leafin vain he essayed to raise his eyes; the
passion that glared in Frank's face, and dilated his
whole figure, affected the trembling wretch like a
stroke of the sun. He reeled like a drunken man.
His abject fear changed Stuart's wrath to contempt,
and giving him an impulse that sent him quite out
of the door, he returned to soothe Perdita with the
assurance that they had nothing to fear from the
cowardly dog. She was confounded with terror,
but much more frightened by the vehemence of
Stuart's
passion than by the threats of the mate. She had
always seen her protector move like an unobstructed
stream along its course, in calm and silent power.
Now he was the torrent, that no human force could
oppose or direct.
She saw before her calamities far worse than any
she had endured. She believed that the mate, as soon
as he was recovered from his paroxysm of terror, would
communicate his discovery. She apprehended the
most fatal issue from Frank's threats and determined
resolution, and the possibility that his generous zeal
for her might involve him in crime, was intolerable to
her. Such thoughts do not become less terrible by
solitary meditationin the solemnity of night and
amidst the howlings of a storm. Every blast spoke
reproach and warning to Perdita, and tortured by
those harpies remorse and fear, she took a sudden
resolution
to reveal herself to the captain, feeling at the
moment that if she warded off evil from her protector,
she could patiently abide the worst consequences to
herself. She sprang from her birth as if afraid of
being checked by a second thought, and rushed from
the steerage to the cabin. All was perfect stillness
therethe passengers had retired to their beds. The
captain was sitting by the table, he had been reading,
but his book had fallen to the floor, his head had sunk
on his breast, and he was in a profound sleep. The
light shone full on his weather-beaten faceon large
uncouth featureson lines deepened to furrowsand
muscles stiffened by time. Never was there an aspect
more discouraging to one who needed mercy, and
poor Perdita stood trembling before him and close to
him, and dared not, could not speak. She heard a
footstep-approaching, still her tongue was glued to the
roof of her mouth. Then she heard her name
pronounced
in a low whisper at the cabin door, and
turning
,
she saw Stuart there beckoning most earnestly to
her. She shook her head, signed to him to withdraw,
and laid her hand on the captain's shoulder. There
M 2
was but one way to thwart her intentions, and Frank's
was not a hesitating spirit, he sprang forward, caught
her in his arms, and before the old man had rubbed
his eyes fairly open, Perdita was again safe in the
steerage.
Stuart's threats produced the intended effect on the
mate; he was completely intimidated. He scarcely
ventured out of Frank's sight lest he should incur his
dangerous suspicions, and the next day the vessel,
accelerated
by the gale of the preceding evening, arrived
at Cowes. The captain and mate immediately landed,
and Stuart, no longer embarrassed by their presence,
was able to take the necessary measures for Perdita.
She assured him that if once conveyed to the main
land, to Portsmonth or Southampton, she could herself
take the coach for London, and there, she said
happiness
or misery awaited her which her noble protector
could neither promote or avert.
A wherry was procured. Before Perdita was
transferred
to it, she took leave of all the sailors, shook
hands with each of them, and expressed to them,
individually
,
her gratitude and good wishes. Her words
conveyed nothing but a sense of obligation, but there
was something of condescension in her manner, and
much of the grace of high station that contrasted
strikingly
with the abased, fearful, and shrinking air of
the girl who had, till then, only been seen gliding like
a spectre along the deck, attended by Stuart, and
veiled by the shadows of night. As the wherry parted
from the ship, she bowed her head and waved her
handkerchief to Frank's shipmates, and they returned
her salutation with three loud cheers.
Stuart attended her to an inn at Portsmouth,
engaged
for her a seat in the London coach, and then
followed her to a private apartment which he had
secured, to bid her farewell.
Perdita, from the moment she had felt her
emancipation
from a degrading condition, and the joy of
setting her foot again on her native land, had
manifested
,
perhaps, an undue elation of spirits, an elation
so opposite to Frank's feelings, that to him it was a
grating discord; but when she saw him for the last
time, every other emotion gave place to unfeigned
sorrow and inexpressible gratitude.
Stuart laid a purse on the table beside her. My
shipmates, he said, receive their wages to-morrow,
so they have been right glad to make their pockets
clear of the little trash that was in them, which
may be of service to you, though it is of no use to
them.
Oh Frank! she exclaimed, if I should ever
have any thing in my giftif I could but reward you
for all you have done for me!
All the blood in Frank's heart rushed to his face,
and he said in a voice almost inarticulate with
offended
pride, there are services that money cannot
buy, and thank God, there are feelings in a poor man's
breast worth more than all the gold in the king's
coffers
.
What have I said, exclaimed Perdita, I would
rather dierather return to the depth of misery
from which you rescued meyes, ten times told, than
to speak one word that should offend youyou to
whom I owe every thingmy lifeand more than
life. I did not sayI did not think, that money could
reward you.
Do not speak that word again, said Frank, half
ashamed of his pride, and half glorifying in it.
Reward
!
I want none but your safety and the blessed
memory of having done my duty. Moneyho! I care
no more for it, than for the dust I tread upon.
I know itI am sure of it, cried Perdita, humbled
for the moment by a sense of an elevation of soul in
Frank, that exalted him far above any accidents of birth
or education. Frank, you are rich in every thing
that is good and nobleand what am I, to talk of
reward
poorpoor
in every thing but gratitude to you,
FrankI am not poor in thatyou must not then
despise me, and you will not forget meand you will
keep this ring for my sake.
Frank took the ring, and the lily hand she
extended
to himhis tears fell fast upon ithe struggled
for a moment with his feelings, then dashed away his
tears, and half-articulating God bless you! he
hurried
out of the apartment. Thus separating himself
from the beautiful young creature, for whom he had
performed a most difficult service with religious
fidelity
;
and of whose name even, he was forever to
remain
in ignorance.
The enterprising talent of Stuart ensured its
appropriate
reward. In one year from the memorable
voyage
above related, he commanded a vessel; and on
the breaking out of the revolutionary war, he devoted
himself to his country's cause, with the fervent zeal
which characterised and consecrated that causewhich
made the common interest a matter of feelinga
family affair to each individual.
Stuart commanded an armed merchantman, and
disputes
with the noted Paul Jones the honour of having
first struck down the British flag. However this may
be, he was distinguished for his skill and intrepidity
and above all, (and this distinction endures when
the most brilliant achievements have become
insignificant
,)
for his humanity to those whom the fortune
of war cast in his power.
While on a cruise off the West Indies, Stuart
intercepted
an enemy's ship bound to Antigua. His
adversary
was far superior to him in men and guns, but
as it did not comport with Stuart's bold spirit to make
any very nice calculations of an enemy's superiority,
he prepared without hesitation for action. The
contest
was a very severe one, and the victory long
doubtful
;
but at last the British captain struck his colours.
Though we certainly are disposed to render all honour
to the skill of our hero, yet we dare not claim for him
the whole merit of his success, but rather solve the
mystery of victory at such odds, by quoting the
expression
of a patriotic English boy, who said on a
similar occasionAh, but the Americans would not
have beaten, if the Lord had not been on their side.
After the fight the English commander requested
an interview with captain Stuart; he informed him
that the wife and mother of the governor of Antigua
were on board his vessel, and that they were almost
distracted with terror; he entreated therefore that
they might be received with the humanity which
their sex demanded, and the deference always due to
high station. Stuart replied, that as to high station,
he held that all God's creatures, who feared their
Creator and did their duty, were on a dead leveland
as to the duties of humanity, he trusted no American
captain need go further than his own heart for
instructions
how to perform them. The British captain,
ignorant of the spirit of the times, and arguing nothing
favourable from Stuart's republican reply, returned
with a heavy heart to the ladies to conduct them on
board the captor's ship. The elder lady, the mother,
was a woman of rank, with all the pride and prejudice
of high birth. The Americans she deemed all of that
then
much despised orderthe common people;
rebels
and robbers were the best names she bestowed on
them, and in the honesty of her ignorance she sincerely
believed that she had fallen into the hands of pirates.
The younger lady, though deeply affected by their
disastrous situation, endeavoured to calm her mother's
apprehensions, and assured her that she had heard
there were men of distinguished humanity among the
American sailors. The old lady shook her head
incredulously
.
Oh heaven help us, she groaned, what
can we expect from such horrid fellows, when they
know they have lady Strangford and the right
honourable
Mrs. Liston in their powerand your beauty,
Selina! your beauty, child! it is a fatal treasure to fall
among thieves withdepend on'tarrange your veil
so that it will hang in thick folds over your faceI
will draw my hood close. The precauton on her
part seemed quite superfluous, but the young lady's
impervious
veil concealed a treasure of beauty which
time had perfected but not impaired.
The servants were ordered to deliver the ladies'
baggage to the American captain, with a request that
some necessaries might be reserved. Stuart answered
that he interfered with no private property, and that
all the baggage of the ladies remained at their
disposal
.
Lady Strangford was somewhat reassured by this
generosity, and attended by her captain and followed
by her daughter and servants, she proceeded to
Stuart's
ship. Stuart advanced to meet them and offered
her his handshe proudly declined it and passed
silently on. A gust of wind blew back her hood
Faith! exclaimed one of the sailors who observed
the scrupulosity with which she replaced it, the old
lady had best show her face, for I'm sure we'll all give
a good berth to such an iron-bound coast as that.
But as the same breeze blew aside the young lady's
veil, there was a general murmur of admiration. She
had at the moment graciously accepted the tender of
Stuart's hand, in the hope of counteracting the
impression
of her mother's rudeness, and when her veil was
removed he had a full view of her face; conscious that
many were gazing on her, she blushed deeply, and
hastily readjusted it without raising her eyes. Stuart
dropped her handsmothered an exclamation, and
retreated a few paces, leaving her to follow her mother
alone.
One of his officers observing his emotion, said,
How is this, captain? yot don't wink at a broadside,
and yet you start at one flash from a lady's bright
face.
I got a scratch on my right arm in the
engagement
,
returned Stuart, evading the raillery, and I
felt a devil of a twinge just then. It was not a trifle
that made honest Stuart thus falter in a double
sense.
He then retired to his state-room, and wrote the
following note, which he directed to be delivered to
the young lady. Captain Stuart's compliments to
the ladies under his protectionhe incloses a ring, once
bestowed on him in acknowledgment of honourable
conduct, as a pledge to them that the hand that has
worn such a badge shall never be sullied by a bad
deed. Captain Stuart will proceed immediately to
Antigua, conveying the ladies with the least possible
delay to their destined port. Such a communication
to prisoners of war, might naturally excite emotion in
a generous bosom, but it did not account for the
excess
of it manifested by the young lady. She became
pale and faint, and when her mother, alarmed at such
a demonstration of feeling, took up the note, she caught
it from her, and then, after a second thought,
relinquished
it.
I see nothing in this, Selina, said the old lady,
after perusing and reperusing it, to throw you into
such a flurry, but you are young, and are thinking
no doubt of getting home to your husband and
children
;
young people's feelings, are, like soft wax, easily
melted.
There is a warmth in some kindness, rejoined
the daughter earnestly, that ought to melt the hardest
substance.
Really, I do not see any thing so very striking
in this man's civility. It would be, of course, you
know in the British navy; politeness, and all that
sort of thing being inborn in an Englishman, but it
may be, indeed I fancy it is, quite unheard of in an
American.
Shall I write our acknowledgments, madam, to
captain Stuart? asked the young lady, with evident
solicitude to drop the conversation.
Certainlycertainly, my dear Selina, always be
ceremoniously polite with your inferiors.
Madam, I think this noble captain, she would
have added, has no superiors, but afraid of further
discussion, she concluded her sentence with the tame
addition, richly deserves our thanks.
She then wrote the following note. Mrs. Liston,
in behalf of her mother in law, lady Strangford, and on
her own part, offers her warmest thanks to captain
Stuartthe ladies esteem it heaven's peculiar mercy
that captain Stuart is their captor. They have already
had such experience of his magnanimity, as to render
them perfectly tranquil in reposing their safety and
happiness on his honour. The ring, without any
allusion to it, was reinclosed.
When captain Stuart had perused the note, he
inquired if the lady had not requested to speak with
him. He was answered that so far from intimating
such a wish, she had said to her mother that she
would remain in her state-room, till she was
summoned
to leave captain Stuart's vessel. The captain
looked extremely chagrined, he knit his brows, and
bit his lips, and gave his orders hastily, with the
usual sea expletives appended to thema sure sign,
his men said, that something went wrong with
their captain, but these signs of repressed emotion
were all the expression he allowed to his offended
pride, or perhaps his better feelings. The ladies were
scrupulously served, and every deferential attention
paid to them that lady Strangford would have
anticipated
in the best disciplined ship in his majesty's
service.
A few day's sail brought the schooner to the port
of Antigua. She entered the harbour under a flag of
truce, and remained there just time enough for the
disembarcation of the ladies and their suite. During
this ceremony the captain remained in his berth, under
pretext of a violent head-ache; but it was obseved
that they were no sooner fairly off than he was on
deck again, moving about with an activity and even
impetuosity that seemed quite incompatible with a
debilitating malady.
Captain Stuart continued for some months a
fortunate
cruise about the West India islands. His was
not the prudent maxim that discretion is the better
part of valour, but when valour would have been
bootless he knew how to employ the alternative, and
his little schooner was celebrated as the most
desperate
fighter and the swiftest sailor in those seas,
and her captain became so formidable, that the
English
admiral off that station gave orders that the
schooner should be followed and destroyed at all
hazards
.
Soon after this he was pursued by a ship of the line,
and compelled to take refuge in the harbour of St.
Kitts, a French, and of course a friendly port to the
American flag. Here he anchored his vessel, and
deeming himself perfectly secure, and wearied with
hard duty, he retired to his berth after setting a watch,
and dismissing his crew to repose. In the middle of
the night he was alarmed by an attack from the
pursuing
frigate, which had contrived to elude the
vigilance
of the fort that guarded the entrance of the
harbour, and was already in such a position in relation
to him as to cut off every possibility of escape. His
spirit, far from quailing, was exasperated by the
surprise
.
He fought as the most courageous animals
fight at bay. To increase the horror of his situation,
the commander of the fort, from some fatal mistake,
opened a fire upon him. He was boarded on all sides
by boats manned with eighty-four men. We are too
ignorant of such matters, to give any interest to the
particulars of a sea-fight. Suffice it to say, that our
N
hero did not surrender till he was himself disabled by
wounds, his little band cut down, and his schooner a
wreck. When the British commander ascertained the
actual force with which he had contended, his pride
was stung with the consciousness that a victory so
dearly bought, had all of defeat but the disgraceful
name; and, incapable of that sympathy which a
magnanimous
spirit always feels with a noble captive, he
arraigned captain Stuart before him as a criminal, and
demanded of him how he dared against the law of
nations
,
to defend an indefensible vessel.
Did you think, retorted Stuart with cold
contempt
,
that I had gunpowder and would not burn it?
do you talk to me of the law of nations! I fight after
the law of nature, that teaches me to spend the last
kernel of powder and the last drop of blood, in my
country's service. His conqueror's temper, heated
before, was inflamed by Stuart's reply. He ordered
him to be manacled and put into close confinement.
This conduct may appear extraordinary in the
commander
of a British frigate, but the English, in their
contest with the colonies were not always governed
by those generous principles, by which they have
themselves so much alleviated the miseries of war. A
defeated American was treated as a lawful enemy, or
a rebel, as suited the temper of the individual who
vanquished him.
The frigate was so much injured in the fight as to
render a refit necessary, and her commander sailed
with his prize for Antigua.
Stuart well knew that his fidelity to his country
rendered him obnoxious to the severest judgment from
the admiralty court, and though he might plead the
services he had rendered the ladies of the governor's
family in mitigation of his sentence, he proudly
resolved
never to advert to favours, which he had reason
to believe had been lightly estimated.
Spirits most magnanimous in prosperity are often
most lofty in adversity. Frank Stuart, mutilated by
wounds, dejected by the fatal calamities of his faithful
crew, irritated by the indignities heaped on him by his
unworthy captor, and stung by secret thoughts of some
real or fancied injurychafed and overburthened with
many griefs, received, and sullenly obeyed a
summons
to the presence of the governor. It cannot be
denied, that reluctantly as he appeared before the
governor, he surveyed him at his introduction with
a look of keen curiosity. He was surprised to see
a man rather past his prime, though not yet declined
into the vale of years. With generous allowance for
the effect of a tropical climate, he might not have
been more than forty-five. His physiognomy was
agreeable, and his deportment gentlemanly. He
received captain Stuart with far more courtesy than
was often vouchsafed from an officer of the crown, to
one who fought under the rebel banner, and
remarking
that he looked pale and sick, he begged him to be
seated.
Stuart declined the civility, and continued resting
on a crutch, which a severe wound in his leg rendered
necessary.
You are the commander of the schooner Betsy?
said the governor.
What's left of her, returned Stuart.
You appear to be severely wounded, continued
the governor.
Hacked to pieces, rejoined Stuart, in a manner
suited to the brevity of his reply.
Your name, I believe, is Frank Stuart?
I have no reason to deny the name, thank God.
And, thank God, I have reason to bless and honour
it, exclaimed the governor, advancing and grasping
Frank's hand heartily. What metal did you deem
me of, my noble friend, that I should forget such
favours
as you conferred on me, in the persons of my
wife and mother.
I have known greater favours than those
forgotten
,
said Frank, and the sudden illumination of his
pale face showed how deeply he felt what he uttered.
Say you so? exclaimed the governor with good
humoured warmth; well, but that I am too poor to
pay my own debts to you, I should count it a pleasure
to assume those of all my speciesbut heaven grant,
my friend, that you do not allude to my wife and
mother
.
I blamed them much for not bringing you on
shore with thembut my mother is somewhat over
punctilious, and my wife, poor soul! her nerves were
so shattered by that sea-fight, that she is but now
herself
again. On my word, so far from wanting
gratitude
to you, she never hears an allusion to you without
tears, the language women deal in when words are too
cold for them. But come, concluded the governor,
for he found that all his efforts did but add to Stuart's
evident distress, come, follow me to the drawing-room,
the ladies will themselves convince you how impatient
they have been to welcome you?
Are they apprised, asked Stuart, still hesitating
and holding back, whom they are to see?
That are theymy mother is as much delighted as
if his majesty were in waiting, and my wife is weeping
with joy.
Perhaps, said Stuart, still hesitating, she would
rather not see me now.
Nonsense, my good friend, come along. It is not
for a brave fellow like you to shrink from a few friendly
tears from a woman's eye.
Nothing more could be urged, and Stuart followed
governor Liston to the presence of the ladies. Lady
Strangford rose and offered him her hand with the most
condescending kindness. Mrs. Liston rose too, but
did not advance till her husband said, Come, Selina,
speak your welcome to our benefactorhe may
misinterpret
this expression of your feelings.
Oh no, she said, now advancing eagerly, and
fixing her eye on Stuart, while her cheeks, neck, and
brow were suffused with crimson, Oh no, captain
Stuart knows how deeply I must feel benefits, which
none but he that bestowed them could forget or
undervalue
.
It was a rule my mother taught me, replied Frank
with bluntness, softened however by a sudden gleam
of pleasure, that givers should not have better
memories
than receivers. There was a meaning in his
honest phrase hidden from two of his auditors, but
quite intelligible to her for whom it was designed, and
to our readers, who have doubtless already anticipated
that the honourable Mrs. Liston was none other than
the fugitive Perdita. A sudden change of colour
showed that she felt acutely Stuart's keen though veiled
reproach.
A benefit, she replied, still speaking in a
double
sense, such as I have received from you,
captain
Stuart, may be too deeply felt to be
acknowledged
by wordsnow heaven has given us the
opportunity
of deeds, and you shall find that my gratitude
is only inferior to your merit. Stuart was more
accustomed
to embody his feelings in action than speech,
and he remained silent. He felt as if he were the
sport of a dream, when he looked on the transformed
Perdita. He knew not why, but invested as she now
was, with all the power of wealth and the elegance of
fashion, he felt not half the awe of her, as when in her
helplessness and dependence, he had fenced her
rounde with many a spelle, wrought by youthful and
chivalric feeling.
He perceived, in spite of Mrs. Liston's efforts, that
his presence was embarrassing to her, and he would
have taken leave, but the governor insisted
peremptorily
on his remaining to dine with him. Then
saying
that he had indispensable business to transact, and
must be absent for a half hour, he would, he said,
N 2
leave the ladies to the free expression of their
feelings
.
When he was gone, Mrs. Liston said to her mother,
I do not think your little favourite, Francis, is quite
well to-daywill you have the goodness to look in
upon him and give nurse some advice. The old
lady went without reluctance, as most people do to
give advice, and Mrs. Liston turned to Stuart, and
said, I gave my boy your name, with a prayer that
God would give him your spirit. Do not, oh do not
think me, she continued, her lip quivering with
emotion, the ungrateful wretch I have appeared. I
am condemned to silence by the pride of another.
My heart rebels, but I am bound to keep that a secret,
which my feelings prompt me to publish to the world.
Stuart would have spoken, but she anticipated him:
Listen to me without interruption, she said, my
story is my only apology, and I have but brief space
to tell it in. It was love, as you once guessed, that
led me to that mad voyage to America. I had a silly
passion for a young Virginian, who had been sent to
England for his educationhe was nineteen, I fifteen,
when we promised to meet on board the ship which
conveyed me to America. His purpose, but not
his concert with me was discovered, and he was
detained
in England. You know all the events of my
enterprise. I left a letter for my father, informing
him that I had determined to abandon England, but I
gave him not the slightest clue to my real designs. I
was an only, and as you will readily believe, a spoiled
child. My mother was not living, and my father
hoping that I should soon return, and wishing to veil
my folly, gave out that he had sent me to a
boarding-school
on the continent, and himself retired to
Switzerland
.
When I arrived in London, I obtained his
address and followed him. He immediately received
me to apparent favour, but never restored me to his
confidence. His heart was hardened by my childish
folly, and though I recounted to him all my sufferings,
I never drew a tear from him; but when I spoke of
you, and dwelt on the particulars of your goodness
to me, his eye would moisten, and he would exclaim,
`God bless the lad.' I must be brief, she continued,
casting her eye apprehensively at the door; Mr.
Liston
came with his mother to Geneva, where we resided;
he addressed memy father favoured his suit, and
though he is, as you perceive, much older than myself,
I consented to marry him, but not, as I told my father,
till I had unfolded my history to him. My father
was incensed at what he called my follyhe treated
me harshlyI was subdued, and our contest ended in
my solemnly swearing never to divulge the secret, on
the preservation of which he fancied the honour of his
proud name to depend.
Thank God, then exclaimed Frank, with a burst
of honest feeling, it was not your pride, cursed pride;
and I may still think on Perdita as a true, tender-hearted
girl. It was a pleasant spot in my memory, he
continued
,
dashing away a tear, and I hated to have it
crossed with a black line.
Mrs. Liston improved all that remained of her
mother's
absence in detailing some particulars, not
necessary
to relate, by which it appeared that
notwithstanding
she had dispensed with the article of love in
her marriage, (we crave mercy of our fair young
readers,) her husband's virtue and indulgence had
matured
a sentiment of affection, if not as romantic, yet
quite as safe and enduring as youthful passion. She
assured Stuart that she regarded him as the means of
all her happiness. Not a day passes, she said,
raising
her beautiful eyes to heaven, that I do not
remember
my generous deliverer, where alone I am permitted
to speak of him. The old lady now rejoined them,
bringing her grandchild in her arms. Frank threw
down his crutch, forgot his wounds, and permitted his
full heart to flow out, in the caresses he lavished on
his little namesake.
The governor redeemed Stuart's schooner, and made
such representations before the admiralty court of
Stuart's merits, and of the ill treatment he had received
from the commander of the frigate, that the court
ordered the schooner to be refitted and equipped, and
permitted to proceed to sea at the pleasure of captain
Stuart. He remained for several days domesticated
in the governor's family, and treated by every member
of it with a frank cordiality suited to his temper and
merits. Every look, word, and action of Mrs. Liston
expressed to him, that his singular service was engraven
on her heart. He forebore even to allude to it, and
with his characteristic magnanimity never inquired,
directly or indirectly, her family name. He observed
a timidity and apprehensiveness in her manner that
resulted from a consciousness that she had, however
reluctantly, practised a fraud on her husband, and he
said that having felt how burdensome it was to keep
a secret from his commander for a short voyage, he
thought it was quite too heavy a lading for the voyage
of life.
The demonstrations of gratitude which Stuart
received
from governor Liston and his family, he
deemed
out of all proportion to his services, and being more
accustomed to bestow than to receive, he became
restless, and as soon as his schooner was ready for sea,
he announced his departure, and bade his friends
farewell. He said the tears that Perdita, (he always
called her Perdita,) shed at parting, were far more
precious to him than all the rich gifts she had bestowed
on him.
At the moment Stuart set his foot on the deck of
his vessel, the American colours, at the governor's
command, were hoisted. The generous sympathies
of the multitude were moved, and huzzas from a
thousand
voices rent the air. Governor Liston and his suite
and most of the merchant vessels, then in port, escorted
the schooner out of the harbour. Even the stern
usages of war cannot extinguish that sentiment in the
bosom of man, implanted by God, which leads him to
do homage to a brave and generous foe.
Captain Stuart continued to the end of the war, to
serve his country with unabated zeal, and, when
peace was restored, the same hardy spirit that had
distinguished him in perilous times, made him foremost
in bold adventure.
He commanded the second American trading vessel
that arrived at Canton after the peace; and this vessel
with which he sailed over half the globe, was a sloop
of eighty tons, little more than half the size of the
largest now used for the trade of Hudson river. This
adventure will be highly estimated by those who have
been so fortunate as to read the merry tale of Dolph
Heilegher, and who remember the prudence
manifested
,
at that period, by the wary Dutchmen in
navigating
these small vessels: how they were fain to
shelter themselves at night in the friendly harbours
with which the river abounds, and, we believe, to
avoid adventuring through Haverstraw bay or the
Tappan sea, in a high wind.
When Stuart's little sloop rode into the port of
Canton
,
it was mistaken for a tender from a large ship,
and the bold mariner was afterwards familiarly called
by the great Hong merchants, the one-mast captain.
Fifty-seven years have gone by since the Hazard
sailed from Oxford, and our hero is now enjoying in
the winter of his life, the fruits of a summer of activity
and integrity. Time, which he has well used, has
used him gentlyhis hair is a little thinned and
mottled
,
but is still a sufficient shelter to his honoured
head. His eye when he talks of the past, (all good old
men love to talk of the past,) rekindles with the fire
of youth, his healthful complexion speaks his
temperance
,
and a double row of unimpared ivory, justifies
the pleasant vanity of his boast, that he can still show
his teeth to an enemy.
Professional carelessness or generosity has left him
little of the world's gear, but he is richfor he
is independent of riches. He says he would
recommend
honest dealings and an open hand, to all who
would lay up stores of pleasant thoughts for their old
age; and he aversand who will gainsay him? that in
the silent watches of the night, the memory of
money
well bestowed is better than a pocket full of
guineas
.
He loves to recount his boyish pranks, and
recal his childish feelingshow he rattled down the
chincapins on the devoted heads of a troop of little
girls; and how he was whipped for crying to go with
Braddock and be a soldier! but above all, he loves to
dwell on some of the particulars we have related, and
in the sincerity of religious feeling to ascribe praise to
that Being, who kept his youth within the narrow
bound of strict virtue.
I saw him last week surrounded by his
grandchildren
,
recounting his imminent dangers and hair breadth
'scapes to a favourite boy, while the nimble fingers of
rosy-cheeked, bright-eyed little girls were employed
in making sails for a miniature ship, which the old
man has just completed. Long may he enjoy the
talisman
that recalls to his imagination, labour without
its hardship, and enterprise without its failureand
God grant gentle breezes and a clear sky to the close
of his voyage of life!
MARY DYRE.
The
subject of the following sketch, a Quaker
Martyr, may appear to the fair holiday readers of
souvenirs, a very unfit personage to be introduced
into the romantic and glorious company of lords and
ladye loves; of doomed brides; and all-achieving
heroines; chivalric soldiers; suffering outlaws; and
Ossianic sons of the forest. But of such, it is not now
our hint to speak. Neither have we selected the
most romantic heroine that might have been found in
the annals of the sober-suited sect. A startling tale
might be wrought from the perilous adventures of
Mary Fisher, the maiden missionary, who, after being
cast into prison, for saying thee instead of you, was
examined before a judicial tribunal, and nothing found
but innocence; who, released from durance, travelled
over the continent of Europe, to communicate her faith;
visited the court of Mahomet the Fourth, then held at
Adrianople; was presented by the Grand Vizier to
the Sultan, who listened to her with deference, and was,
or affected to be, persuaded of her truth. A guard to
Constantinople was gallantly offered her by
Mahomet
,
which she refused; and safe and unmolested, in
her armous of innocence, she proceeded to that city,
receiving everywhere from the Turks the gentle usage
that was denied her by those professing a more
generous
faith.
A tale of horrors, of cowled monks, and instruments
of torture, might be framed from the hair breadth
scapes of Catharine Evans and Sarah Chevers, the
Quaker heroines who suffered with constancy, in the
Inquisition at Malta. We have passed by these
tempting
themes, to tell a briefer story, and present a
character
in its true and natural light, as it stands on the
historic page, without the graces of fiction, or any of
those aids, by which the romance writer composes his
pictureexaggerating beauties, placing them in bright
lights, and omitting or gracefully shading defects.
There are manifestations of moral beauty so perfect
that they do not require the aids of fiction, as there are
scenes in the material world, that no illusion of the
imagination can improve.
Mary Dyre belonged to the religious society of
Friends; a society, that, after having long resisted
the tempest of intolerance and persecution, is melting
away under the genial sun of universal toleration, and
the ignoble, but no less resistless influence, of the
tailor's shears, and the milliner's craft. As Voltaire
predicted, some sixty years since,
Les enfans enrichis
par l'industrie de leurs peres veulent jouir avoir des
honneurs,
des boutons
, et
des manchettes
.
Mary Dyre was among those, who, in 1657, sought
in New England an asylum from the oppression of
the mother country. But the persecuted had become
persecutors; and, instead of an asylum, these harmless
people found a prison, and were destined, for their
glory and our shame, to suffer as martyrs in the cause
of liberty of conscience.
Sewal, the historian of the people called Quakers,
to whom we are indebted for most of the following
particulars, has given very slight notice of Mary Dyre's
private history. She was, he says, of a comely and
grave countenance, of a good family and estate, and
the mother of several children; but her husband, it
seems, was of another persuasion. From another
document, which we have been so fortunate as to
obtain
,
it appears that this defect of religious sympathy,
O
had, in no degree, abated the affection and confidence
of her husband.
Thus she possessed whatever comes within the
aspiration
of a woman's ambition or affections;beauty,
for this is no violent paraphrase of the Quaker
historian's
stinted courtesy, rank, fortune, conjugal and
maternal happiness; yet she counted all these but loss,
believing that her obedience to the inspirations of God
required their sacrifice.
The Pilgrims, finding the penalties of fine,
imprisonment
,
scourging with the three-corded whip,
cutting
off the ears, and boring the tongue with a red-hot
iron, ineffectual in extirpating the cursed heresy of
the Quakers, or preventing their pestilent errors and
practices, proceeded to banish them from their
jurisdiction
,
on pain of death.
This violence was done under a statute enacted in
1658. Mary Dyre, with many others, sought a refuge
from the storm in Rhode-Island. Christian liberty, in
its most generous sense, was the noble distinction of
that Province; and there Mary might have enjoyed
her inoffensive faith, and all the temporal distinctions
it permitted, for her husband filled one of the highest
offices in the Province. But she could not forget her
suffering brethren in the Massachusetts Colony. She
meditated on their wrongs till she felt a call to
return
to Boston. Two persons, distinguished for zeal
and integrity, accompanied her; William Robinson,
and Marmaduke Stevenson. Their intention and
hope was, to obtain a repeal or mitigation of the laws
against their sect. Their return was in the autumn of
1659. On their appearance in Boston, they were
immediately
seized, and committed to prison, and a few days
subsequent, after a summary and informal examination
before Governor Endicot, and the associate
Magistrates
,
they were sentenced to suffer the penalty of
death, which had been already decreed to such as, after
being banished, should return.
Mary's companions replied to the annunciation of
their sentence, in terms that savoured strongly of
human
resentment, which, alas for human weakness! is
often betrayed in the anticipation of the judgments of
Heaven. Give ear, ye magistrates, said Stevenson,
and all ye who are guilty, for this the Lord hath
said concerning you, and will perform his word upon
you, that the same day ye put his servants to death,
shall the day of your visitation pass over you, and ye
shall be cursed forevermore. The passions of our
infirm nature are sometimes confounded with the
religion that accompanies them, as the cloud is, to an
ignorant eye, identified with the prismatic rays it
reflects.
Mary's pure and gentle spirit dwelt in eternal
sunshine
;
its elements were at peace. When the fearful
words were pronounced, Mary Dyre, you shall go to
the prison whence you came, thence to the place of
execution, and be hanged there till you are dead, she
folded her hands, and replied, with a serene aspect,
The will of the Lord be done.
Her friends have described her demeanour at this
moment, as almost supernatural, as if the outward
temple were brightened by the communications of the
Spirit within. They say, the world seemed to have
vanished from her sight; her eyes were raised, and
fixed in the rapture of devotion; her lips were moved
by the ecstasy of her soul, though they uttered no
articulate
sound.
Governor Endicot seems to have felt an irritation
at her tranquillity, not more dignified than a child's
when he vents his wrath in blows on an insensible
substance.
Take her away, Marshal, he said harshly.
I return joyfully to my prison, she replied; and
then turning to the Marshal, she added, You may
leave me, Marshal, I will return alone.
I believe you, Mrs. Dyre, replied the Marshal;
but I must do as I am commanded.
The prisoners were condemned on the twentieth of
October. The twenty-seventh was the day appointed
for the execution of the sentence. With a
self-command
and equinimity of mind rare in such
circumstances
,
Mary employed the interval in writing an
Appeal to the Rulers of Boston; an appeal, not in
her own behalf, not for pardon, nor life, but for a
redress
of the wrongs of her persecuted brethren. I
have no self-ends, the Lord knoweth, she says, for
if life were freely granted by you, it would not avail
me, so long as I should daily see or hear of the
sufferings
of my people, my dear brethren, and the seed
with whom my life is bound up. Let my counsel
and request be accepted with you to repeal all such
laws, that the truth and servants of the Lord may have
free passage among you, and you kept from shedding
innocent blood, which I know there be many among
you would not do, if they knew it so to be.In
love and in the spirit of meekness,
for I have no
enmity
to the persons of any
, I again beseech you.
There is not, throughout this magnanimous appeal the
slightest intimation of a wish that her sentence should
be remitted, no craven nor natural shrinking from
death, no apologies for past offences, but the courage
of an apostle contending for the truth, and the
tenderness
of a woman feeling for the sufferings of her
people. Could it matter to so noble a creature,
where, according to the quaint phrase of her sect, her
outward being dwelt, or how soon it should be
dissolved
?
On the evening of the twenty-sixth, William Dyre,
Mary's eldest son, arrived in Boston, and was
admitted
to her prison. He came in the hope of persuading
his mother to make such concessions in regard to her
faith, as to conciliate her judges, and procure a reprieve.
All night he remained with her. The particulars of
this interview have not been preserved. Mary's
enemies
have not been scrupulous in the record of her
virtues, and her friends appear to have considered the
affections of her nature scarcely worth a memorial,
amidst the triumphs of her faith. We know the temper
of woman, the tenderness and depth of a mother's
love. We may imagine the intense feelings of the
son, on the eve of his mother's threatened execution,
pleading for the boon of her life; we may imagine the
conflict between the yearnings of the mother, and the
resistance of the saint; and we may be sure that we
cannot exaggerate its violence, nor its suffering. The
saint was triumphant, and on the following morning,
Mary was led forth, between her two friends to the
place of execution. A strong guard escorted the
prisoners
,
and, as if to infuse the last drop of bitterness
in their cup, Mr. Wilson, the minister of Boston,
attended them. There were coarse and malignant
spirits among the spectators. Are you not ashamed,
said one of them tauntingly to Mary, are you not
ashamed to walk thus hand in hand between two young
men?
No, she replied, this is to me an hour of the
greatest joy I could have in the world. No eye can
see, nor ear hear, nor tongue utter, nor heart
understand
the sweet incomes and refreshings of the spirit
of the Lord, which I now feel. Death could not
appal
a mind so lofty and serene. Man could not disturb
a peace so profound. Her companions evinced a like
composure. They all tenderly embraced at the foot
of the scaffold. Robinson first mounted it, and called
on the spectators to witness for him that he died, not
as a malefactor, but for testifying to the light of Christ.
Stevenson, the moment before the hangman performed
the last act, said, This day we shall be at rest with
the Lord.
Mary was of a temper, like the intrepid Madame
Roland, to have inspired a faltering spirit by her
example
;
O 2
far more difficult she must have found it, to
behold the last quiverings and strugglings of mortality,
in the persons of her friends. But even after this, she
was steadfast, and ascended the scaffold with an
unblenching
step. Her dress was scrupulously adjusted
about her feet, her face covered with a handkerchief,
and the halter put around her neck.
The deep silence of this awful moment was broken
by a piercing cry. Stop! she is reprieved! was
sent from mouth to mouth, till one glad shout
announced
the feeling of the gazing multitude. Was
there one of all those gathered to this fearful
spectacle
,
whose heart did not leap with joy?Yesthe
sufferer and victim, she, to whom the gates of death
had been opened. Her mind, says her historian,
was already in heaven, and when they loosed her
feet and bade her come down, she stood still, and said
she was willing to suffer as her brethren had, unless
the magistrates would annul their cruel law.
Her declaration was disregarded, she was forced
from the scaffold, and reconducted to prison. There
she was received in the arms of her son, and she
learnt from him that she owed her life to his prolonged
intercession.
Fortitude, the merit of superior endurance, has often
been conceded to woman. One of our most celebrated
surgeons had the magnanimity to say to a patient on
whom he had just performed an excruciating
operation
,
Sir you have borne it like a man, you have done
better than that, you have borne it like a
woman
.
But the most devoted champions of the weaker and
timid sex, must concede, that they are inferior to man
in courage to brave circumstances, and encounter
danger; yet among all the valiant hearts in manly
frames, that have illustrated our race, we know not
where we shall find a more indomitable spirit, than
Mary Dyre's. The tribunal of her determined
enemies
;
the prison; the scaffold; the actual presence of
death; the joy of recovered life; and, more potent
than all, the meltings of maternal love, did not abate
one jot of her purpose. On the morning after her
reprieve, she dispatched from her prison a letter to
her judges, beginning in the following bold, and, if
the circumstances are considered, sublime strain;
Once more to the General Court assembled in
Boston, speaks Mary Dyre, even as before. My life
is not accepted, neither availeth me, in comparison of
the lives and liberty of the truth, and servants of the
living God, for which, in the bowels of meekness and
love I sought you. She proceeds to charge them,
most justly, with having neglected the measure of light
that was in them, and thus concludes; When I heard
your last order read, it was a disturbance unto me,
that was freely offering up my life to Him that gave
it me, and sent me hither so to do; which obedience
being his own work, he gloriously accompanied with
his presence, and peace, and love in me, in which I
rested from my labour.
The minds of the magistrates must have been
wonderfully
puffed up, and clouded with an imagined
infallibility
,
and their hearts indurated by dogmatical
controversy, or they would at once have perceived,
that Mary Dyre was maintaining a righteous claim to
the same privilege for which they had made their
boasted efforts and sacrifices;the privilege of private
judgment.
Whatever intimations they may have received from
their conscience, they were not made public; no
answer
was returned to Mary's letters, and no
concessions
made to her sect; but it was thought prudent to
commute Mary's sentence into banishment, with
penalty
of death in case of her return, and she was
accordingly
sent, with a guard, to Rhode Island.
The sympathies of the good people of Boston had
been awakened by the firmness of the prisoners in
their extremity. The tide of feeling was setting in
favour of their cause, murmurs of dissatisfaction with
the proceedings of the magistrates were running
through the little community, and it was thought best
to allay the ferment, by a manifesto, which is
throughout
a lame defence, and which concludes in a manner
worthy of the style of Cromwell and the school of the
Jesuits. The consideration of our gradual
proceedings
,
say they, will vindicate us from the clamorous
accusations of severity; our own just and necessary
defence calling upon us, other means failing, to offer
the point which these persons have violently and
wilfully
rushed upon, and thereby become
felones de se
,
which, might it have been prevented, and the sovereign
law,
salus populi
, been preserved, our former
proceedings
,
as well as the sparing Mary Dyre upon an
inconsiderable intercession, will evidently evince we
desire their lives absent, rather than their deaths
present.
Would the tragedy had ended here! But the last
and saddest scene was yet to be enacted. We who
believe that woman's duty as well as happiness lies
in the obscure, safe, and not very limited sphere of
domestic life, may regret that Mary did not forego the
glory of the champion, and the martyr, for the meek
honours of the wife and mother. Still we must
venerate
the courage and energy of her soul, when, as she
said, moved by the spirit of God so to do, she again
returned to finish, in her own words, her sad and
heavy experience, in the bloody town of Boston.
She arrived there on the twenty-first of May, 1660,
and appears to have remained unmolested, till the
thirty-first, when she was summoned before the
General
Court, which had cognizance of all civil and
criminal offences. In this court, Governor Endicot
was the presiding officer. He began her examination
by asking her, if she were the same Mary Dyre that
was there before.
It appears that another Mary Dyre had made some
disturbance in the Colony, and the Governor,
probably
pitying the rashness of our heroine, was willing
to allow her an opportunity of evasion, but she replied
unhesitatingly, I am the same Mary Dyre that was
here at the last General Court.
Then you own yourself a Quaker, do you not?
I own myself to be reproachfully called so.
I must then repeat the sentence once before
pronounced
upon you.
After he had spoken the words of doom, This is
no more, replied Mary calmly, than thou saidst
before
.
But now it is to be executed; therefore prepare
yourself for nine o'clock to-morrow.
Still steadfast in what she believed her divinely
authorised mission, she replied, I came in obedience
to the will of God, to the last General Court, praying
you to repeal your unrighteous sentence of banishment,
on pain of death, and that same is my work now, and
earnest request, although I told you, that if you refused
to repeal them, the Lord would send others of his
servants
to witness against them.
Are you a prophetess? asked Endicot.
I spoke the words which the Lord spoke to me;
and now the thing is come to pass.
Away with her! cried the Governor; and Mary
was reconducted to prison. We lament the
imperfection
of human intelligence, and the infirmity of
human virtue, for perfection easily bears with the
imperfections of others; but we rejoice, that, in the
providence of God, the vice of one party elicits the
virtue of another; that bigotry and persecution bring
forth the faith and heroic self-sacrifice of the martyr.
The fire is kindled and burns fiercely, but the Phenix
rises; the furnace, heated with seven-fold heat, does
not consume, but purifies.
Mary Dyre's family was plunged into deep distress,
by her again putting her life in jeopardy. As her
husband's religious faith did not accord with her own,
he could not of course perfectly sympathize with her
zeal in behalf of her persecuted sect, but the
following
letter, addressed to the Governor, which has not,
we believe, before been published, bears ample
testimony
,
that his conjugal affection had borne the hard
test of religious disagreement.
Honoured SirIt is with no little grief of mind
and sadness of heart, that I am necessitated to be so
bould as to supplicate your honoured self, with the
honourable assembly of your General Court, to extend
your mercy and favour once again, to me, and my
children. Little did I dream, that I should have
occasion
to petition in a matter of this nature; but so it
is, that through the divine providence and your
benignity
,
my sonn obtayned so much pity and mercy at
your hands, to enjoy the life of his mother. Now my
supplication to your honours is, to begg affectionately
the life of my dear wife. 'Tis true, I have not seen
her above this half yeare, and cannot tell how, in the
frame of her spirit, she was moved thus againe to run
so great a hazard to herself, and perplexity to me and
mine, and all her friends and wellwishers.
So it is, from Shelter Island, about by Peynod,
Narragansett, &c., to the town of Providence, she
secretly
and speedily journeyed, and as secretly from
thence came to your jurisdiction. Unhappy journey,
may I say, and woe to that generation, say I, that
gives occasion thus of grief (to those that desire to be
quiett), by helping one another to hazard their lives
to, I know not what end, nor for what purpose.
If her zeal be so great, as thus to adventure, oh!
let your pitty and favour surmount it, and save her
life. Let not your love and wonted compassion be
conquered by her inconsiderate maddness, and how
greatly will your renoune be spread, if by so
conquering
,
you become victorious. What shall I say more!
I know you are all sensible of my conditionyou
see what my petition is, and what will give me and
mine peace.
Oh! let Mercy's wings soar over Justice's ballance,
and then whilst I live, I shall exalt your goodness;
but otherways't will be a languishing sorrow  yea,
so great, that I should gladly suffer the blow at once,
much rather. I shall forbear to trouble you with
words, neither am I in a capacity to expatiate myself
at present. I only say this, yourselves have been,
and are, or may be husbands to wives; so am I, yea
to one most dearly beloved. Oh! do not deprive me
of her, but I pray give her me once again. I shall be
so much obliged forever that I shall endeavour
continually
to utter my thanks and render you love and
honour most renouned. Pitty me! I beg it with tears,
and rest your humble suppliant,
W.
Dyre
.
It does not appear what answer, or that any answer
was vouchsafed to this touching appeal. It is enough
to know that it was unavailing, and that on the very
next day after her condemnation, the first of June,
Mary Dyre was led forth to execution.
Some apprehensions seem to have been entertained
that the mob might give inconvenient demonstrations
of their pity for the prisoner, for she was strongly
guarded, and during her whole progress from her
prison to the place of execution, a mile's distance,
drums were beaten before and behind her.
The seaffold was erected on Boston Common.
When she had mounted it, she was asked if she would
have the Elders to pray for her?
I know never an Elder here, she replied.
Will you have none of the people to pray for you?
persisted her attendant.
I would have all the people of God to pray for
me, she replied.
Mary Dyre! O repent! O repent! cried out Mr.
Wilson the minister; be not so deluded and carried
away by the deceits of the devil.
Nay, man, she answered, I am not now to
repent.
She was reproached with having said she had
already been in paradise.
To this she replied, I have been in paradise many
days.
She spoke truly. Her mind was the paradise of
God. The executioner did his office. He
could
kill
the body, demolish the temple, but the pure and
glorious
spirit of the martyr passed unharmed, untouched,
into the visible presence of its Creator.
The scene of this tragedy was the Boston Common;
that spot, so affluent in beauty, so graced by the peace,
and teeming with the loveliness of nature, was
desecrated
by a scaffold! stained with innocent blood! We
would not dishonour this magnificent scene by
connecting
with it, in a single mind, one painful association.
But let those send back one thought to the Quaker
Martyr, who delight to watch the morning light and
the evening shadows stealing over it; to walk under
the bountiful shadow of its elms; to see the herds of
cattle banqueting there; the birds daintily gleaning
their food; the boys driving their hoops, flying their
kites, and launching their mimic vessels on the mimic
lake; whilst the little
faineants
, perhaps the busiest
in thought among them, are idly stretched on the
grass, seemingly satisfied with the bare consciousness
of existence. The Boston Common, as it is, preserved
and embellished, but not spoiled by art, still retaining
its natural and graceful undulations, shaded by trees of
a century's growth, with its ample extent of uncovered
surface, affording in the heart of a populous city, that
first of luxuries, space; trodden by herds of its natural
and
chartered
proprietors; encompassed by
magnificent
edifices, the homes of the gifted, cultivated, and
liberal; with its beautiful view of water (Heaven
forgive
those who abated it!) and of the surrounding,
cultured, and enjoyed country; crowned by
Dorchester
Heights, and the Blue Hills;Boston Common,
has always appeared to us one of the choicest of
nature's temples. The memory of the good is worthy
such a temple; and we trust we shall be forgiven, for
having attempted to fix there this slight monument to a
noble sufferer in that great cause, that has stimulated
the highest minds to the sublimest actions; that calls
its devotees from the gifted, its martyrs from the moral
heroes of mankind; the best cause, the fountain of all
liberty
liberty of conscience!
P
CACOETHES SCRIBENDI.
Glory and gain the industrious tribe provoke.
Pope
.
The
little secluded and quiet village of H. lies at no
great distance from our literary emporium. It was
never remarked or remarkable for any thing, save one
mournful pre-eminence, to those who sojourned within
its bordersit was duller even than common villages.
The young men of the better class all emigrated. The
most daring spirits adventured on the sea. Some went
to Boston; some to the south; and some to the west;
and left a community of women who lived like nuns,
with the advantage of more liberty and fresh air, but
without the consolation and excitement of a religious
vow. Literally, there was not a single young
gentleman
in the villagenothing in manly shape to which
these desperate circumstances could give the form and
quality and uses of a beau. Some dashing city blades,
who once strayed from the turnpike to this sequestered
spot, averred that the girls stared at them as if, like
Miranda, they would have exclaimed
What is't? a spirit?
Lord, how it looks about! Believe me, sir,
It carries a brave form:But 'tis a spirit.
A peculiar fatality hung over this devoted place. If
death seized on either head of a family, he was sure to
take the husband; every woman in H. was a widow
or maiden; and it is a sad fact, that when the holiest
office of the church was celebrated, they were
compelled
to borrow deacons from an adjacent village. But,
incredible as it may be, there was no great diminution
of happiness in consequence of the absence of the
nobler
sex. Mothers were occupied with their children
and housewifery, and the young ladies read their books
with as much interest as if they had lovers to discuss
them with, and worked their frills and capes as
diligently
,
and wore them as complacently, as if they
were to be seen by manly eyes. Never was there
pleasanter gatherings or parties (for that was the word
even in their nomenclature) than those of the young
girls of H. There was no mincingno affectation
no hope of passing for what they were notno envy
of the pretty and fortunateno insolent triumph over
the plain and demure and neglected,but all was
good will and good humour. They were a pretty
circle
of girlsa garland of bright fresh flowers. Never
were there more sparkling glances,never sweeter
smilesnor more of them. Their present was all
health and cheerfulness; and their future, not the
gloomy perspective of dreary singleness, for somewhere
in the passage of life they were sure to be mated.
Most of the young men who had abandoned their
native
soil, as soon as they found themselves
getting
along
, loyally returned to lay their fortunes at the feet
of the companions of their childhood.
The girls made occasional visits to Boston, and
occasional
journeys to various parts of the country, for
they were all enterprising and independent, and had
the characteristic New England avidity for seizing a
privilege; and in these various ways, to borrow a
phrase of their good grandames, a door was opened
for them, and in due time they fulfilled the destiny
of women.
We spoke strictly, and literally, when we said that
in the village of H. there was not a single
beau
. But
on the outskirts of the town, at a pleasant farm,
embracing
hill and valley, upland and meadow land; in a
neat house, looking to the south, with true economy
of sunshine and comfort, and overlooking the prettiest
winding stream that ever sent up its sparkling beauty
to the eye, and flanked on the north by a rich maple
grove, beautiful in spring and summer, and glorious
in autumn, and the kindest defence in winter;on
this farm and in this house dwelt a youth, to fame
unknown, but known and loved by every inhabitant
of H., old and young, grave and gay, lively and severe.
Ralph Hepburn was one of nature's favourites. He
had a figure that would have adorned courts and cities;
and a face that adorned human nature, for it was full
of good humour, kindheartedness, spirit, and
intelligence
;
and driving the plough or wielding the scythe,
his cheek flushed with manly and profitable exercise,
he looked as if he had been moulded in a poet's fancy
as farmers look in Georgies and Pastorals. His
gifts were by no means all external. He wrote
verses in every album in the village, and very pretty
album verses they were, and numerous toofor the
number of albums was equivalent to the whole female
population. he was admirable at pencil sketches;
and once with a little paint, the refuse of a house
painting, he achieved an admirable portrait of his
grandmother and her cat. There was, to be sure, a
striking likeness between the two figures, but he was
limited to the same colours for both; and besides, it was
not out of nature, for the old lady and her cat had
purred
together in the chimney corner, till their
physiognomies
bore an obvious resemblance to each other.
Ralph had a talent for music too. His voice was the
sweetest of all the Sunday choir, and one would have
fancied, from the bright eyes that were turned on him
from the long line and double lines of treble and
counter
singers, that Ralph Hepburn was a note book, or
that the girls listened with their eyes as well as their
ears. Ralph did not restrict himself to psalmody. He
had an ear so exquisitely susceptible to the touches of
sweet harmony, that he discovered, by the stroke of
his axe, the musical capacities of certain species of
wood, and he made himself a violin of chesnut, and
drew strains from it, that if they could not create a
soul under the ribs of death, could make the prettiest
feet and the lightest hearts dance, an achievement far
more to Ralph's taste than the aforesaid miracle. In
short, it seemed as if nature, in her love of
compensation
,
had showered on Ralph all the gifts that are
usually diffused through a community of beaux. Yet
Ralph was no prodigy; none of his talents were in
excess, but all in moderate degree. No genius was
ever so good humoured, so useful, so practical; and
though, in his small and modest way, a Crichton, he
was not, like most universal geniuses, good for nothing
for any particular office in life. His farm was not a
pattern farma prize farm for an agricultural society,
but in wonderful order
considering
his
miscellaneous
pursuits. He was the delight of his grandfather
for his sagacity in hunting beesthe old man's
favourite
,
in truth his only pursuit. He was so skilled
in woodcraft that the report of his gun was as certain
a signal of death as the tolling of a church bell. The
fish always caught at his bait. He manufactured half
his farming utensils, improved upon old inventions,
and struck out some new ones; tamed partridgesthe
most untameable of all the feathered tribe; domesticated
squirrels; rivalled Scheherazade herself in telling
stories
,
strange and longthe latter quality being
essential
at a country fireside; and, in short, Ralph made
a perpetual holiday of a life of labour.
Every girl in the village street knew when Ralph's
wagon or sleigh traversed it; indeed, there was scarcely
a house to which the horses did not, as if by instinct,
turn up while their master greeted its fair tenants.
This state of affairs had continued for two winters and
two summers since Ralph came to his majority and,
by the death of his father, to the sole proprietorship of
the Hepburn farm,the name his patrimonial acres
P 2
had obtained from the singular circumstance (in our
moving
country) of their having remained in the same
family for four generations. Never was the
matrimonial
destiny of a young lord, or heir just come to his
estate, more thoroughly canvassed than young
Hepburn's
by mothers, aunts, daughters, and nieces. But
Ralph, perhaps from sheer good heartedness, seemed
reluctant to give to a party what was meant for
mankind
,
to give one the heart that diffused rays of
sunshine
through the whole village.
With all decent people he eschewed the doctrines of
a certain erratic female lecturer on the odious
monopoly
of marriage, yet Ralph, like a tender hearted
judge, hesitated to place on a single brow the crown
matrimonial which so many deserved, and which,
though Ralph was far enough from a coxcomb, he
could not but see so many coveted.
Whether our hero perceived that his mind was
becoming
elated or distracted with this general favour,
or that he observed a dawning of rivalry among the
fair competitors, or whatever was the cause, the fact
was, that he by degrees circumscribed his visits, and
finally concentrated them in the family of his aunt
Courland.
Mrs. Courland was a widow, and Ralph was the
kindest of nephews to her, and the kindest of cousins
to her children. To their mother he seemed their
guardian angel. That the five lawless, daring litle
urchins did not drown themselves when they were
swimming, nor shoot themselves when they were
shooting, was, in her eyes, Ralph's merit; and then
he was so attentive to Alice, her only daughtera
brother could not be kinder. But who would not be
kind to Alice? she was a sweet girl of seventeen,
not beautiful, not handsome perhaps,but pretty
enoughwith soft hazel eyes, a profusion of light
brown hair, always in the neatest trim, and a mouth
that could not but be lovely and loveable, for all kind
and tender affections were playing about it. Though
Alice was the only daughter of a doting mother, the
only sister of five loving boys, the only niece of three
single, fond aunts, and, last and greatest, the only
cousin of our only beau, Ralph Hepburn, no girl of
seventeen was ever more disinterested, unassuming,
unostentatious, and unspoiled. Ralph and Alice had
always lived on terms of cousinly affectionan
affection of a neutral tint that they never thought of
being shaded into the deep dye of a more tender
passion. Ralph rendered her all cousinly offices. If
he had twenty damsels to escort, not an uncommon
case, he never forgot Alice. When he returned from
any little excursion, he always brought some graceful
offering to Alice.
He had lately paid a visit to Boston. It was at the
season of the periodical inundation of annuals. He
brought two of the prettiest to Alice, Ah! little did
she think they were to prove Pandora's box to her,
Poor simple girl! she sat down to read them, as if an
annual were meant to be read, and she was honestly
interested and charmed. Her mother observed her
delight. What have you there, Alice? she asked.
Oh the prettiest story, mamma!two such tried
faithful lovers, and married at last! It ends
beautifully
:
I hate love stories that don't end in marriage.
And so do I, Alice, exclaimed Ralph, who entered
at the moment, and for the first time Alice felt her
cheeks tingle at his approach. He had brought a
basket
,
containing a choice plant he had obtained for her,
and she laid down the annual and went with him to
the garden to see it set by his own hand.
Mrs. Courland seized upon the annual with avidity.
She had imbihed a literary taste in Boston, where the
best and happiest years of her life were passed. She
had some literary ambition too. She read the North
American Review from beginning to end, and she
fancied no conversation could be sensible or improving
that was not about books. But she had been
effectually
prevented, by the necessities of a narrow income,
and by the unceasing wants of five teasing boys, from
indulging her literary inclinations; for Mrs. Courland,
like all New England women, had been taught to
consider
domestic duties as the first temporal duties of her
sex. She had recently seen some of the native
productions
with which the press is daily teeming, and
which certainly have a tendency to dispel our early
illusions about the craft of authorship. She had even
felt some obscure intimations, within her secret soul,
that she might herself become an author. The annual
was destined to fix her fate. She opened itthe
publisher
had written the names of the authors of the
anonymous
pieces against their productions. Among
them she found some of the familiar friends of her
childhood and youth.
If, by a sudden gift of second sight, she had seen
them enthroned as kings and queens, she would not
have been more astonished. She turned to their
pieces, and read them, as perchance no one else ever
did, from beginning to endfaithfully. Not a
sentence
a
sentence! not a word was skipped. She
paused to consider commas, colons, and dashes. All
the art and magic of authorship were made level to her
comprehension, and when she closed the book, she
felt
a call
to become an author, and before she-retired to
bed she obeyed the call, as if it had been in truth, a
divinity stirring within her. In the morning she
presented
an article to
her
public, consisting of her own
family and a few select friends. All applauded, and
every voice, save one, was unanimous for publication
that one was Alice. She was a modest, prudent
girl; she feared failure, and feared notoriety still more.
Her mother laughed at her childish scruples. The
piece was sent off, and in due time graced the pages
of an annual. Mrs. Courland's fate was now decided.
She had, to use her own phrase, started in the career
of letters, and she was no Atalanta to be seduced
from her straight onward way. She was a social,
sympathetic, good hearted creature too, and she could
not bear to go forth in the golden field to reap alone.
She was, besides, a prudent woman, as most of her
countrywoman are, and the little pecuniary equivalent
for this delightful exercise of talents was not
overlooked
.
Mrs. Courland, as we have somewhere said,
had three single sistersworthy woman they were
but nobody ever dreamed of their taking to
authorship
.
She, however, held them all in sisterly
estimation
.
Their talents were magnified as the talents of
persons who live in a circumscribed sphere are apt to
be, particularly if seen through the dilating medium of
affection.
Miss Anne, the oldest, was fond of flowers, a
successful
cultivator, and a diligent student of the science
of botany. All this taste and knowledge, Mrs.
Courland
thought, might be turned to excellent account;
and she persuaded Miss Anne to write a little book
entitled Familiar Dialogues on Botany. The
second sister, Miss Ruth, had a turn for education
(bachelor's wives and maid's children are always
well taught,) and Miss Ruth undertook a popular
treatise on that subject. Miss Sally, the youngest,
was the saint of the family, and she doubted about the
propriety of a literary occupation, till her scruples were
overcome by the fortunate suggestion that her coup
d'essai should be a Saturday night book entitled
Solemn
Hours,and solemn hours they were to their
unhappy readers. Mrs. Courland next beseiged her old
mother. You know, mamma, she said, you have
such a precious fund of anecdotes of the revolution
and the French war, and you talk just like the `Annals
of the Parish,' and I am certain you can write a book
fully as good.
My child, you are distracted! I write a dreadful
poor hand, and I never learned to spellno girls did
in my time.
Spell! that is not of the least consequencethe
printers correct the spelling.
But the honest old lady would not be tempted on
the crusade, and her daughter consoled herself with the
reflection that if she would not write, she was an
admirable
subject to be written about, and her diligent
fingers worked off three distinct stories in which the
old lady figured.
Mrs. Courland's ambition, of course, embraced within
its widening circle her favourite nephew Ralph. She
had always thought him a genius, and genius in her
estimation was the philosopher's stone. In his youth
she had laboured to persuade his father to send him to
Cambridge, but the old man uniformly replied that
Ralph was a smart lad on the farm, and steady, and
by that he knew he was no genius. As Ralph's
character
was developed, and talent after talent broke forth,
his aunt renewed her lamentations over his ignoble
destiny. That Ralph was useful, good, and happy
the most difficult and rare results achieved in life
was nothing, so long as he was but a farmer in H.
Once she did half presuade him to turn painter, but
his good sense and filial duty triumphed over her
eloquence
,
and suppressed the hankerings after distinction
that are innate in every human breast from the little
ragged chimneysweep that hopes to be a
boss
, to the
political aspirant whose bright goal is the presidential
chair.
Now Mrs. Courland fancied Ralph might climb the
steep of fame without quitting his farm; occasional
authorship was compatible with his vocation. But
alas! she could not persuade Ralph to pluck the laurels
that she saw ready grown to his hand. She was not
offended, for she was the best natured woman in the
world, but she heartily pitied him, and seldom
mentioned
his name without repeating that stanza of Gray's,
inspired for the consolation of hopeless obscurity:
Full many a gem of purest ray serene, &c.
Poor Alice's sorrows we have reserved to the last,
for they were heaviest. Alice, her mother said,
was gifted; she was well educated, well informed;
she was every thing necessary to be an author. But
Alice resisted; and, though the gentlest, most
complying
of all good daughters, she would have resisted to
the deathshe would as soon have stood in a pillory as
appeared in print. Her mother, Mrs. Courland, was
not an obstinate woman, and gave up in despair. But
still our poor heroine was destined to be the victim of
this
cacoethes scribendi;
for Mrs. Courland divided
the world into two classes, or rather partsauthors and
subjects for authors; the one active, the other passive.
At first blush one would have thought the village of
H. rather a barren field for such a reaper as Mrs.
Courland, but her zeal and indefatigableness worked
wonders. She converted the stern scholastic divine
of H. into as much of a La Roche as she could describe;
a tall wrinkled bony old woman, who reminded her
of Meg Merrilies, sat for a witch; the school master
for an Ichabod Crane; a poor half witted boy was
made to utter as much pathos and sentiment and wit
as she could put into his lips; and a crazy vagrant was
a God-send to her. Then every wide spreading elm,
blasted pine, or gnarled oak, flourished on her
pages. The village church and school house stood
there according to their actual dimensions. One old
pilgrim
house was as prolific as haunted tower or
ruined abbey. It was surveyed outside, ransacked
inside
,
and again made habitable for the reimbodied
spirits of its founders.
The most kind hearted of woman, Mrs. Courland's
interests came to be so at varience with the prosperity
of the little community of H. that a sudden calamity,
a death, a funeral, were fortunate events to her. To
do her justice she felt them in a two-fold capacity.
She wept as a woman, and exulted as an author. The
days of the calamities of authors have passed by. We
have all wept over Otway and shivered at the thought
of Tasso. But times are changed. The lean sheaf is
devouring the full one. A new class of sufferers has
arisen, and there is nothing more touching in all the
memoirs Mr. D`Israeli has collected, than the trials of
poor Alice, tragi-comic though they were. Mrs.
Courland's
new passion ran most naturally in the worn
channel of maternal affection. Her boys were too
purely boys for her artbut Alice, her sweet Alice,
was pre-eminently lovely in the new light in which
she now placed every object. Not an incident of her
life but was inscribed on her mother's memory, and
thence transferred to her pages, by way of precept, or
example, or pathetic or ludicrous circumstance. She
regretted now, for the first time, that Alice had no
lover whom she might introduce among her dramatis
person. Once her thoughts did glance on Ralph,
but she had not quite merged the woman in the
author
;
she knew instinctively that Alice would be
particularly offended at being thus paired with Ralph.
But Alice's
public life
was not limited to her mother's
productions. She was the darling niece of her three
aunts. She had studied botany with the eldest, and Miss
Anne had recorded in her private diary all her
favourite's
clever remarks during their progress in the science.
This diary was now a mine of gold to her, and
faithfully
worked up for a circulating medium. But, most
trying of all to poor Alice, was the attitude in which
she appeared in her aunt Sally's solemn hours.
Every aspiration of piety to which her young lips had
given utterance was there
printed
. She felt as if she
were condemned to say her prayers in the market
place. Every act of kindness, every deed of charity,
she had ever performed, were produced to the public.
Alice would have been consoled if she had known how
small that public was; but, as it was, she felt like a
modest country girl when she first enters an apartment
hung on every side with mirrors, when, shrinking
from observation, she sees in every direction her image
multiplied and often distorted; for, notwithstanding
Alice's dutiful respect for her good aunts, and her
consciousness of their affectionate intentions, she could
not but perceive that they were unskilled painters.
She grew afraid to speak or to act, and from being the
most artless, frank, and, at home, social little creature
in the world, she became as silent and as stiff as a
statue. And, in the circle of her young associates,
her natural gaiety was constantly checked by their
winks and smiles, and broader allusions to her
multiplied
portraits; for they had instantly recognized
them through the thin veil of feigned names of persons
and places. They called her a blue stocking too;
for they had the vulgar notion that every body must
be tinged that lived under the same roof with an
author
.
Our poor victim was afraid to speak of a book
worse than that, she was afraid to touch one, and
the last Waverley novel actually lay in the house a
month before she opened it. She avoided wearing
even a blue ribbon, as fearfully as a forsaken damsel
shuns the colour of green.
It was during the height of this literary fever in the
Courland family, that Ralph Hepburn, as has been
mentioned, concentrated all his visiting there. He
was of a compassionate disposition, and he knew Alice
was, unless relieved by him, in solitary possession of
their once social parlour, while her mother and aunts
were driving their quills in their several apartments.
Oh! what a changed place was that parlour! Not
the tower of Babel, after the builders had forsaken it,
exhibited a sadder reverse; not a Lancaster school,
when the boys have left it, a more striking contrast.
Q
Mrs. Courland and her sisters were all talking
women
,
and too generous to encroach on one another's
rights and happiness. They had acquired the power
to hear and speak simultaneously. Their parlour was
the general gathering place, a sort of village exchange,
where all the innocent gossips, old and young, met
together. There are tongues in trees, and surely
there seemed to be tongues in the very walls of that
vocal parlour. Every thing there had a social aspect.
There was something agreeable and conversable in the
litter of netting and knitting work, of sewing
implements
,
and all the signs and shows of happy female
occupation.
Now, all was as orderly as a town drawing room in
company hours. Not a sound was heard there save
Ralph's and Alice's voices, mingling in soft and
suppressed
murmurs, as if afraid of breaking the chain of
their aunt's ideas, or, perchance, of too rudely jarring
a tenderer chain. One evening, after tea, Mrs.
Courland
remained with her daughter, instead of retiring,
as usual, to her writing desk.Alice, my dear, said
the good mother, I have noticed for a few days past
that you look out of spirits. You will listen to nothing
I say on that subject; but if you would try it, my dear,
if you would only try it, you would find there is
nothing
so tranquillizing as the occupation of writing.
I shall never try it, mamma.
You are afraid of being called a blue stocking.
Ah! Ralph, how are you?Ralph entered at this
moment
.Ralph,
tell me honestly, do you not think it
a weakness in Alice to be so afraid of blue stockings?
It would be a pity, aunt, to put blue stockings on
such pretty feet as Alice's.
Alice blushed and smiled, and her mother said
Nonsense, Ralph; you should bear in mind the
celebrated
saying of the Edinburgh wit`no matter how
blue the stockings are, if the petticoats are long enough
to hide them.'
Hide Alice's feet! Oh aunt, worse and worse!
Better hide her feet, Ralph, than her talentsthat
is a sin for which both she and you will have to
answer
.
Oh! you and Alice need not exchange such
significant glances! You are doing yourselves and
the public injustice, and you have no idea how easy
writing is.
Easy writing, but hard reading, aunt.
That's false modesty, Ralph. If I had but your
opportunities to collect materialsMrs. Courland did
not know that in literature, as in some species of
manufacture
,
the most exquisite productions are wrought
from the smallest quantity of raw materialThere's
your journey to New York, Ralph, she continued,
you might have made three capital articles out of
that. The revolutionary officer would have worked
up for the `Legendary;' the mysterious lady for the
`Token;' and the man in black for the `Remember
Me;'all founded on fact, all romantic and pathetic.
But mamma, said Alice, expressing in words what
Ralph's arch smile expressed almost as plainly, you
know the officer drank too much; and the mysterious
lady turned out to be a runaway milliner; and the man
in blackoh! what a theme for a pathetic story!the
man in black was a widower, on his way to Newhaven,
where he was to select his third wife from three
recommended
candidates.
Pshaw! Alice: do you suppose it is necessary to
tell things precisely as they are?
Alice is wrong, aunt, and you are right; and if she
will open her writing desk for me, I will sit down this
moment, and write a storya true storytrue from
beginning to end; and if it moves you, my dear aunt,
if it meets your approbation, my destiny is decided.
Mrs. Courland was delighted; she had slain the giant,
and she saw fame and fortune smiling on her favourite.
She arranged the desk for him herself; she prepared a
folio sheet of paper, folded the ominous margins; and
was so absorbed in her bright visions, that she did not
hear a little by-talk between Ralph and Alice, nor see
the tell-tale flush on their cheeks, nor notice the
perturbation
with which Alice walked first to one
window
and then to another, and finally settled herself to
that best of all sedativeshemming a ruffle. Ralph
chewed off the end of his quill, mended his pen twice,
though his aunt assured him printers did not mind the
penmanship, and had achieved a single line when Mrs.
Courland's vigilant eye was averted by the entrance
of her servant girl, who put a packet into her hands.
She looked at the direction, cut the string, broke the
seals, and took out a periodical fresh from the publisher.
She opened at the first articlea strangely mingled
current of maternal pride and literary triumph rushed
through her heart and brightened her face. She
whispered
to the servant a summons to all her sisters to
the parlour, and an intimation, sufficiently intelligible
to them, of her joyful reason for interrupting them.
Our readers will sympathize with her, and with
Alice too, when we disclose to them the secret of her
joy. The article in question was a clever composition
written by our devoted Alice when she was at school.
One of her fond aunts had preserved it, and aunts and
mother had combined in the pious fraud of giving it to
the public, unknown to Alice. They were perfectly
aware of her determination never to be an author.
But they fancied it was the mere timidity of an
unfledged
bird; and that when, by their innocent artifice,
she found that her pinions could soar in a literary
atmosphere
,
she would realize the sweet fluttering
sensations
they had experienced at their first flight. The
good souls all hurried to the parlour, eager to witness
the
coup de theatre
. Miss Sally's pen stood
emblematically
erect in her turban; Miss Ruth, in her haste,
had overset her inkstand, and the drops were trickling
down her white dressing, or, as she now called it,
writing-gown; and Miss Anne had a wild flower in
her hand, as she hoped, of an undescribed species,
which, in her joyful agitation, she most unluckily
picked to pieces. All bit their lips to retain their
impatient
congratulations. Ralph was so intent on his
writing, and Alice on her hemming, that neither noticed
the irruption; and Mrs. Courland was obliged twice
to speak to her daughter before she could draw her
attention.
Alice, look hereAlice, my dear.
What is it, mamma? something new of yours?
No; guess again, Alice.
Of one of my aunts, of course?
Neither, dear, neither. Come and look for
yourself
,
and see if you can then tell whose it is.
Alice dutifully laid aside her work, approached and
took the book. The moment her eye glanced on the
fatal page, all her apathy vanisheddeep crimson
overspread her cheeks, brow, and neck. She burst
into tears of irrepressible vexation, and threw the book
into the blazing fire.
The gentle Alice! Never had she been guilty of
such an ebullition of temper. Her poor dismayed
aunts retreated; her mother looked at her in mute
astonishment
;
and Ralph, struck with her emotion,
started from the desk, and would have asked an
explanation
,
but Alice exclaimedDon't say any thing
about it, mammaI cannot bear it now.
Mrs. Courland knew instinctively that Ralph would
sympathize entirely with Alice, and quite willing to
avoid an explanation, she saidSome other time,
Ralph, I'll tell you the whole. Show me now what
you have written. How have you begun?
Ralph handed her the paper with a novice's
trembling
hand.
Oh! how very little! and so scratched and
interlined
!
but never mind`c'est le premier pas qui
coute.'
While making these general observations, the good
Q 2
mother was getting out and opening her spectacles, and
Alice and Ralph had retreated behind her. Alice
rested
her head on his shoulder, and Ralph's lips were not
far from her ear. Whether he was soothing her
ruffled
spirit, or what he was doing, is not recorded.
Mrs. Courland read and re-read the sentence. She
dropped a tear on it. She forgot her literary
aspirations
for Ralph and Aliceforgot she was herself an
authorforgot every thing but the mother; and rising,
embraced them both as her dear children, and
expressed
,
in her raised and moistened eye, consent to their
union, which Ralph had dutifully and prettily asked
in that short and true story of his love for his sweet
cousin Alice.
In due time the village of H. was animated with the
celebration of Alice's nuptials: and when her mother
and aunts saw her the happy mistress of the Hepburn
farm, and the happiest of wives, they relinquished,
without a sigh, the hope of ever seeing her an
Author
.
THE ELDEST SISTER.
Lucy loved all that grew upon the ground,
And loveliness in all things living found;
The gilded flythe fern upon the wall
Were nature's works, and admirable all.
Yet not so easy was my conquest found,
I met with trouble ere with triumph crown'd.
Crabbe
.
Mr. Walsingham
was seated at his writing-desk,
absorbed in a literary labour, when Theresa, his eldest
daughter, opened his door, advanced eagerly, paused,
for a moment, arrested by his deeply thoughtful aspect,
and again advanced, as, without raising his eye from
his paper, he stretched his hand towards her and
smiled with that sweet parental smile that indicated
the father was never quite merged in the student. I
would not have interrupted you, papa, said Theresa,
but I have something so
very
important to say to
you.
Mr. Walsingham, now the sole parent of a
numerous
family of children, was as much accustomed as a
mother to the communication of the manifold wants,
that to the magnifying vision of a child are
very
important
,
and affection, and necessity, unerring teachers,
had taught him the mother's instinct, to enter
completely
into his children's feelingsto stoop to their
point of sight. Come in, Theresa, he replied to his
daughter's request, you interrupt me no more than
the passing stream is interrupted by the shadow of the
pretty flower that waves on its brink. What have
you so important to say?a letter!from whom?
From dear Mrs. Clifford, papa, and such a pressing
invitation for me to pass a few days at Bellevue.
Mr. Walsingham took the letter, but before he had
half read it, or at all replied to the eager petition of
Theresa's eyes, half a dozen of the younger children
made a sortie from the nursery; as sturdy a little band
of remonstrants as ever appeared before any tribunal.
Don't let Theresa go! papa,you must not let her
go! they cried with a unanimous voice.
Softly, softly, my childrenyou shall all be heard
in turn. Why not let her go, James?
Because, papa, it is impossible for me to get my
French lessons ready for Mr. Rabbineau if Theresa
does not assist me.
Why should not Theresa go, Julia?
Because, papa, my music master is as cross as
thunder
,
when Theresa does not help me with my
practising
.
Why should not Theresa go, Ellen?
Because, papa, she has not made but just one
complete
suit for my new doll.
Why should not Theresa go, Ned?
Because, papa, she has got to new cover my ball.
And you, little Willie, have you any reason why
you cannot let sister Theresa go away for a little
while?
Yes, indeed, papa, replied a bright eyed little
cherub, climbing into his sister's lap. I can't let
her go, because she does everything for me.
They are unskilful petitioners, Theresa, said the
father, his delight at the tribute each had involuntarily
paid the sweet elder sister gleaming in his moistened
eye. Theresa does so much for us all, my dear
children
,
he continued, that I believe we must give her
the pleasure of a visit to Bellevue. Theresa thanked
her father warmly, and soon reconciled the minds of
the young tribe to her departure, by shifting
disappointment
with expectationeasy juggling with
juvenile
subjects.
Theresa Walsingham is the eldest of eight children.
At fourteen she lost her mother. Her father,
consulting
only her good, and generously sacrificing his
own strongest inclinations, sent her away from him
for two years, to an institution where her education
was successfully conducted. At sixteen she returned
home to take the head of his family, and the place of
mother, and elder sister, to the infant band. Theresa
had no imposing personal qualifications for her official
station. We have seen overgrown girls of sixteen,
with grave aspect, and magisterial air, and solemn
voice, and dignified movement, that looked as if, like
Eve, they had been born
grown up
with nothing of
the dew and freshnessand, it may be, imperfection
of the morning of life about them. Not so with
Theresa
.
She is not a hair's breadth above the medium
of feminine height; she has a child-like air and
movement
;
a tender, flexible voice; a simplicity,
impulsiveness
,
and gaiety of manner, that betrays
inexperience
at every turn. There is nothing about her
that demands respect, but every thing that inspires
love. She is not a beauty, and yet who can look in
that bright sweet face; at that clear laughing eye;
that exquisitely compounded, ever varying red and
white, that round dimpled cheek; that sweet tempered
graceful mouth; that fair, waving, luxuriant hair
who can look at this combination, lighted up with
intelligence, and tenderly shaded by feeling, without
forgetting the rule and art of criticism, and feeling that
she
is
beautiful.
Theresa came home to the care of a large family,
without any very definite notion of what awaited her.
She loved her father devotedly. The memory of her
mother was so reverential and vivid, that it operated
like her continual presence. But next to the
everliving
fountain of love in her affectionate heart,
Theresa's
best qualification for her arduous duties was a
most happily constituted temper, a perpetual sunshine
that brightened every thing around her. This may
not be merit, but it is a singular physical felicity to
have the instrument so perfect that no jar, no shock,
no unskilful touch can put it out of tune, or bring forth
a discordant note.
Theresa has ardent affections, and strong preferences
in matters that all deem essential, but not a particle of
sensibility to those trifles at which most persons are
disquietedand disquieted in vain. She cares not
whether the day be cloudy or bright; she is
unconscious
even of the appalling difference between a
southwest
and northeast wind. Whether she rides or walks,
within walking distance, is a matter of no moment to
her. She can sit with the windows up or down, as
suits the temperament of her companions. She can
eat of any dish, cooked in any mode, with a keen
relish. She is never discontented alone; never
dissatisfied
in company; never annoyed by a creaking
hinge, or slamming door, or any other trial of delicate
nerves. I have seen her sitting in the nursery, reading
undisturbed, while her two little sisters, one on each
side, were busy with her beautiful tresses, pulling and
snarling them into masses which they called curls.
The only notice she took of them was to imprint
a half-conscious kiss on each warm ruddy cheek as
it touched hers. It was a picture of childhood, love,
grace, and beauty that a painter should have caught
and preserved.
No wonder that her father should have delighted to
see her sparkling cup of happiness full to the brim;
that he took as much pleasure in attending her to
Bellevue
as she did in going there; that the tear which
stole down her cheek at parting, opened a gushing
fountain in his hearta fountain of remembrance and
hope.
Theresa was to pass the month of June with Mrs.
Cliffordthe jubilee month of the year. Showers
and sunshine were bringing forth the prettiest and
freshest decorations of the face of nature; the birds
were in full choir; the physical and animal world all
alive to activity and joy.
Mrs. Clifford lives on a highly cultivated farm,
amidst the loveliest inland scenes of our country,
fertilised
and embellished by a river, that seems set, like
a convex mirror, to catch and reflect every visible
object. The mistress of this fair domain is a widow,
just past the meridian of life, with a large fortune, and
an only son. Her affections and interests do not, as
is common in similar cases, all flow in the maternal
channel, but are diffused like the bounties of heaven.
She is the sun of her little system, and her benevolence
is sent forth, like rays of light, in every direction,
and to every object within her sphere. She is as
genuine
an amateur of happy human faces as the good
Vicar of blessed memory, and she contrives always
either to find or make them. She has the rare felicity
of delighting her friends, and surrounding herself
with grateful and satisfied dependants. She devotes
herself to the business of making other people happy,
with as much ardor as a lawyer pursues his profession.
She is no professed reformer, and yet every body
becomes
more reasonable and amiable in her atmosphere.
She has no single form of virtue, no Procrustes
standard
;
and yet, by a kind of softening and harmonising
influence, she assimilates every thing and every body
to herself.
Mrs. Clifford is never offended, or in the least
annoyed
by the peculiarities of any individual; on the
contrary, she likes to cherish peculiarities, and bring
them out, only taking care to place them in a
favourable
light. In this benevolent art of showing her
friends in becoming lights, she excels any person I
have ever known. But philanthropic as her temper
is, she has her favourites, and first and chiefest among
these is Theresa Walsingham. She loves Theresa,
she says, for her mother's sake, who was her friend;
and for her father's, who is; and most of all, for her
own sake. There was a natural resemblance and
accord
between Mrs. Clifford and her young friend.
If Mrs. Clifford had been blessed with a daughter, one
would have expected to find her just what Theresa is;
and not having one, it was natural for her to think of
the only mode of supplying the defects of nature's
gifts. She had no definite plan, no formal design in
inviting Theresa at this time to Bellevue; but as soon
as she was quietly fixed there, she wrote to her son
Newton, then an
ostensible
student at law in New
York, to remind him that his absence had been already
too long; that strawberries were ripe; that Bellevue
had put on its holiday suit, its many coloured robe,
and that he must come home.
From this moment Theresa heard of nothing but
Newton's expected arrival. If an excursion was planned,
or an extraordinary pleasure designed, it was deferred
'till Mr. Clifford should come. Every thing was done,
or left undone in reference to him. It is dull enough
at Bellevue just now, Theresa, Mrs. Clifford said,
and repeated, but when Newton comes he will make
it all up to us. Yes, chimed in half a dozen
cordial
and sincere voices, Newton is the soul of
Bellevue
,
that he is.
Fortunate and gifted must be that person who can
sustain the excitation of spirits occasioned by the
anticipation
of an important arrival in the country!
Theresa was one morning rambling alone along the
river's side. She pursued a shaded footpath, 'till she
came out upon a fisherman's hut, on the very verge of
the water. A rheumatic, sickly-looking girl was
sitting
at the door, making artificial flies for angling.
They were executed with taste and sufficient skill, and
Theresa, after a kind greeting, seated herself, and
R
watched the progress of the girl's work, and expressed
her admiration of her success in no measured terms.
Sympathy is the electric touch. Lilly, for that was
the girl's name, Lilly was delighted; never had her
fingers worked more dexterously, and never did tongue
speak more promptly than her's replied to Theresa's
questions of how she learned her art, where she
procured
her materials, &c.
Mr. Newton Clifford had been at all the trouble of
getting an old German to come all the way from New
York to teach her. Mr. Newton had sent her full
twenty dollars worth of materials. Mr. Newton, God
bless himand the benediction was not uttered as a
phrase of custom, but with an intonation of deep
feeling
Mr.
Newton had done every thing for her father,
and herself, and little Ben. Had not Miss ever
heard about Mr. Newton Clifford and little Ben?
Theresa confessed she had not; and Lilly dropped her
work, and told with such minuteness and emotion, as
called forth exclamations and even tears from her
pretty auditorhow little Ben, her only brother, a
smart daring little fellow, had paddled his father's
boat into the middle of the river; and how, in trying
to regain the shore, he had fallen into the stream near
the milldam; how Mr. Newton, in spite of every
body begging him, and screaming to him not to
venture
in so near the mill-damevery body but herself
and she looked on and could not speak a word; how
he had plunged in and grasped little Ben, but so near
the dam, that they both went over together, Mr.
Newton's
arm fast clasped round Ben; and how he brought
him to the shore, though both were like the dead when
they got there!
Sensibility and gratitude are always eloquent, and
what girl of seventeen would not be moved by a
generous
deed, achieved by a living hero of twenty? Day
after day Theresa stole down to the fisherman's cottage.
She assisted Lilly at her pretty work; she even
improved
on the poor girl's skill, and under reiterated
promises of secrecy, helped her make a beautiful
collection
of flies, which were designed for a welcoming
gift for Mr. Newton Clifford.
Theresa's lively imagination seized all the traits that
were presented of Clifford by his partial friends, and
combined from them a beautiful portrait, coloured with
the rich and delicate hues of her own genuine feeling,
and pure and elevated taste. Was the portrait a
likeness
?
Was this young dream to be verified by the
reality? Was the spirit of her imagination, resembling
nothing she had seen in life, to be embodied in the
heroic personNewton Clifford?
Every successive day Clifford was expected, and
each day's mail brought some trivial excuse for his
delay. A fortnight of the time allotted for Theresa's
visit had already expired. Mrs. Clifford's habitual
serenity was slightly overclouded, and there were
moments
when Theresa, to a keen observer, would have
betrayed the condition of one who
waits
, a most
unenviable
state.
She took one day her customary stroll to the
fisherman's
hut. She had completely won Lilly's heart;
indeed, Theresa played the game of life so well, that
she won all hearts.
Her humble friend testified her affection, as women
of every age and condition are apt to do, by setting
the crown matrimonial on the brow of her favourite
and in this case it was, in her estimation,
the
crown
of glory.
If matches are made in heaven, she said, as her
busy fingers were plying at her work, I know what
is to happen.
What do you mean, Lilly? asked Theresa,
blushing
at the slight disingenuousness of asking what she
well knew.
Oh, Miss, you and Mr. Newton are so much alike
you even look alike. To be sure, he is very tall,
and you are short, but that difference there should be;
and he is very dark, and you are pure red and white,
and that difference there should be; and his hair is jet
black, and yours a sunny brown; and his eyes are
hazle, and yours are blue as the sky, and that difference
is prettiest of all.
Theresa laughed heartily, and asked, Pray, where
is the resemblance, Lilly?
Oh, Miss, it's
that
look.
Lilly was right and true to nature in her perception
of harmony in discords.
It was after this last walk and conversation that
Theresa returned to Bellevue, and entered the house
heated, flushed, and tired. She strolled into the
parlour
,
and went up to the glass to adjust her hair, which
had fallen in disorder over her neck and face, and
reflected
in the mirror she saw the figure of a young
man stretched on the sofa, with a book in his hand,
that had the aspect of a fresh novel. Theresa's colour,
deep as it was, deepened to an impurpled crimson.
She felt as if she were under a gorgon spell. She
could not turn, and nothing, she felt, could be more
awkward and silly than to remain as she was. She
ventured a second glance at the image, and a third and
scurutinising one, for she now perceived that the young
gentleman was, or affected to be asleep. This must
be Newton Clifford, thought Theresa, the figure,
hair, complexion, features, all correspond exactly with
the description, but, oh how unlike what I expected!
and if she had been addicted to tears, she would have
shed them at her disappointment; but Theresa's
temper
was entirely of the
l'allegro
cast, and she laughed,
laughed aloud and heartily. Clifford, for it was he,
Clifford awoke, and his mother entering at the moment,
after casting a look of surprise at Miss Walsingham,
and of reproof at the recumbent and nonchalant attitude
of her son, formally introduced them to each other.
Theresa whirled round on her toe, laughed again, and
then flew away like a bird startled from its perch.
For heaven's sake! my dear mother, asked
Clifford
,
who is this hoydenish Blowzabella?
Who? have I not just introduced her to you,
Newton
?
Theresa Walsingham.
Heaven forefend! I thought you said so, but I could
not credit my ears. I expected to see Miss
Walsingham
a fashionable, thorough-bred girl; this little rude
concern looks as if she had just come in from a bout
at haymakingheighho! what time is it? He looked
at an exquisite little watch, that, suspended by a safety
chain, was tucked into his waistcoat pocket; Eleven
o'clock; this country air is a delicious opiate, mother,
and then yawning and falling back from his half
recumbent
posture on the sofa cushions, he relapsed into
his broken slumbers, leaving Mrs. Clifford looking and
feeling much like a child, who has blown a soap
bubble
,
seen it expand and brighten, and then suddenly
vanish into thin air.
Mrs. Clifford was not consoled by being able in
part to guess the cause of Theresa's merriment, for,
even to a mother's eye, there was an appalling
disparity
between the present appearance of her son and
the
beau-ideal
that had been pourtrayed to Theresa.
Eight months before, Newton Clifford had gone to
New York, simple but not rustic in his taste, dress
and manners. His fortune and connections in life had
cast him into the most fashionable society, and
accident
rather than choice had involved him in an
intimacy
with an ultra-fashionable young man of his own
age, and a married lady of
haut-ton
. Both these
persons, unfortunately for Clifford, happened to be
gifted by nature with uncommon talent, which was
all employed in giving to the follies and insipidities of
fashion a certain interest, grace and brilliancy. The
great philosophical truth that knowledge is power, is
never more strikingly illustrated than by the influence
that a woman of a
certain
age (that
per se
most
uninteresting
R 2
period of life) exercises over a young man of
ardent feeling and lively imagination.
The narrow limits of our story will not permit us to
enter into any of the details of Clifford's fashionable
training. Suffice it that he returned to Bellevue an
ultraist of the beau-monde, disdaining whatever was
simple and natural as much as a thorough-bred amateur
of the Italian opera disdains sweet wood notes wild.
He was dressed in the extreme of the dominant fashion.
We cannot describe the particulars, for we have no
place in our memory for the coxcombries of five years
since, but his whole array was equivalent to a
Broadway
exquisite of the present season. Oliver's curled
and frizzed imitation of Hyperion's curls; the
boundless
contiguity of hairs, called whiskers; the checked
dishabille linen; the Jubilee stock; the diamond
studs; the webfooted (we presume to propose the
descriptive epithet) the webfooted pantaloon; the
person garnished with certain feminine favours, pretty
trophies, such as fantastical emblematic finger rings, a
porphyry smelling bottle, appended to the ribbon of a
quizzing glass; and filled with
mousseline ambre
or
some other exquisite perfume; an almost (would it
were quite so!) an almost invisible snuff box, with
Irish blackguard; and in short all other marks of the
most refined dandyism, imperceptible to an unpractised
eye, and indescribable by an untechnical pen. And
this was the person that, brought into sudden contrast
with the heroic image in Theresa's mind, placed her
sweet fancies in so ludicrous a light, and put them to
so disorderly a flight. Theresa had, in common with
all rational beings, men and women, an instinctive
aversion to the unmanly species called dandiesthese
poor and only worshippers of the image of humanity
which they themselves have set up; a dull variety of
the monkey race, bearing a resemblance to man,
mortifying
to the veritable lords of the creation, and no
way honourable to themselves.
Dandyism was a sympathetic, not a constitutional
disease with Clifford; this Theresa did not know, for
she had only seen him when the fit was on him,
but his mother did. At another time she would have
quietly waited for the paroxysm to pass off, but now
she had wise and long cherished hopes at stake, and
she felt too much either to be, or to appear
philosophical
.
Clifford's sagacity had penetrated the secret
of his mother's wishes, without her having expressly
communicated them, and knowing that he was a
favourite
of fortune, and being conscious of qualities that
were at present quite hidden under his masquerade
dress, and obscured by his temporary indifference to
the simple pleasures of home and life, it was not an
evidence of very extravagant self love that he should
suspect Theresa of partaking his mother's views, and
should consequently be as shy of her as the bird is of
the decoy he has discovered to be set for him.
Fortunately
there was no pondering of the matter in our
happy heroine's gay and innocent heart; she was not
disturbed by even a suspicion of Clifford's mental
conclusions. Her elastic spirit soon rose from the
first pressure of disappointment, and she returned
with her usual animation to her accustomed pleasures.
She thought Mr. Clifford a very conceited,
disagreeable
person; that Bellevue had been far pleasanter
without him; that he was the last man in the world
that
if
she ever did marry (a supposition a young lady
is apt to make mentally,) the last man in the world
she would marry!
Theresa had yet to learn that there is nothing in
this uncertain life more uncertain than the final
resolution
of a young lady of seventeen!
Clifford soon perceived that there was nothing
affected
nor equivocal in her indifference to him, and he
was piqued by it. His natural tastes revived in the
salutary atmosphere of home. He observed Theresa
more attentively, and to observe was to feel the
attraction
of her loveliness. He caught himself, when he
heard her laugh breaking forth in a distant part of the
house, (never was a laugh more heartfelt and musical,)
starting forward to listen, and involuntarily responding
a faint echo; and once, when she was patting the neck
of a spirited little black pony, on which she had been
taking a solitary morning ride, he was betrayed into
kissing, with real emotion, the whitest, most deeply
dimpled and prettiest hand in the world.
These and some other trifling circumstances began
to intimate that a change was coming o'er the spirit
of his dream; still he was not so deeply interested as
to demonstrate Rosalind's infallible signs; the hose
ungartered, the bonnet unbanded, the shoe
untied, the careless desolation; but he was still
point device in all his accoutrements. A pastoral
hero may love without hope; but not so a fashionable
young man of twenty-one.
Newton Clifford's love, for he did actually, and that
in a few days, feel an irresistible attraction towards
Theresa; his love was of the most confident nature.
It was true that from day to day Theresa perceived
more and more of his agreeable qualities coming out,
and once or twice it crossed her mind that she should,
if she had not expected so muchat timesshe should
think Newton Clifford quite interesting.
In the meantime the period of her visit was drawing
to a close. Mrs. Clifford, who was eagerly watching
the signs of the times, wrote to Theresa's father to beg
an extension of her visit; one week more was granted,
but
then
the order of return was peremptory.
On the day before her departure, Theresa went to
take leave of her friend Lilly. She had been to the
cottage but once before since Clifford's arrival. On
that occasion she went to cull from the collection of
flies designed for him, those she had made. The little
fly manufacturer remonstrated, but in vain. Theresa
possessed herself of them, and strewed them to the
winds.
As she now approached the hut, she heard voices.
Clifford was speaking in a tone of animated kindness
to his poor proteg. This is just what I fancied
Clifford was before I saw him, thought Theresa, and
that very thought made her pause at the threshold of
the door, from an undefined feeling of awkwardness.
While she stood there she heard Lilly say, Here are
some flies, Mr. Newton, which I made for a present
for you, if any thing can be called a present that I
give to you. Clifford expressed his gratitude by
admiring
them extravagantly, and then selecting one,
This, he exclaimed, is the very prettiest I ever
saw. I can almost believe, with the poor little fish,
that it is a real fly. If you could make me a dozen
such as this, Lilly, for a friend of mine?
Lilly stammered in her reply. Oh! thought
Theresa, who rightly conjectured that it was one of
her own manufacture accidentally left among Lilly's;
Oh, the silly girl will certainly betray me. Poor
Lilly was confounded between the obligation of her
promise to Miss Walsingham, on no account to betray
her agency in the manufacture, the feminine desire of
permitting the secret to
evolve
, and the necessity of
confessing that she could not make flies equal to the
specimen in Mr. Clifford's hand. In this dilemma she
did what any other simple girl would have done, smiled,
blushed, and faltered, and said she would do her very
best for Mr. Newton, but she could no way in the world
make anything so pretty, her fingers were stiffened
with the rheumatism, and besides, they were never
handy enough for such a piece of work as that.
Then you did not make this particular one, Lilly;
who in the name of wonder did?
Before Lilly could reply, and with the intention of
preventing her, Theresa entered, but poor Lilly, far as
she was from all duplicity, was betrayed by her
surprise
and confusion, into keeping the promise to the
ear, and breaking it to the sense. She cast a speaking
glance at Theresa, hung down her head, laughed
outright
,
and turned away. Theresa blushed too, and
was quite too much embarrassed, and provoked that
she was embarrassed, to make any explanation, while
Clifford with the utmost complacency bowed in
acknowledgement
to her, and taking out a small tablet
case, deliberately placed the fly between its leaves.
At any rate, exclaimed Theresa, half amused and
half vexed, and unintentionally verifying Newton's
fortunate conjecture, at any rate, Mr. Clifford, I did
not mean that you should have it.
Perhaps not. We anglers, Miss Theresa, can
never foresee exactly which fish will bite when we
bait our hook.
An older, a more scrupulous, or more fastidious lady
than Theresa Walsingham, might have found
something
offensive in this perhaps, this allusion to
angling and baiting, but it was not in character
for her to weigh and sift words; she really did not
perceive any particular meaning in Clifford's; the
secret being out, she had no farther concern about the
matter. She had never seen him so animated, natural,
and pleasing, and after chiding Lilly for betraying
her, and kindly slipping into her hand a farewell gift,
she returned with Clifford to Bellevue, but not till
Lilly had contrived to say aside to himKeep the
fly for a luck-penny, as they call it, Mr. Newton.
Her eye followed them, till she lost sight of them
under the shadows of the lindens that grew on the
river's side, she weaving, the while, the web of destiny,
as dexterously as a weird sister.
It was
not
one of the fairest days of summer, but
the spirits of seventeen and twenty-one are not
tempered
by the weathergage. A dyspeptic may look at
the sky and the vane before he smiles, but our gay
pair were in a humour to smile in spite of clouds or
storms. Clifford was flattered and elated by the little
incident of the morning. It had confirmed all his
prepossessions. He had discovered that he was under
the influence of Theresa's attractions. He had made
up his mind, at the first propitious moment to tell his
love; that moment had arrived, and with it came, not
doubts of his success, but some natural shrinkings.
He began by speaking of her return in a desperate
tone of voice; she replied, but not in an according
key.
Then you will have no regrets at leaving
Bellevue
?
he said half reproachfully.
Indeed I shall! There is no place in the world I
love so well, but home; and there is nobody I love
so well as Mrs. Clifford, but papa.
Nobody! echoed Clifford with a look and tone of
voice that was meant to convey a word of meaning;
can no one rival them in your heart, Theresa?
Oh the children! of course; I doat on the children;
and Willie, my pet Willie, oh, I shall never love any
thing half so much as I love Willie.
Are you quite certain of that? asked Clifford.
Yes, perfectly, she replied in the same careless
manner.
Is this coquetry, the firstlast sin of a pretty
woman
,
or is it truth and nature? thought Clifford; but
before he had solved the riddle, and as they emerged
from the shaded walk into the open grounds, they
were joined by his mother, who coming from a
different
direction, was, like them, bending her steps
towards
home.
Her maternal eye read the deep interest that was
legible on her son's countenance; and Theresa's cheek
bright with exercise and spirits, spoke the
confirmation
of her hopes. The dear child has reason to feel
happy, was the mother's thought, and vexed that she
had interrupted a tte--tte that she believed could be
verging but to one conclusion, she said something
about old people being in the way, and was
hurrying
past them; but Theresa slipt her arm into Mrs.
Clifford's and detained her; I do not know how it
may be with old people, she said, but I am sure any
party is the pleasanter for having you in it. Mrs.
Clifford, half gratified at her favourite's affection, and
half vexed at the inopportune moment she had taken
to evince it, was obliged to yield to the gentle
constraint
of Theresa's arm, and walk beside her. But
her mind, still on one thought intent, she gave
Clifford a bunch of flowers she had been culling during
her walk. There, said she, Newton, when I was
young, lovers of common ingenuity would have
discoursed
with those flowers for an hour, without
articulating
a word.
I am ignorant of their language, mother, but if
you will teach me, I will endeavour to profit by your
instructions.
Attend to me then, and do not be looking at
Theresa
;
she knows nothing at all of the matter. There
is a passion flower, the emblem of hope; there a little
bachelor's button, `hope even in the depths of
misery;' that hollow hearted fox glove is insincerity;
that wild geranium, cruelty; the honeysuckle, fidelity;
periwinkle, friendship, a poor article when you want
love; the Lavender confession`She,
Lavender
to
him sent, owning her love,' Hope, cruelty, fidelity!
&c. It would be a poor brain that could not make a
moving tale from these cabalistic words.
But, said Theresa in all simplicity, there is no
emblem for love, and that is the basis of all the rest.
True, true, most true, my dear Theresa, replied
Mrs. Clifford, smiling, but I passed over the rosebud,
for I thought the simplest, most unlearned in the floral
vocabulary, knew that meant a declaration of love;
and so it should, for it unfolds into what is sweetest
and most beautiful in nature.
True love, ma'am, you mean? asked Theresa;
and it was a
bona fide
inquiry.
Mrs. Clifford laughed, Newton thrust the rosebud,
which he seemed for the last minute to have been
most critically examining, into his bosom, and they all
mounted the steps to the piazza, where half a dozen of
the family were assembled awaiting them.
The following morning was the morning of
Theresa's
departure. Mrs. Clifford, as she had before
promised, and Mrs. Clifford's son, which had not
before
been indicated, were to attend her home. As
they left the town of Bellevue, on their way to the
pier, where they were to embark in the steamboat,
Theresa turned to give one parting look to the
beautiful
flowers that in unlimited profusion embellished
the place. Oh! she exclaimed, I wish I had
thought to gather a bouquet to take with me.
Clifford offered to repair her omission, and turned
again up the avenue, and did not rejoin the ladies till
they had nearly reached the shore. Oh, said
Theresa
,
as she took the flowers from him, have you
been gone so long and got nothing but buds! What
possessed him, she continued, to put in this little
withered wild rosebud among these fresh ones? and
she threw it away, and cooly tucked the stems of the
rest under her belt riband; the withered bud was that
which Clifford had the day before put into his bosom,
and he had now added it to the bouquet; to him it
seemed instinct with the feelings of the heart which
had been throbbing against it for the last twelve hours.
Fortunately he had walked on, as if to look out for the
boat, and did not hear her, but his mother did, and
exclaimed in a tone of reproach Theresa! Theresa
thought her displeasure related solely to the bouquet.
Dear Mrs. Clifford, she said, kissing her in her own
affectionate manner, do not be angry with me; there is,
I own it, there is nothing so precious as moss rosebuds.
Mrs. Clifford always obeyed the French rule,
S
Whenever there are two interpretations of a phrase,
receive the most agreeable. My own dear, dear
child! she exclaimed, returning Theresa's embrace
with a warmth and emotion she did not at all
comprehend
,
and which was not rendered more intelligible
by the delighted gaze, with which, as she turned, she
perceived Clifford was surveying them. Some
acquaintances
appeared at this moment, and no farther
explanation was then possible, as they were
immediately
transferred to the thronged deck of a
steamboat
.
Theresa was in irrepressible spirits, and for this,
Mrs. Clifford and her son had but one interpretation.
The one had perhaps forgotten, and the other never
yet learned, that all deep emotions are serious. The
truth was, Theresa had forgotten the conventional
language of the rosebuds; her mind was preoccupied
with home images; no brain-woven romance, but with
filial thoughts of her beloved father, and of the eager
eyes and glad hearts of the little tribe awaiting her.
Such a heart as Theresa's, so full of delicate, strong,
and unchanging affections, was not to be lightly won,
and this Clifford was yet to learn at the expense of
well requited sacrifices.
Secure for the present in the estimate of all he had
to confer, and in the assurance of a self-complacency
that no disappointment had ever yet disturbed, he
retired to a solitary corner of the cabin to enjoy, in
writing to her, a more exclusive and satisfactory
communion
with Theresa, than he could amid the throng
that encompassed her on the deck.
The letter was a joyous rhapsody; the interpreter
of his soul, and faithful to its fires; full of blissful
feelings and blissful hopes. He filled it, crossed it,
enclosed, and sealed it with the well known device of
a laurel leaf, and the motto, Je ne change qu'en
mourant; a motto presumptuously applied to many a
passion that has had even a briefer existence than a
summer's leaf.
Thus prepared, the letter awaited an auspicious
moment for delivery. That moment arrived, when
Clifford handed Theresa from the carriage that had
conveyed her from the boat to her father's door.
This speaks for me, he whispered, I will be
with you again in ten minutes. But joyous shouts
and bounding steps were already ringing in Theresa's
ears, and she heard nothing else, and did not think
again of Clifford, till in
less
than ten minutes he
returned
,
expecting to find Theresa awaiting to
reciprocate
the expression of those sentiments of which he
had just communicated the delightful certainty. She
was there, seated on her father's knee, recounting the
pleasures of her jaunt; her pet Willie stood beside her
on the sofa, his curly head lying fondly on her
shoulder
,
and one little mischievous hand picking unheeded,
one by one, the rosebuds from her waist, and
throwing
them on the floor, where two or three of the little
urchins were dividing the spoil. The letterthe
letter on which was suspended the destiny of life, had
been dropped and forgotten by Theresa, who had
never given it one glance, and if one thought, had
supposed it to be one of the numerous
unimportant
packages belonging to her. Her sister Ellen, a
busy, prying little daughter of Eve, had picked it
up, torn off the seal, and at the moment Clifford
entered was uttering a sort of jargon which she called
reading it. Never, at any moment of her life, had
Theresa looked more lovely than now, when her
sweet face was lighted with the glow of those
innocent
and tender affections that are kindled at Nature's
altar, and inspired by the breath of the Almighty.
But Clifford had looked for something far more
precious in his eyes, and mortified and disappointed,
he was scarcely conscious of Mr. Walsingham's polite
reception; hardly comprehended his words as he said,
You are deafened by the noisy joy of my children;
they are half wild at the return of their elder sister;
and I, he added, wiping his moistened eyes, am
hardly less a child than any one of them. Clifford
in vain struggled to reply and to recover his
self-possession
.
Fortunately, all were too much occupied
with their own sensations to observe his, and he seized
his unread letter, thrust it into his pocket, and made
his escape.
I know not what, if any, explanation followed, but
three years subsequent I met the same parties at
Bellevue. Clifford then with a slight abatement for a
very youthful imagination, might have realized the
early visions of Theresa. The few dregs of folly in
his composition, had in the first fermentation risen to
the surface, and worked off. How much he might
have been indebted to the purifying influence of le
grand sentiment, (for who shall define or limit its
power,) we know not, but with all our preference for
our heroine, we must confess he was worthy of her
true and tender heart.
Of his dandyism there was no relic, save the
identical
safety chain he had formerly worn; but instead
of the fantastic watch appended to it, I discovered,
(though it was scrupulously worn beneath the vest,)
the little fly so elaborately wrought by Theresa, and
of which, no doubt, he was well informed of the
consecrating
history. As to Theresa, she was unchanged;
the same spontaneous flow of rich feelings, the same
beautiful simplicity of character and naturalness, made
more graceful, but not in the least impaired or obscured
by the polish of the world.
One visible change indeed there was, and it was
expressed in the quick mutations of Theresa's beautiful
colour; in the tender drooping of her eye; in word and
action. A stronger, deeper, more controlling
sentiment
had taken possession of her heart than filial love,
or than the affectionate devotion of an
Eldest Sister
.
S 2
ST. CATHARINE'S EVE.
All is best though oft we doubt,
What th' unsearchable dispose
Of highest wisdom brings about,
And ever best found in the close.
Milton
.
On trouve dans la chronique de Raoul, Abb de Coggeshall, sous
cette anne (1201) une histoire touchante qui montre  quel point
l'enseignement religieux pouvoit tre perverti, et combien le Clerg
toit loin d'tre le gardien des murs publiques.
Early
in the 13th century Agnes de Meran, the
mistress-wife of Philip Augustus, held her court at the
Chateau des roses Sur-Seine, not many leagues from
Paris. The arts and luxuries of the time were
lavished
on this residence of the favourite. On one side
of the Chateau, and leading out of the garden attached
to it, was a winding walk, embowered by grape vines
which, not being native in the north of France, and the
art by which the gardener now triumphs over soil and
climate being then in its infancy, were cultivated with
great pains and royal expense. The walk, after
extending
some hundred yards, opened on a sloping
ground, bounded by the Seine, and tastefully planted
with shrubs and vines formed into arbours and bowers
of every imaginable shape. The whole plantation
was called
Larigne
. Parallel to a part of it ran the
highway, hidden by a wall, excepting where it
traversed
an arched stone bridge that spanned the Seine,
and which was itself almost embowered by tall acacias,
planted at either end of it.
Late in the afternoon of a September day, when the
warm air was perfumed with autumnal fruits, and the
sun glancing athwart the teeming vines, shot its silver
beams across the green sward, and seemed, by some
alchemy of the flowers to become molten gold as it
touched their leaves, tinted with deep autumnal dyes;
two ladies, followed by a Moorish servant girl, issued
from the walk.
The eldest was tall and thin. The soft round lines
of youth had given place to the angles of forty; but
though she had lost the beauty, she had retained the
grace (happily that charm is perennial) of youth, and
added to it the fitting quality of matronly dignity.
Born in Provence, she was an exception to the
general
hue of its natives, her complexion having an
extreme
fairness, and a texture as delicate as that of
infancy
.
She had that organ, to which the Phrenologist
is pleased to assign the religious sentiment, strikingly
developed; but a surer indication of a tendency to
spiritual abstraction, was expressed in her deep set,
intellectual, and rather melancholy eye. Her mouth,
when closed, expressed firmness and decision, but,
when in play, the gentlest and tenderest of human
affections; and the voice that proceeded from it was
the organ of her soul, and expressed its divine essence
love. Such was the lady Clotilde  the martyr,
who would have been the canonized saint, had she died
in the bosom of the orthodox church.
The other female was a girl of sixteen, Rosalie, the
daughter of Clotilde, and resembling her in nothing
but the purity and spirituality of her expression. Her
complexion was of the tint which the vulgar call fair,
and the learned Thebans in such matters, brunette; her
eyes were the deepest blue, and her eye-lashes long and
so black, that in particular lights they imparted their
hue to her eyes. Her hair, we are told, was of the
colour that harmonized with her skin  what that hue
was we are left to imagine. Her features, neck, and
whole person (the feet and hands are dilated on with
a lover's prolixity) the chronicle describes as cast in
beauty's mould, so that he who once looked on this
fair ladye Rosalie saw imperfection in all other
creatures
.
Rosalie led, by her hand, a little girl of four years, a
cherub in beauty.
Why, dear mama, said Rosalie, are you so silent
and thoughtful?  and tell me  pray  why were
you so cold to our sweet lady queen to-day, when she
bade us prepare the fete for the king?  I would not
pry into secrets, but when she spake low to you, did
she not say something of sad looks not suiting
festive
days?
She did, Rosalie  and yet she well knows they
are but too fitting. Let us seat ourselves here, my
child, and while Zeba looks after Marie I will entrust
you with what is better suited to your discretion than
your years.  She beckoned to Zeba to relieve them
from the child, but little Marie, a petted favourite of
Rosalie's sprang on the bench and clung around her
neck, till she was won away by a promise of a game
of hide and go seek, among the vines and shrubs.
Rosalie, continued the mother, pointing to Marie,
that child is not the offspring of a union which man
deems honourable, and calls marriage, and which it
pleases heaven, my child, to authorize to humanity in
some stages of its weakness and ignorance, but she is
I hesitate to speak it to your pure ears  the fruit of
illicit love.
Mother! what mean you?  She is surely the
child of our good lord king and of his wife  our lady
Agnes and our queen?
Our lady Agnes de Meran, Rosalie, but not his
wife  nor our rightful queen.
You should not have told me this!  you should
not have told me this! reiterated Rosalie, covering
her eyes from which the tears gushed, I loved her
so well!  and Marie!  oh you should not have told
me!
My dear Rosalie, I have withheld it as long as I
dared. The world to you is as a paradise, and I shrunk
from exposing to you the traces of sin and evil that are
upon it. But eviltemptation must approach you, and
how are you to resist it, if you know not its existence?
Listen patiently, my dear child. There is much in
the story of our lady to excuse her with those
compromising
consciences that weigh sin against
temptation
;
and much to make her pitied by those who
weigh the force of temptation against the weakness of
humanity.
I am sure I shall pity her, interrupted Rosalie.
Beware, my child. Pity, the gentlest spirit of
heaven, sometimes loses her balance in leaning too far
on the side of humanity.
But pity is heaven-born, dear mother.
Clotilde did not reply, for she had not the heart
to repress the instincts of Rosalie's affections; and
Rosalie added, I am sure our lady Agnes has sinned
unwittingly.
Alas, my child!  But listen  I must make my
tale a brief one. Our royal master, who in his festive
hours appears to us so kind and gracious, is stained
with crimes, miscalled virtues by his blind guides and
false friends.
Crimes
, mother?
Yes, Rosalie, crimes  persecution and murder
misnamed, by his uncle of Rheims, zeal  cruelty,
rapine
,
excess, and what I will not name to thy maiden
ears. He was anointed king in the blood of his
subjects  for
les fetes de la Toussaint
, when he was
crowned, were scarcely past when, set on by the
Archbishop
,
he commanded his soldiers to surround the
synagogues of the Jews, on their Sabbath-day, to drag
them to prison, and rob them of their gold and silver
to replenish the coffers which his father Louis had
emptied for offerings to the church. The Jews hoped
it was a passing storm, but the king ordered them to
sell all they possessed, and with their wives and little
ones to leave his dominions. Their property was
sacrificed
,
not sold, and our royal master received the
benedictions of the priests! The next objects of his
zeal were the violators of the third commandment
the poor were drowned  the rich paid a fine into the
king's treasury, for as our chronicle of St. Denis hath
it, the king holds `
en horreur et abomination ces
horribles sacremens que ces gloutons joueurs de des
font souvent en ces cours, et ces tavernes
.'
But, dear mother, was he not right to punish
such?
To fine the rich, and drown the poor, Rosalie?
Rosalie perceived that her shield was ineffectual,
and her mother proceeded, but not till she had
cautiously
looked around her. To fill up the measure
of his obedience to sacerdotal pride and hatred, he
published an edict renewing the persecution against
the Paterins.
The Paterins, mother?
Clotilde smiled faintly at her daughter's
interrogatory
.
The name of these much abused people you
have not yet heard, for it is a perilous one to speak in
our court; but they are the followers of those pious
men who, having obeyed the commands of their Lord,
and searched the Scriptures, have changed their faith
and reformed their morals. They differ somewhat
among themselves, having entered into the glorious
liberty of the gospel, and being no longer bound to
uniformity by the bulls of the Pope or the word of
the Priest. They have all been marked by the purity
of their lives  a few by their austerity. Some among
them eat no meat, and others deem even marriage
criminal.
Mother! exclaimed Rosalie, in a tone that
indicated
a revelation had burst upon her.
I read your thoughts, Rosalie  yes  I am a
Paterin
.
Here in the very bosom of the court I cherish
the faith for which many that I loved were cast into
prison, and afterwards `made (I still quote from our
Court Chronicle) to pass through material flames to the
eternal flames which awaited them!'
And was it such as you, my mother, asked
Rosalie, pressing her cheek to Clotilde's, that thus
suffered?
Such, and far better, Rosalie; and who, she added,
the ecstasy of faith irradiating her fine countenance,
who would shrink from the brief material fire through
which there is a sure passage to immediate and eternal
glory?
If there are moments of
presentiment
when the
future dawns upon the mind with all the vividness of
actual presence, this was one to Rosalie. She threw
her arms around her mother's neck and said in a
trembling
voice, God guard my mother!
He has guarded me, replied the lady Clotilde,
gently unlocking Rosalie's arms, and will while it is
best that I continue like the prophet safe in a den of
lions. `Take no thought for the morrow,' Rosalie.
But I have been led far away from my main
purpose
,
which was to give you a brief history of the lady
Agnes.
Our lord the king had contracted a marriage with
Isemburg of Denmark, daughter of Waldemar le Grand.
On his progress to receive her, he visited the castle
of one of the Duke of Meranie's adherents, where a
tournament was holding. His rank was carefully
concealed
.
He was announced in the lists as
le
Chevalier
affiance
, and his motto was
la bonne
`
esperance
.'
Our lady Agnes  then in her sixteenth
year  just your present age  presided as queen of
love and beauty. Philip was thrice victorious, and
thrice crowned by the lady Agnes. At the third time
there were vehement demands that his visor should be
removed. He appealed to Berchtold, the father of our
lady, and prayed permission to preserve his incognito
to all but the lady Agnes, to whom, if she were
attended
by only one of her ladies, he would disclose
his name and rank. Berchtold allowing that nought
should be refused to the brave and all conquering
knight, granted the private audience of his daughter,
and she selected me from among her ladies to attend
her. Philip, affianced to another, and confessing
himself
bound to keep the letter of his faith, violated its
spirit. He declared himself passionately in love with
our lady, and vowed eternal faith to her.  Our poor
lady, smitten with love, received and returned his
vows. The marriage with Isemburg was celebrated
four days after.
Was he
married
to Isemburg?
Yes, if that may be called marriage, Rosalie, which
is a mere external rite  where there is no union of
heart  where vows are made to be broken.
This surely is most sinful  but not so when hearts
as well as hands are joinedthink you, mother?
The lady Clotilde proceeded without a reply to her
daughter's interrogatory. It was told through
Christendom
that the king of France, on receiving the hand
of the beautiful Isemburg, was seen to turn pale and
tremble, and shrink from her; and when her rare
beauty and her many graces were thought on, there
was much marvelling, and many there were who
attributed
the strange demeanour of the king to sorcery!
The lady Agnes and I alone knew the solution of the
mystery.  Eighty days after the marriage he appealed
for a divorce to bishops and archbishops assembled at
at Compeignehis own servile tools. The marriage
was annulled on a mere pretext, and immediately
followed
by the outward forms of marriage with our fair
lady.
I comprehend not these matters; but, mother,
were not the lawful forms observed?
Rosalie! beware how in your tenderness for your
mistress you confound right and wrong. Priests may
not, at their pleasure, modify the law of God. The
rules of holy writ are few and inflexible.  Isemburg
denied the validity of the divorce, and retired to a
convent. The Pope, from worldly policy, has
maintained
her part. An interdict was lain upon the
kingdom
.
Marriages and interments in consecrated ground
were forbidden. Weeping and mourning pervaded
Philip's dominionsall for this guilty marriage. Then
followed reconciliation with the Popethen fresh
animosities and perjuriesand through all Philip has
adhered to our lady.
Faithful in that, at least, mother.
Yes, faithful where faith was not due. The lady
Isemburg still lives and claims her rightsevery true
heart in Christendom is for her, and it is only here, in
the court of our lady, that her wrongs are unknown,
or never mentioned.
And why, my dear mother, asked Rosalie,
recurring
to her first feelings, why, since you have so
long kept this sad tale from me, why did you tell it
now?
I kept it because that, yet a child in years, it was
not essential you should know it, and I could not bear
to throw a shade over your innocent and all-trusting
love for our lady. Now you are entering on the
scene of action yourself. Temptation will assault
you from which I cannot shield you. Even your
mother, my child, cannot keep your account with your
Judge.
Alas, no.But what temptations have I to fear,
dear mother?
You are endowed with rare beauty, Rosalie, and
in this court there will be many smooth tongues to tell
you this.
They have already told me so, said the
ingenuous
Rosalie, slightly blushing.
T
Who?who? aked her mother.
The lord Thiebant, and the young knights Arnold
and Beaumont, and the king himself; but indeed,
mother, it moved me not half so much as when my
lady Agnes commends the manner of my hair, or the
fitting of my kerchief.
Ah, Rosalie, these flattering words have been as
yet lightly spokenas it were to a child, but when
they are uttered in words of fire,
par amour!
Oh, if you fear for me, mother, said Rosalie,
dropping on her knees, and crossing her arms in her
mother's lap, I will now vow myself to the Virgin.
Will you, Rosalie?
In sooth I will. Not to immure myself within
the walls of a convent, shut out from that communion
which the Creator holds with his creatures through his
visible works; and that still better communion
vouchsafed
to us when we are fellow-workers with Him in
missions of mercy and love to His creatures.
You are somewhat of a Paterin too, my Rosalie,
said her mother, rejoicing that her indirect lessons
were so definitely impressed on her daughter's mind.
But have you comprehended the perfect spirituality
of the Christian's law? Do you know there is
no
virtue
in external obedience, however self-denying and
self-afflicting that obedience may be, if the affections,
the desires, the purposes, are not in perfect subjection
to the will of God? Do you know that if you now
vow yourself to a vestal's life, it would be sin should
you hereafter, even in thought, repent this vow and
sorrow for it.
But, dear mother, that cannot be. I can never
love another so well as I love you, and our poor lady
Agnes. Now, therefore, in this quiet Temple of God
let me make the vow.
Clotilde's face was convulsed with thick coming
conflicting thoughts and feelings. In common with
many of her sect, she had retained that tenderest and
most poetic feature of the Catholic religion, a tender
homage for the Virgin. She believed the holy
mother
would vouchsafe supernatural aid to her vestal
followers, and this aid she thought might be essential
to one who, with unsuspecting youth, and surpassing
beauty, was beset by the dangers of a court of which
virtue was not the presiding genius. But on the other
hand, she feared to take advantage of the inexperience
of her child. Her very willingness to assume the
shackles, made her mother shrink from their
imposition
.
Rosalie clasped her hands and raised her eyes.
Stay, my sweet childnot now, said her mother,
a vow like this demands previous meditation, and
much communing with your own spirit. I trust you
are moved by heavenly inspiration, and if so, the work
now begun will be perfected. In eight days from
this we celebrate the marriage of St. Catharine, that
marriage which typifies the sacred spiritual union of
the perfected saint with the author of her salvation.
I have twice dreamed the day had arrived, and
marvellous
,
and spirit-stirring fancies, if they be fancies,
have mingled with my dreams. I witnessed the holy
marriage. I gazed at the sacred pair, when suddenly,
as St. Catharine was receiving the bridal ring, it was
you, my Rosalie, and not the saint; your face was as
vivid as it is now to my actual sense, and instead of the
pale slender hand of the saint, was your'sdimpled
and rose tinted as it now is; but alas! the ring would
not go upon your finger. While I marvelled and
sorrowed
,
flames crackled around me; you, the celestial
bridegroom, all vanished from my eyes, clouds of
smoke rose around me, as I looked up for help, their
dense volume collected over my head parted and I
beheld a crown as bright as if it were of woven
sunbeams
,
a martyr's crown.
Dear mother! I like not this dream.
Be not disquieted, my child. Our dreams are
sometimes heavenly inspirations, but oftener
compounded
of previous thoughts and impressions.
Martyrdom
has ere now been within the scope of my
expectations, and that your marriage may be like that
of the blessed St. Catharine, is my continual prayer.
Look not back, but forward. If it please heaven to
strengthen and confirm the good purpose now
conceived
,
on
St. Catharine's Eve
you shall make your
vow.
So be it, mother, yet I would it were now. The
ladies were interrupted by a page from the queen who
came to summon the lady Clotilde to his mistress'
presence.
Little Marie seeing her favourite at liberty left her
attendant and insisted, with the vehemence of a petted
princess as she was, that Rosalie should take a stroll
with her along the bank of the river. Rosalie, scarcely
past childhood herself, felt her spirits vibrate to the
touch of her little friend, and they ran on sportively
together, followed by the Moorish servant, till they
came to the shore, where beneath a clump of trees,
overgrown with flowering vines, a bench had been
placed to afford a
poste restante
, which a painter might
have selected, as affording, on one side a view of the
turrets of the castle, towering above the paradise in
which it was embosomed, and on the other, of the
windings of the Seine and the picturesque bridge that
crossed it. Just before Rosalie arrived at this point of
sight, a cavalcade had passed the bridge on their way
to the castlethe Archbishop of Rheims and his
retinue
.
One of them had lagged behind the rest, and
stopping on the bridge to survey the river, he had
caught a glimpse of what seemed to him the most
poetic personifications of youth and childhood that his
eye had ever rested on. The spectator was mounted
on a Spanish jennet, caparisoned with the rich
decorations
which the knights of the time, who regarded
their steeds almost as brothers in arms, were wont to
lavish on them. The bridle was garnished with silver
bells, so musical that they seemed to keep time to the
graceful motions of the animal. It might have puzzled
an observer to decide to which of the two great
faineant
classes that then divided the Christian world,
knights, or monks, to assign the rider. Beneath a long
monastic mantlo, fastened by a jewelled clasp, a linked
mailed shirt might be perceived. The face of the
wearer had the open gay expression of a preux
chevalier
,
with a certain softness and tenderness that
indicated
a disposition rather to a reflective, that an active
life. He had become wearied of the solemn and silent
pomp of the archbishop's retinue, and had resigned
the distinction of riding beside his highness for a gayer
companion and a freer position in the rear of the train.
By my faith, Arnaud, said he, I find these
lords, bishops and archbishops very stupid, in propria
persona.
Ah, Gervais, had you heeded me! but as the
proverb
says `good counsel has no price.'
But my good master priest, we have yet to see
whether my hope will not give the lie to your
experience
.
Bravo! retorted Arnaud, laughing louder than
one would have dared to laugh nearer the archbishop.
St. Catharine's is the day you doff that mailed shirt of
yours, forever? When that day comes round again,
we shall see whether dame Experience has forfeited a
name for speaking truth, and lying Hope has gained
one.
Holy Mary! exclaimed Gervais de Tilbery,
checking his horse as he entered upon the stone bridge.
What houri is that!
Softly, Sir Gervais, replied his friend, it is
scarcely prudent to utter oaths, and gaze after houris
within a bow-shot of my lord archbishop,within
seven days of St. Catharine's Eve! Are you
spell-bound
,
Gervais?
Gervais heeded not the prudent caution of his friend,
T 2
but asking him to bid Hubert (his attendant) come to
him, he permitted Arnaud to proceed alone. Hubert
came. Gervais gave him the horse to lead to the
castle.
Hubert disappeared, and Gervais succeeded in
scaling
the bridge and letting himself down within the
paradise that enclosed the houri, whom he approached
(unseen by her) through a walk enclosed by tall
flowering
shrubs. As he issued from it, he perceived his
magnet still standing near where he had first seen her,
but now in a state of great alarm. The bench,
mentioned
above, had been taken from its supporters, and
one end of it was projecting over the precipitous bank.
An eddy in the river had worn away the bank beneath,
and the water there was deep and rapid. Little Marie
with the instinct which children seem to possess to
find, or make danger, had run on to the bench, and
when Rosalie stepped on to draw her back she darted
forward to its extremity, beyond Rosalie's reach; she
perceiving that if she advanced one inch farther the
bench would lose its balance and they must both be
precipitated into the river. The child perfectly
unconscious
of danger was diverted at Rosalie's terror,
and clapping her hands and jumping up and down
was screaming Why don't you catch me, Rosalie?
The Moorish girl threw herself on her knees and
supplicated
the child to come back, in vain. Rosalie was
pale and trembling with terror, when she felt a firm
tread on the bench, behind her, and turning, saw the
stranger, who said to her fear not, sweet lady, give
me your handI am twice your weightthe board
will not movenow advance a step and grasp the
little girl. This was done in an instant, and the
mischievous little gypsey was dragged from her
tormenting
position. Rosalie after she had kissed and
chidden her, bade her return with Zeba to the castle,
saying she would instantly follow, and then turned to
thank the stranger for his timely interposition. A
bright flush succeeded her momentary paleness. It
may be that the joy of transition from apprehension to
security was enhanced by its being effected by a young
and handsome stranger-knight, for the young ladies of
the middle ages were as richly endowed with the
elements
of romance as the fair readers of our circulating
libraries, who find in many a last new novel but little
besides a new compound of the songs of
troubadours
,
and tales of
trouveurs
.
The thanks given, and most graciously received,
Rosalie felt embarrassed by the stranger continuing to
attend her. Think me not discourteous, sir knight,
said she, if I apprise you that you are within the
private
pleasure grounds of our lady queensacred to
herself and the ladies of her court. While Gervais
paused for some pretext for lingering, Rosalie kindly
added, I know not how you came here, but I am
sure you were heaven-directed.
Surely then, fair lady, I should follow Heaven's
guidance, and not leave the celestial companion
vouchsafed
me.
But, asked Rosalie, smiling, is not thy mission
accomplished?
It would be profane in me to say so, while I am
within superhuman influence.
Well, thought Rosalie, since he persists, there
is no harm in permitting him to go as far as the
grapery
there
we must separate. Some conversation
followed, by which it appeared that the stranger was
of the Archbishop of Rheims' household, and Rosalie
asked him if he knew aught of Gervais de Tilbery?
Aye, lady, replied Gervais, both good and
evil.
Evil? I have heard nought but good of him.
What good can you have heard of one scarce
worthy to be named before you?
This must be sheer envy, thought Rosalie, but
the thought was checked when, glancing her eye at
the stranger's face she saw a sweet pleasurable smile
there. Many, she said, have brought us report
of his knightly feats, and some, who note such matters,
of his deeds of mercy. Our ladies call him the
handsome
knight, and the brave knight, and the kninght of
the spotless escutcheon.
Oh, believe them notbelieve them not! said
Gervais, laughing.
Seeing is believing, saith the musty adage,
replied
Rosalie. Gervais de Tilbery is coming to the
Chateau des Roses with the Archbishop.
And is here, most beautiful lady! cried Gervais,
dropping on one knee, to bless heaven for having
granted him this sweet visionto ask thy nameand
to vow eternal fealty.
Oh, stoprise, Sir, said Rosalie, utterly
disconcerted
and retreating from Gervais, I am a stranger
to thee.
Nay, said he, rising, and following her, I care
not for thy name, nor lineageno rank could grace
theedo not, I beseech you, thus hasten from me
hear my vows.
You are hasty, Sir, said Rosalie, drawing up her
little person with a dignity that awed Gervais; and
now I think of ithave I not heard that it was your
purpose to enter the church?
Gervais became suddenly as grave as Rosalie could
have wished. It
was
my purpose, he replied, in a
voice scarcely audible.
Then you are already bound by holy vows.
Not yetthe ceremony of the tonsure is appointed
for the festival of St. Catharine.
St. Catharine! Rosalie's exclamation was
involuntary
.
Her own purposed vow recurred to her, and
she may be pardoned if she (being sixteen) deemed
the coincidence a startling one.
They proceeded together: Gervais, in spite of her
remonstrances, attending her through the grapery to
the garden gate, where Marie stood awaiting her.
Come in, Rosecome in, said the impatient child,
and you, sir stranger, go backI hate you, and
mama
will hate you for stealing away my Rose. So
saying, she shut the gate in poor Gervais's face, before
he had time to speak, or even look a farewell to Rosalie.
He had leisure, during his long, circuitous walk to the
castle, to meditate on his adventure, to see bright
visions
of the future, and to decide, if necessary to
sacrifice
the course of ambition opened by the Archbishop's
patronage to the attainment of Rosalie. Gervais de
Tilbery was of noble birth; a richly endowed, gay,
light-hearted youth, who was guided by his impulses;
but, fortunately, they were the impulses of a nature
that seemed, like a fine instrument, to have been
ordained
and fitted to good uses by its author. A word
in apology of his sudden passion, and its immediate
declaration: In that dark ra when woman was sought
(for the most part) only for her beauty, a single view
was enough to decide the choice; the wife was elected
as suddenly as one would now pronounce on the beauty
of a fabric or a statue. Gervais de Tilbery, for the
first time in his life, felt that woman was a compound
being, and that within the exquisite material frame,
there dwelt a spirit that consecrated the temple.
It was on the evening of the day following Rosalie's
meeting with the young knight, that Clotilde was
officiating at her daughter's toilette. She was
preparing
for a masked ball, where she was to appear as a
nymph of Diana. She was dressed in a light green
china silk robe, fitted with exquisite skill to a form so
vigorous, graceful and agile, that it seemed made for
sylvan sports. Her luxuriant hair was drawn,  la
Grecque, into a knot of curls behind, and fastened by
a small silver arrow. A silver whistle, suspended by
a chain of the same material, richly wrought, hung
from her girdle. Her delicate feet were buskined,
her arms bare. She had a silver bow in her hand,
and to her shoulder was attached a small quiver of the
finest silver net-work, filled with arrows. After her
mother had finished her office of tire-woman, which
she would permit none to share with her, and before
tying on Rosalie's mask, she gazed at her with a
feeling
of pride and irrepressible triumph. A sigh
followed
this natural swelling of her heart.
Why that sigh, dear mother? asked Rosalie.
I sighed, my child, to think how little you appear
in this heathen decoration, like a promised votary of
the blessed Virgin.
Not
promised
, replied Rosalie hastily, and
blushing
deeply.
Not quite promised, my child, but meditated.
Mother, said Rosalie and paused, for the first
time in her life hesitating to open her heart to her
parent; but the good impulse prevailed, and she
proceeded
.
Mother, in truth the more I meditate on
that, the less am I inclined to it.
Rosalie!
So it is, dear mother; and is it not possible that
you directed me to defer the vow in obedience to a
heavenly intimation?I have thought it might be so.
Clotilde fixed her penetrating eye on Rosalie's.
There is something new in your mind, Rosalie;
keep it not back from me, my child; be it weakness or
sin, I shall sorrow with, not blame you.
It may be weakness, mother, but I am sure it is
not sin. I told you of my meeting with Gervais de
Tilbery, in la Vigne.
Yes, and of his rescuing our little Marie, but
nought else.
There was not much elseand yet his words and
looks, and not my vow to the Virgin, have been in my
mind ever since. Rosalie, after a little stammering
and blushing, gave her mother a faithful relation of
every particular of the meeting, and though she most
dreaded her mother's comments on that part of her
story, she did not disguise that Gervais was destined
for holy orders.
Her mother embraced her, and thanked her for her
confidence. Dear child, she said, forewarned, I
trust you will be forearmed. This young Gervais
will see no barrier to his pursuit of you in the holy
vows he assumes. The indulgence and absolutions of
our corrupted church license all sin; but we are not
thus taught of the Scriptures, whose spiritual essence
has entered into hearts that we believe marriage, even
performed with all holy ceremony and legal rites, is
not permitted to the
saint
, albeit allowed to human
infirmity.
I always believe what you say to me, mother;
yet
Yet
speak freely, Rosalie.
Yet
it does seem to me incomprehensible, that the
relation should be wrong, from which proceeds the tie
that binds you to me and me to you; which opens a
fountain of love that in its course is always becoming
sweeter and deeperhark! the bell is soundingI
must hasten to the queen's saloontie on my mask,
and be assured no mask shall ever hide a thought or
feeling from you, my mother.
Go, my sweet child, remember pleasure enervates
the soul, and be watchfulI remain to pray for you.
How did the aspect and the spirit of the scene
change to Rosalie, from the quiet apartment of her
saintly mother, to the queen's saloon brilliantly
illuminated
,
filled with the flower of French chivalry
and with the court beauties, whom the lady Agnes,
either from a real passion for what was loveliest in
nature, or to show how far her conjugal security was
above all envy, delighted to assemble about her in
great numbers. She was seated at the king's right
hand, under a canopy of crimson and gold. The king
was in his royal robes, and both he and the lady Agnes
were without masks. She was dressed in the
character
of Ceres, and her rich and ripened beauty
personified
admirably the Queen of Summer. Her crown
(an insignia which, probably from her contested right
to it, she was careful never to omit,) was of diamonds
and gold, formed into wheat-heads, the diamonds
representing
the berry, and the gold the stem and beard.
Her robe was of the finest Flanders cloth, glittering
with embroidery, depicting the most beautiful
productions
of the earth which, as her ample train followed
her, seemed to spring up at her tread. The young
Philip sat at his father's feet on an embroidered cushion,
Marie at her mother's, both personifying Bacchantes.
The ladies of the court, in the costume of nymphs,
muses, and graces, were at the queen's right hand;
the lords and knights, in various fantastical characters,
at the king's left. It was suspected, from several
persons
wearing the symbols of a holy profession, that
the Archbishop's party was present, but as he was
precise in observances, and severe in discipline to
cruelty, none ventured to assert it. Rosalie was met
at the door by one of the appointed attendants, and led
to the lady Agnes' side, a station always assigned her
as the favourite of her mistress. Ah, my little nymph
of the chase, said the queen, as Rosalie knelt at her
feet and lay down her bow in token of homage, you
are a rebel to-night; what has Ceres to do with Diana's
followers?
True, said a young knight who had a pilgrim's
staff in his hand, one is the bountiful mother, and the
other the nun of mythologymore unkind than the
nun, for she does not immure the charms which it is
profanity to admire.
Gervais de Tilbery, thought Rosalie, instantly
recognising his voice, your words seem to me
prophetic
.
There is no false assumption in this character of
yours, continued the pilgrim knight, for the arrow
loosed from thy bow is sure to pierce thy victim's
heart.
Hush all! cried the queen. Our minstrel
begins
,
and our ears would drink his strain, for his is the
theme welcomest and dearest.
Philip Augustus, as in some sort the founder of the
feudal monarchy, has made an epoch in history. His
reign seemed to his subjects to revive the glorious era
of Charlemagne. It was the dawn of a brilliant day
after a sleep of four centuries. He enlarged and
consolidated
his dominions. France, till his reign, had
been divided into four kingdoms, of which that
governed
by the French king was the smallest. He
made a new era in the arts and sciences. He founded
colleges and erected edifices which are still the pride
of France. Notre Dame was reconstructed and
enlarged
by him. He conveyed pure water by aqueducts
to the city of Paris, and in his reign that city was first
paved and redeemed from a pestilential condition.
His cruelties, his intolerance, and his infidelities were
the vices of his age. His beneficent acts were a just
theme of praise, but that which made him an inspiring
subject to his poet laureate minstrel was his passion for
chivalric institutions, his love of the romances of
chivalry
,
and the patronage with which he rewarded
the inventive genius of the Trouveres. In truth,
says his historian, it was during his reign that this
brilliant creation of the imagination, (chivalry,) was in
some sort complete.The court minstrel, with such
fertile themes, sung long, and concluded amidst a burst
of applause.
The dancing began, and again and again the pilgrim
knight was seen dancing with Diana's nymph.
Ah, Gervais! whispered a young man to him,
she of the silver-net quiver is I suspect your
houri
.
A dangerous preparation this for your canonicals.
U
Why so, Arnaud? Do angels never minister to
priests?
Never, my friend, in such forms, replied Arnaud,
laughing.
Then heaven forfend that I should be a priest!
A Dominican friar, in mask, approached Gervais, and
said in a startling voice, Thou art rash, young man
thou hast lain aside thy badge of sanctity, alluding
to his pilgrim's staff.
What signifies it, good friar, replied Gervais, if
I part with the sign, so long as I retain the thing
signified
?
I am not yet a
priesl
.
Have a care, sir, replied the friar, in a tone that
indicated he was deeply offended by Gervais's slur
upon the priesthood, speak not lightly of the office
that hath a divine commission!
And assumes divine power, good master friar!
The friar turned away, murmuring something of
which Gervais heard only the words
edge tools
.
His mind was full of other matters, and they would
have made no impression, had not his friend Arnaud
whispered to him, as soon as the friar was again lost
in the crowd, Are you mad, Gervais? Knew you not
the Archbishop?
The Archbishop!in that humble suit, how should
I?N'importe, added the gay youth, after a
moment's
panic, the devil, as the proverb says, must
hear truth if he listens.
And the proverb tells us too, to `bow to the bush
we get shelter from.'
My thanks to you, Arnaud. I have changed my
mind, and shall not seek the bush's shelter.
Then beware! for that which might have afforded
shelter, may distil poison.
Away with you and your croaking, Arnaud. This
night is dedicated to perfect happiness, and you shall
not mar it.
Alas, my friend!the brightest day is often
followed
by the darkest night.
But Gervais heard not this
word of prophecy
. The
dance was finished, and he was leading off his beautiful
partner. She permitted him to conduct her through
the open suite of apartments, each one less brilliantly
illuminated than the last, till they reached an
apartment
with a single lamp, and one casement window
which opened upon a balcony that overlooked the
garden. The transition was a delicious one from the
heated and crowded apartments, to the stillness of
nature, and the privity of moonlightfrom the stifling
atmosphere to the incense that rose from the
unnumbered
flowers of the garden beneath them. Rosalie
involuntarily threw aside her mask, and disclosed a
face, lit as it was by the sweet emotions and
enthusiasm
of the occasion, more beautiful than the memory
and imagination of the enraptured lover had pictured
it. It was a moment when love would brook no
counsel from prudence; and Gervais, obeying his
impulses, poured out his passion in a strain to which
Rosalie, in a few, faintly spoken words, replied. The
tone and the words sunk to the very depths of
Gervais's
heart, assuring him that he was beloved.
An hour flew, while to the young lovers all the
world but themselves seemed annihilatedthen
followed
the recollection of certain relations and
dependencies
of this mortal life. My first care shall be,
said Gervais, to recede from this priesthood.
Thank kind heaven for that, replied Rosalie.
As they say in Provence, `any thing is better than a
priest.'
The lovers both fancied they heard a rustling near
them. They turned their heads, and Gervais stepped
within the embrasure of the window. It is nothing
we are unobserved, he said, returning to Rosalie's
side. But tell me, my Rosalie, (
my
Rosalie!) where
heard you this Provence scandal?
From my dear mother, who spent her youth at
the court of the good Raymond.
St. Denis aid us! I believed Treres, Gui, and
Regnier
had plucked up heresy by the roots in Languedoc.
Heaven forbid that she be infected with heresy!
I know not what you call
heresy
, Sir Gervais de
Tilbery, but my dear mother drinks at the fountain of
truth, the Scriptures, and receives not her faith from
man, be he called bishop, archbishop, or pope.
By all the saints, I believe she has reason in that.
But, dear Rosalie, we will eschew heresyit is a
thorny road to heaven, and we will keep the safe path
our fathers have trodden before us, in which there are
guides who relieve us of all the trouble of
self-direction
will
we not?
My mother is my guide, Sir Gervais.
So be it, my lovely Rosalie, till her guidance is
transferred to meand thereafter you will be faithful
to God, St. Peter, and the Romish Church? And
when shall your orthodoxy beginon
St. Catharine's
Eve?
I know notI know not. All these matters must
be referred to my dear mother and the queen. Rise,
Sir Gervais, (her lover had knelt to urge his suit)
we linger too long here. Again there was a sound
near them, and Gervais sprang forward to ascertain
whence it proceededRosalie followed him, and they
both perceived the figure of the friar crossing the
threshhold of the next apartment. Could he have
been here? exclaimed Gervaishe might have
been hidden behind the folds of this curtainbut
would
he?
Gervais paused,Whom do you mean?
The friar, answered Gervais, warily, for he
feared
to alarm Rosalie by the intimation of the possibility
that the Archbishop of Rheims had overheard their
conversation.
Rosalie did not sleep that night till she had confided
all, without the reservation of a single particular, to
her mother. The lady Clotilde grieved that she must
resign her cherished, dearest hope of seeing Rosalie
self-devoted to a vestal's life, but true to her spiritual
faith, that all virtue and all religion were in the mind,
and of the mind, she would not persuadeshe would
not influence Rosalie to an external piety.
She saw much advantage would result to Rosalie
from an alliance with Gervais. It would remove her
at once and forever from the contagion of the court
atmospherefrom lady Agnes's influence, so
intoxicating
to a young and confiding nature. Gervais was of
noble rank and fortune, and when that distinction was
almost singular among the young nobles of France, he
was distinguished for pure morals. It is
possible
,
thought Clotilde, as she revolved in her mind
all the good she had heard of him, that the
renovating
Spirit of Truth has already entered his heart.
It has not pleased heaven to grant my prayer, but
next best to what I vainly asked, is this union of pure
and loving hearts. The ingenuous disclosure
Rosalie
had made, awakened in her mind a vivid
recollection
of a similar experience of her youth, and
produced a sympathetic feeling that perhaps, more
than her reason, governed her decision. Rosalie that
night fell asleep on her mother's bosom with the sweet
assurance that her love was authorized.
The next was a busy, an important, and a happy
day to the lovers. Time trod on flowers. Alas,
the periods of perfect happiness are brief, and one
might say with the fated Moor
If it were now to die
'Twere now to be most happy; for I fear
My soul hath her content so absolute,
That not another comfort like to this
Succeeds in unknown fate.
Every thing seemed to go well and as it should. The
Archbishop, with a gloomy brow, but without one
U 2
comment or hesitating word, acquiesced in Gervais's
relinquishing his purpose of entering the church. The
lady Agnes, loath to part with her favourite, yet
graciously
gave her consent, and persuaded the king to
endow the young bride richly, and even the little
Marie, though she at first stoutly and with showers of
tears, refused to give up
her own
Rose, yet was at
last brought over to the party of the lovers, by the
promise of officiating as bridesmaid on
St. Catharine's
Eve
.
Would that we could end our tale here; but the
tragic truth which darkens the page of history must
not be suppressed.
The Archbishop of Rheims was devoted to the
aggrandizement
of his own orderto extending and
securing
the dominion of the priesthood. His faith
might be called sincere, but we should hardly excuse
that man who, having been born and educated in a
dark room, should spend his whole life in
counteracting
the efforts of others to communicate the light of
heaven to him, and in stopping the little crevices by
which it might enter. He was ready to grant any
indulgence
to errors, or even vices, that did not interfere
with the supremacy of the church. He was the uncle
of Philip, and, contrary to his inclination, he had been
induced by that powerful monarch to countenance
him in his rejection of the queen Isemburg, and had
thereby involved himself in an unwilling contest with
Innocent III. This pontiff, whose genius, his
historian
says, embraced and governed the world, was
equally incapable of compromise and pity. He had a
few years antecedent to the events we have related,
proclaimed the first crusade against the Albigeois, and
had invested the dignitaries of the church throughout
Christendom with the power to burn the chiefs (of
the new opinions) to disperse their followers, and to
confiscate the property of all that did not
think
as he
did. All exercise of the faculty of thinking in
religious
matters was forbidden. The Archbishop of
Rheims was eager to wipe out his offences against the
head of the church by his zealous co-operation with
him in this persecution. As has been seen, he was
nettled
by Gervais's contemptuous hit at the priesthood.
It was an indication that the disease of heresy had
touched even the healthiest members of the spiritual
body, as the general prevalence of corresponding
symptoms announced the approach of a wide wasting
epidemic. He became restless and uneasy, and, in
wandering alone through the apartments of the chateau,
he had found his way to the window of the balcony
occupied by our lovers, just in time to hear poor
Rosalie's
betrayal of her mother. He devoted the
following
day to a secret inquisition into the life and
conversation of Clotilde. He found that she had long
ceased to be a favourite of the lady Agnes, who
tolerated
her only on account of her daughter, and who
felt somewhat the same aversion to her (and for
analogous
reasons) that Herodias cherished against John
the Baptist. This feeling of the lady Agnes was
rather discerned by the acute prelate than expressed
by her, for there was not a fault of which she could
accuse the pure and devout woman. Her
offences
were the rigid practice of every moral virtue. Her
time and her fine faculties were all devoted to the
benefit of her fellow-creatures, so that she fell under
the common condemnation, as set forth by a
contemporary
writer. L'esprit de mensonge, par la seule
apparence d'une vie nette, et sans tache, soustrayoit
ces inprudens  la verite. Besides this, she was found
deficient in the observance of the Romish ritual, and
she
ate no meat
.
This last sin of omission, being in accordance with
the practice of the strictest among those early
reformers
,
was an almost infallible sign of heresy; and on
the day following the arrangements for Rosalie's
marriage
,
the lady Clotilde was summoned before the
Archbishop and a council of priests. Her guilt was
assumed, and she was questioned upon the several
points of the prevailing heresy. We cannot go into
details. Our story has already swelled beyond due
bounds. The lady Clotilde, unsupported and alone,
answered all the questions of her inquisitors, with a
directness, simplicity, a comprehension of the subject,
and a modesty, that, as a cotemporary chronicler
confesses
,
astounded all who heard her. But it availed
nought. She was convicted of denying the right of
the Romish church to grant indulgences and absolution,
and, in short, of wholly rejecting its authority. The
Archbishop condemned her as deserving the penalty
of death, and the pains of everlasting fire, but he
offered
her pardon upon a full recantation of her errors.
I fear not him who only can kill the body, she
replied, with blended firmness and gentleness, but
Him who can destroy both soul and body, and to
Him, she added, raising her eyes and folding her
hands, I commend that spirit to which it hath pleased
Him to vouchsafe the glorious liberty of the gospel.
Her celestial calmness awed her judgeseven the
Archbishop hesitated for a moment to pronounce her
doom, when a noise and altercation with the guard
was heard at the door. It opened, and Rosalie rushed
in, threw herself into her mother's arms, and all natural
timidity, all fear of the tribunal before which she stood,
merged in one overwhelming apprehension, she
demanded
,
what they were doing, and why her mother
was there?
Peace, rash child! answered the Archbishop.
Shame on thy intrusionknow that thy mother is a
convicted heretic.
What wrong has she ever done? Who has dared
to accuse my mother? cried Rosalie, still clinging to
Clotilde, who in vain tried to hush and calm her.
Who was her accuser? retorted the Archbishop,
with a cruel sneerdost thou remember, foolish girl,
who revealed the source of the
Provence scandal?
The recollection of the sound she had heard during
her fatal conversation with Gervais in the balcony, at
once flashed upon Rosalie. She elevated her person,
and, stretching out her arm towards the Archbishop,
exclaimed, with ineffable indignation, Thou wert the
listener?
For an instant his cheeks and lips were blanched
with shame, and then stifling this honest rebuke of
conscience, he quoted the famous axiom of
Innocent
III.Dost thou not know, girl, that `
it is to be
deficient in faith, to keep faith with those that have
no faith?
'Stand back, and hear the doom of all
those who renounce the Romish church.
Pronounce the doom, then, on me too! cried
Rosalie, kneeling and clasping her hands. I too
renounce
itI hate itI deny all my mother denies
I believe all she believes.
Oh Rosalie!my child!my child! exclaimed
her mother. My lord Archbishop, she is wild
she knows not what she says.
Mother, I do!have you not taught me?have
we not prayed and wept together over the holy
gospels
,
so corrupted and perverted by the priesthood?
Enough! said the Archbishopbe assured we
will not cut down the dry tree, and leave the green
one to flourish.
Thanks!then we shall die together, said
Rosalie
,
locking her arms around her mother's neck.
The delirious excitement had exhausted herher head
fell on her mother's bosom, and she was an
unconscious
burden in her arms. Clotilde laid her on a
cushion at her feet, and knelt by her while the
Archbishop
,
after a few words of consultation, doomed the
mother and daughter to pass through material to
immaterial
flames, on St. Catharine's day.
They were together conveyed to a dungeon
appertaining
to the chateau.
St. Catharine's Eve
arrived. The hour that had
been destined for Rosalie's bridals found her in a
dungeon
,
seated at her mother's feet, her head resting on
her mother's breast, and her eyes fixed on her face,
while Clotilde read by the light of their lamp the
fourteenth
chapter of St. John. She closed the book.
The calmness that she had maintained till then forsook
her. She laid her face to Rosalie's, and the tears from
her cheeks dropped on her child's. Oh! she
exclaimed
,
nature subduing the firmness of the martyr,
it is in vain! I read, and pray, and meditate, but
still my heart
is
troubledthe spirit is
not
willing
.
Dear mother! cried Rosalie, feeling as if the
columns against which she leaned were tottering.
My child, it is not for myself I fear or feel. My
mission on earth is finishedand I have an humble,
but assured hope, that my Saviour will accept that
which I have done in his service. For me death has
no terrors. I should rejoice in the flames that would
consume this earthly tabernacle and set my spirit free;
but oh, my child! She closed her eyes as if she
would exclude the dreadful vision, when I think of
thy sweet body devoured by elemental fire my heart
fails. I am tempted, sorely tempted. I fear that in
that hour I shall deny the faith, and give up heaven
for your life.
Mother, mother, do not say so. I hoped it was
only I had sinful thoughts, and affections binding me
to earth. The weakness of nature for a moment
triumphed over the sublime power of religion, and
the mother and child wept, and sobbed violently.
So absorbed were they in their emotions that they
did not hear the turning of the bolts of their prison,
nor were they conscious of any one's approach till
Rosalie's name was pronounced in a low voice; when
they both started and saw, standing before them,
Gervais de Tilbery, the lady Agnes and her confessor.
Gervais threw himself on his knees before Rosalie,
took her hand and pressed it to his lips. She returned
the pressure, but spoke not.
There is no time to be lost, my dear friends, said
the lady Agnes. Clotilde, she continued, I have
vainly begged the boon of your lifeit is denied me
but your child'syoursmy own dear Rosalie, I
can preserve. It boots not now to say by what means
I shall effect it.
Can she live, cried Clotilde vehemently,
without
renouncing her faith? without denying her Lord?
Without any condition but that she now give her
hand to Gervais de Tilberythe priest is ready.
Oh tempt me not! tempt me not, exclaimed
Rosalie
,
throwing herself on her mother's bosom. I
will not leave her. I will die with her.
Hear me, my child, said her mother in a voice so
firm, sweet, and tranquillizing that it spoke peace to
the storm in Rosalie's bosom. Hear me. I have
already told you that for myself this dispensation has
no terror, but my spirit shrinks from your enduring it
spare me, my child. God has condescended to my
weakness and opened for you a way of escapedo you
still hesitate? On my knees, Rosalie, I beg you to live
not for Gervaisnot for yourselffor mefor your
mothergive me your hand. Rosalie gave it. Now
God bless thee my childshield thee from temptation
and deliver thee from evil! She put Rosalie's hand
into Gervais's, and bidding the priest do his office, she
supported her child on one side while Gervais sustained
her on the other. Rosalie looked more like a bride
for heaven than earth, her face as pale as the pure
white she wore, and her lips faintly, and inaudibly,
repeating
the marriage vows.
As the ceremony proceeded, her mother whispered
again, and again, courage my child! courage! It is
for my sake, Rosalie. The priest pronounced the
benediction. Rosalie had lost all consciousness. Her
mother folded her in one fond, long protracted embrace,
and then, without one word, resigned her to Gervais.
The lady Agnes signed to the priest. A female
attendant appeared. Rosalie was enveloped in a
travelling
cloak and hood and conveyed out of the prison.
Clotilde remained alone. We may say, without
presumption
,
that angels came and ministered to her.
We have only to add the conclusion of the
cotemporary
record. One of the condemned escaped from
punishment, and it is maintained that she was carried
off by the devil; the other without shedding a tear or
uttering a complaint submitted to death with a courage
that equalled her modesty.
X
ROMANCE IN REAL LIFE.
La Nature fait le mrite,
La Fortune le met in preuve.
Many
fortunate travellers on the western border of
Massachusetts, and not many miles from the Hudson,
have been refreshed at the inn of Reliance Reynolds.
Reliance, as his name indicates, was born in the good
old times. We are aware that the enthusiasts about
the progress of the age, deny this golden period
any but a retrospective existence, and maintain that,
retrace the steps of the human family far as you will,
it is like the age of chivalry, always a little behind
you. But we adhere to the popular phraseology, and
call those good old times, when the Puritanical
nomenclature
prevailed; when such modest graces as
faith and temperance had not been expelled from our
taverns, kitchens, and workshops, by the heroes and
heroines of romancethe Orlandos and Lorenzos,
Rosamonds
and Anna Matildas.
Reliance belonged to the good old times, too, in
the more essential matter of downright honesty,
simplicity
and respectful courtesy. His was a rare
character
in New Englanda passive spirit, content to fill
and fit the niche nature had prepared for him. It was
not very high, but he never aspired above it; nor very
low, but he never sank below it. He was the marvel
of his neighbours, for he could never be persuaded into
an enterprise or speculation. He never bought a
water
privilege, nor an oar bed; subscribed to a county
bank, or moved to the West; or in any mode
indicated
that principle in man, which, in its humble
operations
,
is restlessness,in its lofty aspirations, a
longing
after immortality. Reliance's desires never passed
the bounds of his premises, and were satisfied, even
within them, with a very moderate share of power.
He stood at his door, his hat in his hand, to receive
his guests; he strictly performed the promise of his
sign, and gave good entertainment to man and
horse; he rendered a moderate bill and received his
dues with a complacent smile, in which gratitude was
properly tempered with a just sense of his own rights.
In short, as must be already quite manifest, Reliance,
though a pattern landlord, is a very poor subject for a
storyteller; his qualities, like the colours in a ray of
light, all blending and forming one hue, and his life,
presenting the same monotonous harmony.
We should not have forced him from his happy
obscurity
into the small degree of notoriety he may
incur
on our humble page, but for his being the adjunct
of his wife, an important personage in our narrative.
Mrs. Reynolds, too, like her husband, performed
exactly the duties of her station. She never perhaps
read a line of poetry, save such as might lurk in the
Poet's Corner of a village paper, but her whole
life was an illustration of the oldfashioned couplet
Honour and shame from no condition rise,
Act well your part, there all the honour lies.
She never was presidentess of a society for
ameliorating
the condition of the Jews, or secretary or
treasurer of any of those beneficent associations that
rescue the latent talents of women from obscurity and
mettrent en scene
gems and flowers that might
otherwise
shine and exhale unnoticed and unknown; but
though humble was her name and destiny, her
memory
is dear to the wayfaring. Quiet, order, and
neatness, reigned at her bed and board. No pirates
harboured in her bedsteads, no bad luck, that evil
genius
of housewives, curdled her cream, spoiled her
butter or her bread, but her table was spread with such
simple, wholesome fare as might have lit a smile on
the wan visage of an old dyspeptic; and this we take
to be the greatest achievement of the gastronomic art.
With the duties of life so peacefully and so well
performed, our good hostess ought, according to all
the rules of happiness, to have been happy; but it is
our melancholy duty to confess she was not, and to
explain the cause. She had been married many years
without having any children; that blessed possession
that, in transmitting the parent's existence, seems to
extend its bounds, and to render even here, the
mortal
immortal. In addition to the feeling, common to
all women, who naturally crave the sweetest objects
for their tenderest and strongest affections, Mrs.
Reynolds
lamented her childless state with a bitterness of
repining approaching to that of the Hebrew wives.
With everything else in her possession that could
inspire
contentment, her mind was fixed on this one
desired good, and, like Hannah of old, she was still a
woman of sorrowful spirit. She had endeavoured
to solace herself with the children of her kindred, and
several, from time to time, had been adopted into her
family; but some proved disagreeable, and others
homesick, and there was always a paramount duty or
affection that interfered with her's, till finally her
almost extinguished hopes were gratified, and
Providence
gave her a child worthy all her care and love.
[7]
[7]
We would gladly have had it in our power to be exact in dates,
as our story in good faith is true in all, even the least important
particulars. Some few circumstances, and the spoken words,
had escaped tradition, and of course were necessarily supplied, as
the proper statue receives a foot or finger from the ruder hand of
modern art. The name of the heroine having been subsequently
merged and forgotten in that of her husband, we have ventured to
retain it. The rest we have respectfully veiled under assumed
appellations
.
In the autumn of 1777, two travellers arrived just
at nightfall at Reynolds's inn. Its aspect was inviting;
situated in the heart of a fertile valley that had lately
been refreshed by the early rains of autumn, and in
its bright garb resembling a mature beauty that had
happily harmonized some youthful tints with her
soberer
graces. A sprightly, winding stream gave life
and music to the meadows. On every side the
landscape
was undulating and fertile, but not then as
extensively
cultivated as now, when, to the Tauconnuc
on the south, and the lofty blue outline of the Catskills
on the west, the eye ranges over a rich and enjoyed
country. Beside the accidental charm of a pretty
landscape, the inn had advantages peculiar to itself.
Instead of being placed on the roadside, as most of
our taverns arefor what reason we know not, unless
a cloud of travellers' dust be typical of a shower of
gold to the vision of mine hostReynolds's inn was
separated from the highway by a court yard, shaded
by two wide spreading elms, and enlivened with a
profusion of autumnal flowers, marigolds, cockscombs,
and china asters.
There was nothing that indicated any claims to
particular
civility in the appearance of our travellers.
They were well looking and respectably apparelled;
and, accordingly, having announced their
determination
to remain for the night, they were shown to an
inner room, the parlour,
par excellence
, where Mrs.
Reynolds appeared, and having opened a door which
admitted the balmy air and a view of the western sky,
just then brightened by the tints of the setting sun,
she received their orders for their supper, and retired
without one of those remarks or inquiries by which
it is usual, on such occasions, to give vent to curiosity.
Nothing passed between our travellers in the dull
interval
that elapsed before their meal was ready, to give
to our readers the least clue to their origin or destiny.
One of them lulled himself into a doze in the rocking
chair, while the other, younger and more active and
vivacious, amused himself out of doors, plucking
flowers
,
X 2
enraging an old petulant cock turkey, and
mocking
the scolding of some Guinea hens, the Xantippes
of the feathered race.
The interval was not long. The door opened and
the tea table was brought in, already spread (a mode
we wish others would adopt from our pattern landlady),
and spread in a manner to characterize our bountiful
country.
What a contrast does the evening meal of our
humblest
inn present to the leanness of an English tea
table! A cornucopia would have been the
appropriate
symbol for Mrs. Reynolds's table. There were
beef steaks, and ham and eggs; hot cakes and toast;
bread and gingerbread; all the
indigenous
cakes,
such as crullers and nuteakes, &c.; honey,
sweet-meats
,
apple sauce, cheese, pickles, and an afterpiece
of pies. Kind reader, do not condemn our bill of fare
as impertinent and vulgar. We put it down to show
the scared political economists, that, with us, instead
of the population pressing on the means of
subsistence
,
the means of subsistence presses on the
population
.
Our travellers fell to their repast with appetites
whetted by a long fast and a day's ride. Not a word
was spoken, till a little girl, who was sitting on the
doorstep caressing a tame pigeon, perceiving that one
of the guests had garnished his buttonhole with a
bunch of marigolds, plucked a rose from a monthly
rose bush, trained over a trellis at the door, and laid it
beside his plate. He seemed struck with the modest
offering, and, turning with a look of gratitude to the
child, he patted her on her head, and exclaimed
instinctively
,
Merci, merci, ma petite!
and then
correcting himself, he said, in very imperfect English,
I thank you, my little girl.
The child's attention was fixed by the first word he
uttered, and as he addressed his companion in French,
her countenance indicated more emotion than would
naturally have been excited by the simple circumstance
of hearing, for the first time, a foreign language.
Qu'elle est belle, cette petite
, he continued,
turning
to his companion;
c'est la beaute de mon pays
voila, brunette, et les yeux, si grands, si noirs, et
la tournure aussiquelle grce, quelle vivacite!
Ah! Monsieur, Monsieur, c'est tout--fait Fran
oise
. As he proceeded the child advanced nearer
to him. She shook back the rich, dark curls that
shaded her face, bent her head forward, half parted
her bright lips, and listened with the uncertain and
eager expression of one who is catching a half
remembered
tune, the key to a thousand awakening
recollections
.
It was evident that she did not comprehend the
purport of the words, and that it was the sound alone
to which her delighted ear was stretched.
A smile played about her lips, and tears gathered in
her eyes, and there seemed to be a contrariety of
emotions
confounding even to herself; but that which
finally prevailed was indicated by her throwing her
apron over her head, and retreating to the doorstep,
where she sat down, and for some moments, vainly
attempted to stifle her sobs. She had just become
tranquil, when Mrs. Reynolds entered.
The elder traveller said, in an interrogating tone,
That is your child, ma'am?
I call her mine, was the brief and not very
satisfactory
reply.
She resembles neither you nor your husband,
resumed
the traveller.
No; she does not favour us.
I fancied she had a French look.
I can't say as to that, replied the landlady; I
never saw any French people.
My friend here is a Frenchman, pursued the
traveller
,
and the little girl listened to him so intently,
that I thought it possible she might understand him.
No, I guess she did not sense him, replied Mrs.
Reynolds, with an air of indifference; and then
turning
hastily to the child, Mary, she said, there is
more company; go and see if your father does not
want you.
She went and did not return. Mrs. Reynolds
herself
removed the table. The elder gentleman sat down
to write a letter; while the Frenchman walked to and
fro, opened the doors, and peeped in every direction
to get a glimpse of the little girl, who seemed to have
taken complete possession of his imagination. Once, as
she ran through the passage, he called to her
Doucement
!
doucement! mon petit ange
she stopped
as if she were glued to the floor. How call you your
name, my dear?
Mary Reynolds, sir.
Then
Madame
there, Mistress Reynolds is your
maman?
She is
Mary, what are you staying for? Herethis
instant
!
screamed Mrs. Reynolds from the kitchen
door, in a tone that admitted no delay, and the child
ran off without finishing her sentence.
C'est bien singulier!
muttered the Frenchman.
What do you find so singular, Jaubert! asked his
companion, who had just finished his letter, and thrown
down his pen.
Oh! it is nothingperhapsbut
`But,' what, my friend?
Why, there seems to me some mystery about this
child; something in her manner, I know not what,
that stirs up strange thoughts and hopes in my mind.
She is not one of the pale, blonde beauties of your
climate.
Ah! my good friend, we have all sorts of beauties
in our clime. All nations, you know, have sent us
their contributions. The blue eye and fair skin, the
Saxon traits, certainly prevail in our Eastern States;
but you know we border on New York, the asylum of
the dark eyed Huguenots, and it is not impossible that
to this child may have been transmitted the
peculiarities
of some French ancestor. Nothing is more
common
than a resemblance between a descendant and a
far off progenitor.
Ah! it is not only the French, the Norman
aspect
,
thedo not ridicule methe Angely traits that
attract me; but you yourself noticed how she listened
to my language, and then this Mistress Reynolds does
not say she is her child, but only she
calls
her so.
Pshaw! Is that all? It is the way of my country
people, Jaubert; their indirectness is proverbial. If
one of them were to say yes or no, you might
suspect some deep mystery. I confess I was at first
startled with the little girl's emotion, but I soon
perceived
it was nothing but shame and embarrassment at
the curiosity she had betrayed. I see how it is,
Jaubert
;
fruitless and hopeless as is our search, you
cannot
bear to relinquish it, and are looking for some
coup de thtre
some sudden transition from
disappointment
to success.
We have put into plain English a conversation that
was supported in French, and was now broken off by
the approach of Mrs. Reynolds, who came to tell the
travellers their bedrooms were ready. By the light
of the candle she brought, she discovered Mary
concealed
in a corner of the passage close to the door,
where, in breathless stillness, she had been listening.
You here, Mary! exclaimed the good woman; I
thought you had been in bed this half hour. You will
make me angry with you, Mary, if you do not mind
me better than this, she added in an under tone, and
the child stole away, but without looking either very
penitent or very fearful; and in truth she had cause
for neither penitence nor fear, for she had only
gratified
an innocent and almost irrepressible inclination,
and as to Dame Reynolds's anger, it was never
formidable
.
The travellers retired to their respective apartments,
and while the landlady lingered to adjust her parlour,
the letter that had been left on the table caught her
eye. Nothing could be more natural than for her to
look at the superscription. Painfully she spelt out
the first line.
A Monsieur, Monsieur
but when
she came to the next, her eye was rivetted,
St. Jean
Angely de Crve-Cur
. After gazing on it till she
had made assurance doubly sure, she was hastening to
her husband to participate the discovery with him,
when, apparently changing her intentions, she
retreated
,
bolted the door, and returned to the examination
of the letter. It was unsealed. Reluctant to open it,
she compromised with her conscience, and peeped in
at both ends, but the writing was not perceptible, and
her interest overcoming her scruples, she unfolded the
letter. Alas! it was in French. In vain her eye ran
over the manuscript to catch some words that might
serve as clues to the rest. There was nothing in all
the three pages she could comprehend, but
arriv
New Yorkla rivire d'Hudsonle manoir
de Livingston
.
She was refolding the letter, when the following
postscript, inadvertently written in English, caught her
eye; As we have no encouragement to proceed
farther
in our search, and Jean and Avenel are all
impatience
,
Jaubert will embark in the Neptune, which is
to sail on the first.
A gleam of pleasure shot across Mrs. Reynolds's
face, but it soon darkened again with anxiety and
perplexity
.
Why did I open the letter? she asked
herself. Why did I look at it at all? But nobody
will ever know that I have seen it unless I tell it
myself
;
and why should I tell? A burst of tears
concluded
this mental interrogation, and proved that,
however earnestly her heart might plead before the
tribunal of conscience, yet the stern decision of that
unerring judge was heard. Self-interest has a hard
task when it would mystify the path of one who
habitually
walks by the clear light of truth straight onward
in the path of duty.
It may seem unnatural to the inexperienced, that
Mrs. Reynolds did not communicate her
embarrassment
and irresolution, from whatever cause they
proceeded
,
to her husband; but she well knew what would
be the result of a consultation; for he, good man,
never viewed a subject but from one position, and we
are all slow to ask advice that we foresee will be
counter to our wishes.
Mrs. Reynolds, so far then from appealing to the
constituted authority of her household, locked her
discovery
within her own bosom, and, to avoid all
suspicion
and inquiry, she composed herself as soon as
possible, and retired to her bed, but not to sleep; and
at peep of dawn, she was up and prepared to obtain all
the satisfaction that indirect interrogation could
procure
from the travellers, and her mental resolution,
invigorated
by a night's solitary reflection, was to act
up to her light.
They had ordered breakfast at a very early hour,
and she took care to be the only person in attendance
on them. When they were seated at table, she placed
herself in a rocking chair behind them, a position that
happily reconciles the necessity of service with the
dignity of independence, and began her meditated
approaches
,
by saying to her own countryman, I
believe
you left a letter here last night, sir; I laid it in
the cupboard for fear of accidents.
Thank you, ma'am; I ought to have been more
careful. It was a letter of some consequence.
Indeed! Well, I was thinking it might be.
Ah! what made you think so?
Now we must premise, that neither of the parties
speaking knew anything of that sensitiveness that
starts from a question as if an attack were made on
private property; but they possessed, in common, the
good-natured communicativeness that is said to
characterize
the New England people, who, in their
colloquial
traffic, as in other barter, hold exchange to be
no robbery.
Most women are born diplomatists, and Mrs.
Reynolds
took care to reply to the last interrogatory so
carefully as not to commit herself. It stands to
reason
,
she said, a letter that is to go all the way over
the wide sea to the old countries, should be of
consequence
.
Yesit is a long voyage.
You have taken it yourself, perhaps, sir?
I have. I went out an officer on board one of our
cruisers, and was wrecked on the coast of France.
Of France! Well, we are hand and glove with
the French now; but I tell my husband it seems to
me like joining with our enemies against those of our
own household.
Ah! Mrs. Reynolds, `friends are sometimes better
than kindred.' I am sure my own father's son could
not have been kinder to me than was Monsieur Angely
de Creve-Curhey, Jaubert?
Ah! vraiment, Monsieur! c'est un bien brave
homme, Monsieur St. Jean Angely
.
Angely! said Mrs. Reynolds, as if recalling
some faded recollection, AngelyI think I have
heard that name before.
It may be. The gentleman I speak of resided
some time in this country.
But it can't be the same, replied Mrs. Reynolds;
for the person I speak of lived over in Livingston's
manner;
and kind to strangers he could not be, for he
deserted his own flesh and blood, and went off early in
the war.
It may be the same for all that, and must be. As
to his deserting his children, `thereby hangs a tale;'
but it is a long one.
Well, sir, if you have anything to say in his favour,
I am bold to say I think you ought to speak it;
especially
as the gentleman seems to have stood your friend
in a cloudy day. The story certainly went sadly
against him here.
I have not the slightest objection, ma'am, to
telling
the story, if you have the patience to hear it;
especially
as I see I must wait till Jaubert has finished
two more of your nice fresh eggs`eggs of an hour,'
Mrs. Reynolds.
We always calculate to have fresh eggs, sir. But
what was you going to say of Mr. Angely; she
added
,
betraying, in the tremulous tones of her voice,
some emotion more heart stirring than curiosity.
Jaubert turned a glance of inquiry on her that was
answered
by a sudden rush of blood to her cheeks; but
the narrator proceeded without noticing anything
extraordinary
.
It was my good, or ill luck, he said,
and it is only in the long run we can tell whether
luck be good or illbut it was my luck to be
ship-wrecked
on the coast of Normandy, and good luck it
certainly was, Jaubert, in my distress, to make such a
port as the Chateau de Creve-Curthe castle, or, as
we should call it here, Mrs. Reynolds, the estate of
the Angely's. A fine family they are. You may
think what a pleasure it was to me to find a gentleman
acquainted with my country, and speaking my
language
as did Mr. St. Jean Angely. He was kind and
affable to me, and always doing something for my
pleasure, but I could see he had a heaviness at his
heartthat he was often talking of one thing and
thinking of anothernothing like so gay as the old
gentleman, his father; who was like a fall flowerone
of your marigolds, Mrs. Reynolds, spreading itself
open to every ray of sunshine, as if there were no
frosts and winter and death at hand. I felt a pity for
the young man. With every thing that heart could
desire, and without a heart to enjoy, he seemed to me
like a sick man seated at a feast of which he could not
Y
taste. The day before I was to have come away, he
took me aside, and, after saying that I had won his
entire
confidence, he disclosed to me the following
particulars
:
He entered the French army early in life, and
while yet a hotblooded, inconsiderate youth, he killed
a brother officer in a duel, and was obliged to fly his
country. He took refuge in Lisbon. Judgment, I
may say mercy, tooin the dealings of Providence,
Mrs. Reynolds, one is always close on the track of the
otherfollowed him thither. Mr. Angely found
employment
in a mercantile house, and was standing
writing
at his desk at the moment of the terrible
earthquake
that laid Lisbon in ruins. The timbers of the
house in which he was, were pitched in such a
manner
as to form a sort of arch over his head, on which
the falling roof was sustained, and thus he was as it
were, miraculously delivered from danger. From
Lisbon
he came to this country. `Mechanics,' says a
Spanish proverb, `make the best pilgrims,' but, I am
sure, not better than Frenchmen; for cast them where
you will, they will get an honest living. Mr. Angely
came up into Livingston's Manor, and there he took a
fancy to a pretty Yankee girl, the only child of a
widow, and married her. He earned a subsistence for
his family by surveying. The country was new, and
skilful surveyors scarce. After a few years his wife
died and left him three children.
Three! repeated Mrs. Reynolds, involuntarily
sighing.
Yes, poor things! there
were
three of them; too
many to be left in these hard times, fatherless and
motherless.
Ah sir! and what must we think of the father that
could forsake his little children at such a time?
Think no evil, my friend; for Mr. Angely did not
deserve it. He was employed by Mrs. Livingston,
early in the war, to go down the river to survey some
land near New York. There he was taken by the
British as a spy, and, in spite of his remonstrances,
sent to England. This was before the French had
taken part with us, and he obtained leave to go to
France, on giving his parole that he would not return
to America. He received a parent's welcome, and the
affair of the duel being nearly forgotten, a pardon was
obtained for him without difficulty. If he could have
forgotten his children, he would have been as happy as
man could be; but his anxiety for them preyed on his
health and spirits; and when I arrived at the chateau,
his friends imagined he was sinking under some
unknown
disease. He had not communicated to his
father the fact of his marriage and the existence of his
children when I arrived there. The old gentleman,
kind hearted and reasonable in the main, has all the
prejudices of the nobility in the old countries about
birth, and his son was afraid to confess that he had
smuggled an ignoble little Yankee into the ancient
family of the Greve-Curs. So good an opportunity
as I afforded of communicating with his children, could
not be passed by, and he at length summoned courage
to tell the truth to his father. At first he was wroth
enough, and stormed and vapoured; but after a little
while his kind nature got the mastery of the blood of
the Creve-Curs, and he consented to the children
being
sent forthe boys at least.
Only the boys! exclaimed Mrs. Reynolds,
feeling
relieved from an insupportable weight.
Only the boys. But the old gentleman might
have as well saved all his credit and sent for the girl
too; but that was not his pleasure. Well, Monsieur
Jaubert here, a relative and particular friend of the
family, came out with me to take charge of the
children
.
We found the boys without much difficulty;
two noble little fellows that a king might be proud of.
After waiting for some time for Monsieur Angely's
return
,
the overseers of the poor, believing he had
abandoned
his children bound them out. The little girl
had been removed to some distance from her brothers.
We found the place where she had been, but not the
family. The husband and wife had quarrelled, and
separated, and disappeared; and all the information
we could obtain, was a vague story that such a child
had lived there and had run away; and as nobody in
these troublesome times can do more than look after
their own children, this poor thing was left to her fate.
Hopeless as it appears, Jaubert is not willing to give up
our search. He fancies every brunette he sees is the lost
Marie, and only last evening he would have persuaded
me, that your black eyed little girl might be this stray
scion of the Creve-Curs.
Mrs. Reynolds rose and left the room, and did not
return till she was sufficiently composed to ask, in an
assured voice, What was their object in looking for the
girl, if the father did not mean to reclaim her?
He did mean to reclaim and provide for her,
replied
the traveller, and for that purpose I have ample
funds in my hands. He only conceded to the old
gentleman her remaining in the country for the
present
.
Had you any direction as to how you were to
dispose
of her?
Yes, positive orders to convey her to Boston, and
place her under the guardianship of a French lady who
resides there, a friend of Mr. Angelyone Madame
Adelon.
But could you find no trace of the child?
Not the slightest.
And you have determined to make no farther
inquiry?
Why should we? Inquiry is useless, and would but
delay, to a tempestuous season, Jaubert's return with
the boys.
Our readers are doubtless sufficiently aware, that the
adopted child of our good landlady was the missing
child of Monsieur Angely. A few words will be
necessary to explain how she became possessed of
her.
Mrs. Reynolds and her husband were, two years
prior to this period, approaching the close of a winter
day's ride. Their sleigh was gliding noiselessly
through a dry, new fallen snow, when their attention
was arrested by the moanings of a child. To stop the
horses and search for the sufferer from whom the
sounds proceeded, was the instinctive impulse of
benevolence
.
They had not gone many yards from the
road, when, nestled close to a rock, and in some
measure
defended from the cold by a clump of laurels, they
found a little girl, her hands and feet frozen, and nearly
insensible. They immediately carried her to the
sleigh, and put their horses to their utmost speed; but,
as they were none of the fleetest, and the nearest
habitation
was at several miles distance, a considerable
time elapsed before they could obtain the means of
restoration, and in consequence of this delay, and of
severe
previous suffering, it was many weeks before the
child recovered. In the mean time, though Mrs.
Reynolds's
residence was not more than thirty miles from
the place where she had found the child, no inquiry
was made for her. The account she gave of herself
sufficiently explained this neglect. She said she had
no mother; that her father had left home just after the
snows melted and the birds came back; that he had
left her and her two brothers, Jean and Avenel, with
a woman to take care of them; that when this woman
had waited a great while for their father, she grew
tired and was cross to them, and then she too went
away and left them quite alone. Then she said they
had nothing to eat, and she supposed they were the
poor, for the men they called the overseers of the poor
took her and her brothers, and separated them, and she
was carried a great way off to a woman who was very
cross to her, and cross to her own children, and her
Y 2
husband was cross too. One night he came home in
a great passion, and he began to whip his wife with
his big whip, and his wife beat him with the hot shovel,
and she, the child, was scared, ran out of the house,
and far up into a wood, to get beyond their cries; and
when she would have returned, the snow was falling,
and she could not find the path, and she had wandered
about till she was so cold and tired she could go no
further. Her name, she said, was Angely, and she
believed her father was called a Frenchman. The
only parental relic she possessed confirmed this
statement
.
It was a locket she wore suspended at her
neck. It contained a lock of hair; an armorial crest
was engraven on the back, and under it was inscribed,
St. Jean Angely de Creve-Cur. This simple
story established the conviction, that had been gaining
strength in Mrs. Reynolds's mind, with every day's
attendance on the interesting child, that they had been
brought together by the special providence of God;
and most faithfully did she discharge the maternal
duties that she believed had been thus miraculously
imposed on her. The little girl was on her part happy
and delighted, and though she sometimes bitterly
lamented
her father and brothers, yet, as the impressions
of childhood are slight, the recollection of them was
almost effaced when the mysterious energies of
memory
were awakened by the sound of a language that
seemed to have been utterly forgotten. These events
occurred during the revolutionary war, a period of
disaster
and distress, when a very diligent search for a
friendless child was not likely to be made, and as no
inquiry ever reached Mrs. Reynolds's ear, and as she
deemed the foundling an orphan, she had not hesitated
to appropriate her. Her name was changed from Marie
Angely to Mary Reynolds; and the good woman
seemed as secure and happy as any mother, save when
she was reminded of the imperfection of her title by
the too curious inquiries of travellers. On these
occasions
,
she was apt to betray a little irritability, and to
veil the truth with a slight evasion, as in the instance
which excited the suspicion of our sagacious
Frenchman
.
Her condition was now a pitiable one. She had the
tenderness, but not the rights of a parent. She was
habitually pure and upright; but now she was strongly
swayed by her affections. She would have persuaded
herself, that the abandonment in which she first found
the child, invested her with a paramount claim; but
the stranger's story had proved that her father had not
voluntarily abandoned her. Then she thought, It
cannot be for Mary's interest, that I should give her
up; and her mind took a rapid survey of the growing
property of which the child was the heir apparent.
But she would ask herself, What do I know of the
fortune of her father? But surely he cannot, he
cannot love her as I do. Ah I do not know the
feeling of a real parent; and a burst of tears expressed
the sadness of this conviction, and obliged her
abruptly
to withdraw from the presence of her guests, and
leave them amazed at her sudden and violent emotion,
while she retired to her own apartment, to implore
guidance and support from Heaven. Those who
honestly ask for light to point out a way which they
would fain not see, and for power to endure a burden
from which their nature shrinks, are often themselves
astonished at the illumination vouchsafed, and the
strength imparted. This was the experience of Mrs.
Reynolds. She rose from her devotions with the
conviction, that but one course remained to her, and
with a degree of tranquillity hastened to Mary's
bed-room
.
The child was just risen and dressed. Without any
explanation to hershe was at the moment incapable
of making anyshe tied her locket, her sole
credential
,
around her neck, led her down stairs, and placing
her hand in Jaubert's, she said, You have found the
child! and then retreated to hide the emotion she
could not subdue.
It was fortunate for her, that she was not compelled
to witness the gay demonstrations of Jaubert's ecstasies,
the graver, but not more equivocal manifestations of
his companion's satisfaction, and the amazement and
curiosity of the little girl, who was listening to the
explanation of the strangers, with childlike animation,
without adverting to her approaching separation from
her who had given her the affection and cares of a
parent.
But when she came to be severed from this kind
friend, she made amends for her thoughtlessness. She
clung to her as if nature had knit the bonds that united
them; and, amid her cries and sobs, she promised
always to remember and love her as a mother. Many
have made such promises. Marie Angely kept them.
Ten years subsequent to the events above narrated,
a letter, of which the following is a translation, was
addressed by a foreigner in a high official station in
this country, to his friend.
Dear Berville
It is, I believe, or should be, a maxim of the true
church, that confession of a sin is the first step
towards
its expiation.
Let me, then, invest you with a priest's cassock,
and relieve my conscience by the relation of an odd
episode in my history. When I parted from you, I
was going with my friend, Robert Ellison, to visit his
father, who has a beautiful place on the banks of the
Hudson. Young Ellison, as you know, is a thorough
republican, and does not conceal his contempt for those
of his compatriots, who, professing the same
principles
,
are really aristocrats in their prejudices and
manners
;
who, having parted, and as they pretend
voluntarily
,
with the substance, still grasp at the shadow.
To test these false pretensions, and to mortify an
absurd
pride, he joyfully acquiesced in a proposition I
made to him, to lay aside the pomp and circumstance
of my official character, and to be presented to his
friends without any of the accidental advantages with
which fortune has invested me. You will inquire my
motive, for you will not suspect me of the absurdity
of crusading against the follies of society, the most
hopeless of all crusades. No, as our own Moliere
says,
C'est une folie,  nulle autre seconde,
De vouloir se mler de corriger le monde.
My motives were then, in the first place, a love of
ease, of dishabille; an impatience of the irksomeness of
having the dignity of a nation to sustain; and, in the
second place, I wished to ascertain how much of the
favour lavished on me I should place to the account of
the ambassador, and how much I might reserve to my
own proper self.
You may call this latent vanity. I will not
quarrel
with you. I will not pretend that I was moved
solely by a love of truth, by a pure desire to find out
the realities of things; but alas! my dear Berville, if
we were to abstract from the web of our motives,
every thread tinged with self, would not warp and
woof too disappear? Let, then, my motive be what
it might, you will allow the experiment required
courage.
We had some difficulty in settling the precise point
at which to gage my pretensions. `Do not claim a
drop of noble blood,' said my friend, `it would defeat
your purpose.' There is something cabalistic in that
word `noble.' The young ladjes at  would at
once invest you with the attributes of romance; and
the old dowagers would persecute you with histories
of their titled ancestors, and anecdotes of lords and
ladies that figured in the drawing-rooms of the colony.
Neither must you be a plain gentleman of fortune,
though that may seem to you a sufficient descent from
your high station; but fortune has everywhere her
shrines and her devotees. You must be the artificer
of your own fortune, a talented young man who has
no rank or fortune to be spoken of. What say you to
the profession of a painter, a portrait painter, since that
is the only branch of the art that gets a man bread in
this country.' I acceded without shrinking, secretly
flattering myself that my friend either underrated my
intrinsic merit, or did the world rank injustice.
When we arrived we found a large party of the
neighbouring gentry assembled to dine at . I
was received with great courtesy by the elder Ellison,
and with kindness by Madame, on the ground, simply,
of being an acquaintance of their son's. My friend
took care to prevent any elation from my reception by
saying to me in a low voice, `My father, God bless
him, has good sense, good feeling, and experience, and
he well knows that the value of gold does not depend
on the circulation it has obtained;' and truly if he
had known that I bore the impress of the king's
countenance
he could not have received me more graciously.
There might have been more formality in his
reception
of the public functionary, but there could not have
been more genuine hospitality. He presented me to
his guests, and here I was first reminded of my
disguise
.
Instead of the sensation I have been accustomed
to see manifested in the lighting up of the face, in the
deferential bow, or the blush of modesty, no emotion
was visible. No eye rested on me, not a link of
conversation
was broken, and I was suffered, after rather
an awkward passage through the ceremony, to retire
to my seat, where I remained, observing, but not
observed
,
till dinner was announced. From the habit of
precedence, I was advancing to lead Madame to the
dining-room, when I encountered my friend's glance,
and shrunk back in time to avoid what must have
appeared an unpardonable impertinence. I now fell
into my modest station in the rear, and offered my
arm to an awkward, bashful girl, who I am sure had
two left hands by the manner in which she received
my courtesy, and who did not honour me so far as to
look up to see who it was that had saved her from the
mortifying dilemma of leaving the drawingroom alone.
I helped my companion from the dish nearest to me,
and waited myself till Madame, reminded by her son
of her oversight, sent me a plate of soup. I was
swallowing this, unmolested by any conversation
addressed
to me, when my friend's father said to him,
`When have you seen the French ambassador, Robert?
I hoped you would have persuaded him to pay us a
visit.'
`Perhaps he may,' replied my friend, `before the
summer is over. He is at present out of the city on
some excursion.'
`A prodigious favourite is your son with the French
ambassador, as I hear from all quarters,' said a
gentleman
who sat next to Mr. Ellison.
`Ah! is that so, Robert? Are you intimate with
Monsieur ?'
`He does me the honour to permit my society,
sir.' Every mouth was now opened in praise of the
ambassador. None of the company had seen him, but
all had heard of his abilities, the charms of his
conversation
,
his urbanity, his
savoir plaire
. `You must be
proud of your countryman, M. Dufau?' (this was my
assumed name) said my host, with that courtesy that
finds a word for the humblest guest.
I said it was certainly gratifying to my national
feeling to find him approved in America, but that,
perhaps
it was not his merit alone that obtained him such
distinguished favour; that I had understood he was a
great admirer of this country, and though I should do
him injustice to say `he praised, only to be praised,'
yet I believed there was always a pretty accurately
measured exchange in this traffic.
`The gentleman is right,' said an old Englishman
who sat opposite to me, and who had not before
vouchsafed
to manifest a consciousness of my existence; `this
is all French palaver in Monsieur . He cannot
be such a warm admirer of this country. The man
knows better; he has been in England.'
I was too well acquainted with English manners
to be startled by any manifestation of that conviction
which an Englishman demonstrates in every part of
the world, that his nation has no equal; but I
instinctively
defended my countryman, and eager for an
opportunity to test the colloquial powers so much
admired
in the ambassador, I entered the lists with my
English opponent, and thus stimulated, I was certainly
far more eloquent than I ever had been before, on the
history, the present condition, and the prospects of
this country. But alas for the vanity of M. Dufau!
my host, it is true, gave me all the attention he could
spare from the courtesies of the table, but save his ear,
I gained none but that half-accorded by my
contemptuous
,
testy, and impatient antagonist, who after
barking
out a few sentences at me, relapsed into a moody
silence.
I next addressed some trifling gallantries to my
bashful neighbour, fancying that she who was
neglected
by everybody else, would know how to
appreciate
my attentions; but her eyes were rivetted to a
fashionable beauty at the upper extremity of the table,
and a half a dozen `no sirs' and `yes sirs,' misplaced,
were all the return I could obtain from her. To
remain
silent and passive, you know, to me, was
impossible
;
so I next made an essay on a vinegar faced dame on
my left, far in the wane of life. `If my civilities have
been lead elsewhere, in this market,' thought I, `they
will at least prove silver or gold.' But here I received
my cruellest rebuff; for the lady, after apparently
listening to me, said, `I do not understand you.' I
raised my voice, but she, determining to shelter the
infirmity of age at my expense, replied, `I am not so
deaf, sir, but really you speak such broken English,
that I cannot understand you.' This was too much,
and I might have betrayed my vexation, if an
intelligent
and laughing glance from my friend had not
restored my good humour, and a second reflection,
suggesting that it was far more important to the old
woman's happiness that her vanity should remain
unimpaired
,
than it could be to me to have mine reduced,
even to fragments, I humbly begged her pardon, and
relapsed into a contented silence, solacing myself with
the thought, that our encounter was but an illustration
of that of the china and earthen jars. But I will not
weary you with detailing all the trials of my
philosophy
,
but only confess that the negligence of the
servants was not the least of themthe grinning
self-complacency
with which these apes of their superiors
signified to me that my wants might be deferred.
After all, my humble position would not have been
so disagreeable, if I had been accustomed to it. The
world's admiration, like all other luxuries, in the end
becomes necessary, and then, too, like other luxuries,
ceases to be enjoyed, or even felt, till it is withdrawn
and leaves an aching void. If this is Irish, set it down
to my broken English.
After dinner, I followed the ladies to the
drawing-room
,
and was presented by my friend to Miss ,
a reigning beauty. She received me with one of
those gracious smiles, that a hacknied belle always
bestows on a new worshipper at her shrine. These
popular favourites, be it clergyman, politician, or
beauty
,
are as covetous of the flatteries they receive,
as a miser is of gold. No matter how unclean the
vessel from which the incense rises; no matter what
Z
base alloy, may mingle with the precious metal.
Have you ever encountered one of these spoiled
favourites
in the thronged street, and tried to arrest the
attention for a moment; to fix the eye that was roving
for every tributary glance? If you have, you will
understand without my describing it, the
distrait
manner with which the belle received my first
compliments
.
Even this was not long accorded me, for a
better accredited and more zealous admirer than
myself
appearing, she left me to my meditations, which
were not rendered the more agreeable by my
overhearing
an old lady say, in a voice, which, though slightly
depressed, she evidently made no effort to subdue to
an inaudible key, `I wonder what possessed Robert
Ellison to bring that French portrait painter here!
How the world has changed since the Revolution!
There is no longer any house where you don't meet
mixed society.' My friend had approached in time
to overhear her as well as myself. `The ignorant old
fool!' he exclaimed, `shall I tell her that artists are
the nobility of every country?'
`No,' said I, `do not waste your rhetoric; there is
no enlightening the ignorance of stupidity; a black
substance will not reflect even the sun's rays.'
Ellison then proposed that I should join a party at
whist; but I complained of the heated air of the
drawing-room
,
and, availing myself of my insignificance, I
followed the bent of my inclinations, a privilege the
humble should not undervalue, and sauntered abroad.
The evening was beautiful enough to have soothed a
misanthrope, or warmed the heart of a stoic. Its peace,
its salutary, sacred voice restored me to myself, and I
was ashamed that my tranquillity had been disturbed.
I contemned the folly of the artificial distinctions of
life, and felt quite indifferent to themwhen alone.
The ground in front of my friend's house slopes to
the Hudson, and is still embellished with trees of the
majestic native growth. Where nature has left
anything
to be supplied by art, walks have been arranged
and planted; but carefully, so as not to impede the
view of the river, which was now in perfect repose.
A sloop lay in the channel, its sails all furled, idly
floating on the slumbering surface. While I was
wishing
my friend were with me, for I am too much of a
Frenchman to relish fully even nature, the favourite
companion of sentimentalists, in solitude, I saw a boat
put off from the little vessel, and row slowly towards the
shore. Presently a sweet female voice swelled on the
stillness of the night, accompanied by the notes of a
guitar, struck by a practised hand. Could any young
man's mercury resist moonlight and such music? Mine
could not, and I very soon left behind me all of
terra
firma
that intervened between me and the siren, and
ensconced myself in a deeply shaded nook at the very
water's edge, where I could see and hear without being
observed. The boat approached the spot where I
stood, and was moored at half a dozen yards from my
feet; but as my figure was in shadow, and sheltered
by a thick copse of hazel bushes, I was perfectly
concealed
,
while, by a flood of moonbeams, that poured on
my unsuspicious neighbours, I saw them as plainly as
if it were daylight. These were two men, whom I
soon ascertained to be the captain of the sloop and an
attendant, and that they were going to a farm house in
the neighbourhood for eggs, milk, &c. The two
females
were to remain in the boat till their return.
The lady of the guitar was inclined to go with them
as far as the oak wood on the brow of the hill; but the
captain persuaded her to remain in the boat, by telling
her there was a formidable dog on the place, which
she might encounter. As soon as the captain was gone,
her companion, an elderly, staid looking country
woman
,
said to her, `Now, child, as I came here for
your pleasure, you must sing for mine. None of your
new-fangled fancies, but good Old Robin Grey.'
`Oh, Robin Grey is a doleful ditty; but anything
to reward you for indulging me in coming on shore.'
She then sung that touching ballad. The English,
certainly the Scotch, excel us as much in the pathos of
unembellished nature and truth, as we do them in all
literary refinement, ingenuity, and grace. I know not
how much of the tribute that gushed from my heart
was paid to the poetry and music, and how much to
the beautiful organ by which they were expressed, for
the fair musician looked herself like one of the bright
creations of poetry. I would describe her, but
description
is cold and quite inadequate to convey an
idea of her, and of the scene with which she
harmonized
.
It was one of nature's sweetest accords; the
balmy air, the cloudless sky, the river, reflecting like
a spotless mirror the blue arch, the moon and her
bright train; my enchantress, the embodied spirit of
the evening, and her music the voice of nature. I
might have forgotten that I was in human mould, but
I had one effectual curb to my imagination; one
mortal
annoyance. Argus, confound him! had followed
me from the house, and it was only by dint of
continued
coaxing and caressing that I could keep him
quiet. Before the ballad was finished, however, he
was soothed by its monotonous sadness, and crouching
at my feet, he fell asleep, I believe. I forgot him.
Suddenly `the dainty spirit' changed from the low
breathings of melancholy to a gay French airthe
very air, Berville, that Claudine, in her mirthful
moments
,
used to sing to us. The transition was so
abrupt that it seemed as if the wing of joy had swept
over the strings of her instrument. I started forth
from my concealment. That was not all. Argus sprang
out, too, and barking furiously, bounded towards the
boat. The old woman screamed, `There is the dog!'
and the young lady, not less terrified, dropped her
guitar, and unhooking the boat, she seized an oar and
pushed it off without listening to my apologies and
assurances
.
In her agitation she dropped the oar, and
her companion, still more tremulous than herself, in
her attempt to regain it, lost the other, which she had
instinctively grasped. As soon as the first impulse
imparted to the boat was expended, it scarcely moved
at all, and I had leisure to explain my sudden
appearance
,
and to say that my dog, far from being the
formidable
animal they imagined, was a harmless spaniel,
who should immediately make all the amends in his
power for the terror he had caused. I then directed
him to the floating oars. He plunged into the water
and brought them to me, but he either did not, or
would not understand my wish that he should convey
them to the boat, which, though very slowly, was
evidently
receding from the shore. I then without farther
hesitation, threw off my coat, swam to the boat, and
receiving there the oars from Argus's mouth, I soon
reconducted the boat to its haven. There was
something
enchanting to me in the frankness with which
my fair musician expressed her pleasure at the homage
I had involuntarily paid to her art, and the grace with
which she received the slight service I rendered her.
Perhaps I felt it the more for the mortifying
experience
of the day. I do not care very nicely to analyze
my feelings, nor to ascertain how much there was of
restored self complacency in the delicious excitement
of that hour.
The elderly lady, for lady she must needs be
since my fair
incognita
called her mother, expressed
a matronly solicitude about the effect of my wet
garments
,
but I assured her that I apprehended no
inconvenience
from them, and I begged to be allowed to
remain at my station till the return of their
attendants
.
The circumstances of our introduction had been
such as to dissipate all ceremony. Indeed this
characteristic
of English manners would have as ill fitted
the trustful, ingenuous, and gay disposition of my new
acquaintance, as a coat of mail her light, graceful
person
.
Z 2
She sung at my request, our popular opera airs,
with more effect, because with far more feeling, than
our best professed artists. She talked of music, and
of the poetry of nature, with genius and taste; and she
listened with that eager and pleased attention, which is
the second best gift of conversation. I should have
taken no note of the passage of time but for the
fidgetting
of the old lady, who often interrupted us with
expressions
of her concern at the captain's delay, for
which he, quite too soon, appeared to render an
account
himself. As I was compelled to take my leave,
I asked my fair unknown if I might not be allowed to
think of her by some more accurate designation than
the `Lady of the Guitar.'
`My name is'she replied promptly, and then,
after a moment's hesitation, added, `Nopardon me,
your romantic designation better suits the adventure of
the night.' I was vexed at my disappointment, but
she chased away the shade of displeasure by the
graceful
playfulness with which she kissed her hand to me
as the boat pushed off. I lingered on the shore till she
had reached the vessel, and then slowly retraced my
steps towards the house. I was startled by meeting
my friend, for my mind was so absorbed that I had not
heard his approaching footstep `Ah!' he exclaimed,
`is this your philosophy? turned misanthrope at the
first frown from the world.'
`My philosophy,' I replied, `has neither been
vanquished
,
nor has it conquered, for I had forgotten all
its trials.'
My friend evidently believed, notwithstanding my
disclaimer, that my vanity required some indemnity
for the humiliations it had sustained, and he repeated
to me some assuaging compliments from his father.
`But,' he concluded, `tell me, have you really turned
sentimentalist, and been holding high converse with
the stars?'
`With a most brilliant star,' I replied, and related
my adventure.
Ellison's curiosity was excited, and he proposed
we should take our flutes, go out in the barge, and
serenade the `Lady of the Guitar.' I, of course,
assented
,
and the next half hour found us floating around
the little vessel like humble satellites. We played an
accompaniment and sung alternately, he in English,
and I in French; but there was no token given that
the offered incense was accepted; no salutation, save a
coarse one from the captain, who invited us to go `on
board and take some
grog
.' We of course declined
his professional courtesy. `Then, for the Lord's sake,
lads,' he said, `stop your piping, and give us a good
berth. Sleep, at this time o'night, is better music
than the jolliest tune that ever was played.'
Thus dismissed, and discomfited by the lady's
neglect
,
we resumed our oars and were preparing to
return
to the shore, when the cabin window was gently
raised, and our fair
incognita
sung a sweet little
French air, beginning `
Adieu, adieu!
' We remained,
sound, motion, almost breath suspended till the song
was finished.
So sweetly she bids us adieu,
I think that she bids us return,
said my friend, and we instantly rowed our boat
towards
the stern of the vessel. At this moment the
sash was suddenly dropped, and taking this for a
definitive `Good night,' we retired.
Now, dear Berville, I have faithfully related the
adventures of my masquerademy boyish pastime,
you may call it. Be it so. This day has been worth
a year of care and dignity. I shall return to New
York in a few days. Till then farewell.
Yours,
Constant
.
But though M. Constant professed himself satisfied
with his day, there was a lurking disquietude at his
heart. He had written to assure himself there was
nothing there he dare not express, and yet he had
concluded
without once alluding to the cause of his
self-reproach
.
He had folded the letter, but he opened it,
and added;
P. S. I did not describe to you my friend's
vexation
that the responded song was in French. `Ah!'
said he, `I see there is no chance for such poor devils
as I, so long as you are neither married nor
betrothed
.'
He again closed the letter, and was for a moment
satisfied that there could be nothing in the nature of
that which he had so frankly communicated that
required concealment. He walked to the window and
eyed the little vessel as a miser looks at the casket
that contains his treasure; then starting from his
reverie, he took from his bosom a miniature, and
contemplated
it steadfastly for a few moments; It is my
conscience that reproaches me, he said, and not
this serene, benign countenance. O Emma! thou art
equally incapable of inflicting and resenting wrong,
and shall thy trust and gentleness be returned by even
a transient treachery? Am I so sure of faithfully
keeping
the citadel that I may parley with an enemy?
The result of this self-examination was a
determination
to burn the letter, and to dismiss for ever from
his mind the enchantress whose power had so swayed
him from his loyalty. But though he turned from
the window, resolutely closed the blind, and excluded
the moonlight, which he fancied influenced his
imagination
as if he were a lunatic; though he went to bed
and sunk into oblivious sleep, the spirit was not laid.
Imagination revelled in its triumph over the will. He
was in France, in beautiful Francemore beautiful
now than in the visions of memory and affection. He
was at his remembered haunts in his father's grounds;
the Lady of the Guitar was with him; she sang his
favourite songs; he saw her sparkling glance, her
glowing
cheek, her rich, dark tints,
The embrowning of the fruit that tells
How rich within, the soul of sweetness dwells;
he heard the innocent childlike laugh, that,
without any control,
Save the sweet one of gracefulness rung from her soul.
Then there was interposed between him and this
embodied
spirit of his joyous clime a slowly moving
figure; a cold, fair, pensive countenance, that had more
of sorrow than resentment, but, still, though its
reproach
was gentle, it was the reproach of the stern
spectre of conscience. He cast down his eyes, and
they fell on the word BETROTHED, traced in the
sand at his feet. The Lady of the Guitar was gaily
advancing towards him. Another step and her flowing
mantle would have swept over the word, and effaced
it forever. He raised his hand to deprecate her
approach
,
and awoke; and while the visions of sleep still
confusedly mingled with the recollections and
resolutions
of the preceding day, he was up and at the
window; had thrown open the blind and ascertained
that the vessel still lay becalmed in the stream. That
virtue is certainly to be envied, that does not need to
be shielded and fortified by opportunity and
circumstance
.
If the vessel had disappeared, the recollections
of the evening might have been as evanescent and
ineffectual as the dreams of the night; but there it was,
in fine relief, and as motionless as if it were encased in
the blue waters. In spite of M. Constant's excellent
resolutions, he lingered at the window, and returned
there as if he were spellbound. Strange power that
could rivet his eyes to an ill shapen little Dutch
skipper
!
But that body did contain a spirit, and that spirit,
seemingly as perturbed as his own, soon appeared,
moving with a light step to and fro on the deck.
The apartment M. Constant occupied, was furnished,
among other luxuries, with a fine spyglass. To resist
using this facility for closer communion was
impossible
;
and by its aid he could perceive every motion
of the lady of his thoughts, almost the changes of
her countenance. He saw she was gazing on the shore,
and that she turned eagerly to her companion to point
her attention to some object that had caught her eye,
and at the same moment he perceived it was his friend,
who was strolling on the shore. Ellison saw him too,
and waved his handkerchief in salutation. M.
Constant
returned the greeting, threw down the glass, and
withdrew from the window with a feeling of
compunction
at his indulgence, as if he had again heard
that word
betrothed
spoken. Why is it that external
agents have so much influence over the mysterious
operations of conscience? Why is it that its energy so
often sleeps while there is no witness to the wrong we
commit? Keep thy heart, for out of it are the issues
of life.
After breakfast, Ellison said to M. Constant, I am
afraid you find your masquerade dull. Let us beguile
the morning by a visit to your `Lady of the Guitar.'
There is nothing lends such wings to time as a pretty
girl. Our guests are a dull concern.
A dull concern, when there is a beauty and a
fortune
among them!
Yes, a sated belle is to me as disagreeable as a
pampered child; as my grandmother's little pet Rosy,
whom I saw the other day, tossing away her sugar
plums, and crying `'Tis not sweet enough;' and as to
fortune, though I am neither a philosopher nor a
sentimentalist, I shall never take the temple of Hymen
in my way to wealth; for of all speculations, a
matrimonial
speculation seems to me the most hazardous,
and the most disgraceful. But we loiter. Will you
pay your devoirs to our unknown?
I believe not; I have letters to write this morning.
To Emma? Pardon meI do not mean to pry
into your cabinet, but if the letters are to her they
may be deferred. She is a dear good soul, and will
find twenty apologies for every fault you commit.
If they are to her, such generosity should not be
abused. No, I will not go. But on what pretext will
you?
Pretext indeed! does a pilgrim seek for a pretext
to visit my Lady of Loretto, or the shrine of any other
saint? Here comes the gardener with a basket of fine
fruit which I have ordered to be prepared, and of which
I shall be the bearer to the sufferers pent in that dirty
sloop this breathless August morningfrom mere
philanthropy
you know. Commend me to Emma, he
added gaily; I will bear witness for you that your
enthusiasm for this unknown was a mere
coup de la
lune
, and that when daylight appeared you were as
loyal, andas dull as a married man.
Ellison's raillery did not render the bitter pill of
self-denial more palatable to M. Constant. He turned
away without reply, but instead of returning to his
apartment he obtained a gun, and inquiring the best
direction to pursue in quest of game, he sauntered into
a wooded defile that wound among the hills, and was
so enclosed by them as not to afford even a glimpse of
the river. Here he threw himself on the grass, took a
blank leaf from his pocket-book, and began a sonnet to
Constancy, but broke off in the middle; scribbled half
a dozen odd lines from the different songs that had
entranced him on the preceding evening; sketched a
guitar, then rose, and, still musing, pursued his way
up the defile. The path he had taken led him around
the base of an eminence to a rivulet that came
frolieking
down a hill, now leaping, and now loitering with
the capricious humour of childhood. He traced it to
its source, a clear fountain bubbling up from the earth
at the foot of a high, precipitous rock. Clusters of
purple and pink wild flowers hung from the clefts of
the rock, wreathing its bare old front, and presenting
a beautiful harmony in contrast, like infancy and old
age. The rock and the sides of the fountain formed a
little amphitheatre, enclosed and deeply shaded by the
mountain ash, the aromatic hemlock and the lofty
basswood
.
This sequestered retreat, with its fresh aspect
and sweet exhalations, afforded a delicious refuge from
the fierce heat and overpowering light of an August
day. M. Constant was lingering to enjoy it when his ear
caught the sound of distant and animated voices. He
started, and for a moment thought himself cheated by
the illusions of a distempered fancy; but, as the sounds
approached nearer, he was assured of their reality, and
they affected him like the most painful discord, though
they were produced by the sweet, clear, penetrating
voice of the unknown, and the hitherto welcome tones
of his friend.
The impropriety of a young girl straying off into
such a solitude with an acquaintance of an hour was
obvious, but was perhaps more shocking to M.
Constant
than it would have been to a perfectly
disinterested
observer. It gave a dreadful jar to his
preconceived
notions, and contrasted, rudely enough, with
the conduct of the preceding night, when the lady had,
with such scrupulous delicacy, forborne to show
herself
on the deck of the sloop. As they drew nearer
he thought there was something in the gay fimiliar
tones of Ellison, disgusting; and the laugh of the lady,
which before had seemed the sweetest music of a
youthful and innocent spirit, was now harsh and
hoydenish
.
The strain of their conversation, too, for they
were near enough to be heard distinctly, while the
windings of the path prevented his being seen, though
it was graceful chitchat enough, appeared to him
trifling
and flippant in the extreme. As they came still
nearer he listened more intently, for he had a personal
interest in the subject.
And so, my `Lady of the Guitar,' said Ellison,
you persist in preserving that scrap of paper, merely,
I presume, as a specimen of the sister arts of design
and poetry. You are sure those scratches are meant
for a guitar, and not a jewsharp, and that the fragment
is a sonnet and not a monody?
Certainly it is a sonnet; the poet says so himself.
See here`
Sonnet a la Constance
.'
Well, it is certainly in the strain of a `lament.' My
friend was in a strait; what he would do he could not.
Constancy is a very pretty theme for a boarding-school
letter, but I am afraid the poor fellow will not find his
inspiration in this tame virtue?
Ah! these tame virtues, as you call them, replied
the lady, are the salutary food of life, while your
themes of inspiration are intoxicating draughts, violent
and transient in their effects.
A very sage lesson, and very well conned. Did
your grandmother teach it to you?
No matterI have got it by
heart
.
O those moral New Englanders, they change all
the poetry of life to wise saws. Thank heaven you
have escaped from them in time to retain some portion
of your original mercurial nature. But now let me
tell you, my sage young friend, that same paper may
prove as dangerous where you are going as a match to
a magazine. So let me advise you, either keep it quite
to yourself, or give it to the winds.
You talk riddles, Mr. Ellison; but I will not be
quizzed into believing this little castaway scrap of
paper can be of any import.
Let me lable it for you then, if, as I see, it is to
be filled among the precious stores of your
pocket-book
.
There was a short pause when the lady, as M.
Constant supposed, looking over Ellison's
superscription
,
A A
read aloud, Love's Labour Lost, and then
exclaimed, Pshaw, Robert, how absurd! and tore off
the offensive lable, while he laughed at her vexation.
M. Constant felt that it would be very embarrassing
for him to be discovered as a passive listener to this
conversation. He had been chained to the spot by an
interest that he would gladly not have felt, but which
he could not suppress.
Another turn would bring them directly before him.
To delay longer without being seen was therefore
impossible
.
As he put aside the rustling branches, he
heard Ellison exclaim, Ha! there are some startled
quails; but before his friend could take a more
accurate
observation, he had sprung around an angle of
the rock, and was beyond sight and hearing.
The gentlemen met before dinner. M. Constant
was walking on the piazza, apparently moody and little
disposed to sympathize with Ellison's extravagant
expressions
of admiration of the unknown, or of regret
that the fresh breeze was now wafting the vessel and
its precious cargo far away.
In the name of Heaven, Constant, he said, what
has so suddenly turned you to ice? Last night you
seemed to think it necessary to inventpardon me
allege some apology for your prompt sensibility, and
you said it was not the beauty, the voice, the grace, or
any of the obvious and sufficient charms of this young
enchantressthat was your wordthat fascinated you,
but it was a resemblance to the glowing beauties of
your own clime; and now, if you had been born at
the north pole and she at the equator, you could not
manifest less affinity.
There are certain principles, replied M. Constant,
coldly, that overcome natural affinities. I hope you
have passed your morning agreeably.
Agreeably? Delightfully! Our
incognita
is more
beautiful than you described her.
Is she then still
incognita
to you? asked M.
Constant
with a penetrating glance.
Not exactly; she favoured me with her name.
Her name! what is it?
Pardon me, I am under a prohibition not to tell.
The lady certainly makes marked distinctions.
She is as reserved towards others as frank to you.
She had her reasons.
Doubtless; but what were they?
Why, one was that I refused to tell her your
name.
And why did you that?
I had my reasons, too.
M. Constant was vexed at the mystery his friend
affected
.
He was annoyed, too, at his perfect self
complacency
and imperturbable good nature, and, more
than all, ashamed of his own irritability. He made an
effort to overcome it, and to put himself on a level with
Ellison. He succeeded so far in his efforts as to
continue
to talk of the lady with apparent
nonchalance
till he was summoned to dinner; but though he tried
every mode his ingenuity could devise, he could not
draw from his friend the slightest allusion to the
lady's extraordinary visit to the shore, or any
particular
of their interview, which explained the perfect
familiarity that seemed to exist between them; and
what made this mystery more inscrutable, was the tone
of enthusiasm which Ellison maintained in speaking
of the lady, and which no young man sincerely feels
without a sentiment of respect.
In spite of M. Constant's virtuous resolutions and
efforts, the Lady of the Guitar continued to occupy
his imagination, and he determined to take the surest
measures to dispel an influence which he had in
vain resisted. As he parted from his friend at night,
he announced his intention of taking his departure
the following morning. After expressing his sincere
regret, Ellison said, You go immediately to town?
No; I go to Mr. Liston's.
Ah! is it so?
Even so, Ellison; but no more till we meet again.
I have supported my masquerade with little spirit; but
do not betray me, and we, neither of us, shall lose
reputation
.
M. Constant had for a long time been on terms of
intimacy and friendship with Miss Liston. This lady
belonged to one of the most distinguished families in
our country. She was agreeable in her person, had a
fund of good sense, was well informed and perfectly
amiable. Such characters are admirable in the
conduct
of life, if not exciting to the imagination; that
precious faculty, which, like the element of fire, the
most powerful and dangerous agent, may warm, or
may consume us. Long and intimate friendship
between
unfettered persons of different sexes is very
likely to terminate, as that of M. Constant and Miss
Liston terminated, in an engagement.
He had a sentiment of deep and fixed affection for
her, which, probably, no influence could have
materially
affected; but when that being crossed his path
who seemed to him to realize the brightest visions of
his youth, he felt a secret consciousness that the fidelity
of his affection was endangered. The little mystery
in which the unknown was shrouded, the very
circumstance
of calling her the unknown, magnified
the importance of the affair, as objects are enlarged,
seen through a mist. He very wisely and prudently
concluded that the surest way of dispelling all illusion,
would be frankly to relate the particulars to Miss
Liston, only reserving to himself certain feelings which
would not be to her edification, and which he believed
would be dispelled by participating their cause with
her. Accordingly, at their first meeting he was
meditating
how he should get over the embarrassment of
introducing the subject, when Miss Liston said, I
have a great pleasure in reserve for you, and left him
without any further explanation, and in a few moments
returned, followed by a lady, and saying as she
re-entered
,
Marie Angely, you and Constant, my best
friends, must not meet as strangers. A half
suppressed
exclamation burst from the lips of both. All
M. Constant's habitual grace forsook him. He
overturned
Miss Liston's workstand, workbox, and
working
paraphernalia, in advancing to make his bow.
Miss Angely's naturally high colour was heightened to
a painful excess; she made an effort to reciprocate the
common courtesies of an introduction, but in vain; the
words faltered on her lips, and after struggling a
moment
with opposing feelings, the truth and simplicity
of her heart triumphed, and turning to Miss Liston, she
said, Your friend, Emma, is the gentleman I met on
the river.
Miss Liston had been the confidant of all her
romantic
young friend's impressions from her moonlight
interview with the stranger, and it was now her turn
to suffer a full share of the embarrassment of the other
parties. She looked to M. Constant for an explanation.
Never had he, in the whole course of his diplomatic
career
,
been more puzzled; but after a moment's
hesitation
he followed Miss Angely in the safe path of
ingenuousness, and truly told all the particulars of his
late adventures, concluding with a good humoured
censure of his friend Ellison, who had long and
intimately
known Miss Angely, and who, to gratify his
mischief-loving temper, had contrived the mystery
which led to the rather awkward
denouement
.
Thus these circumstances, which might have been
woven into an intricate web of delicate embarrassment
and romantic distress, that might have ended in the
misery of one, perhaps of all parties, were diversted of
their interest and their danger by being promptly and
frankly disclosed.
Miss Angely, whom our readers have already
recognised
as the little girl of the inn, had met with Miss
A A 2
Liston at a boarding school in Boston, where, though
Miss Liston was her elder by several years, they
formed
an enthusiastic, and, rare in the annals of boarding
schools, an enduring friendship. Marie Angely had
faithfully discharged the debt of gratitude to Mrs.
Reynolds
,
and though acquiring, as may be supposed,
somewhat of the fastidiousness that accompanies refined
education and intercourse, no one could perceive any
abatement of her respect or affection for her kind
protectress
,
or the slightest diminution of her familiarity
with her. She passed a part of every summer with
her, always called her mother, and, by the fidelity of
her kindness and the charm of her manner, she diffused
light and warmth over the whole tract of Mrs.
Reynolds's
existence. She linked expectations, that might
have been blasted, to a happy futurity, and cherished
and elevated affections, which, but for her sunny
influence
,
would have been left to wither and perish.
Oh that the fortunate and happy could know how much
they have in their gift!
Miss Angely had been on one of her annual visits
to her humble friend, and was on her way,
accompanied
by her, to New York, where she was to join
Miss Liston, when the incidents occurred which we
have related.
There is nothing in the termination of our tale to
indemnify the lover of romance for its previous
dulness
;
but it is a true story, and its materials must be
received from tradition, and not supplied by
imagination
.
M. Constant was, in the course of a few weeks,
united
to Miss Liston. This lady had long cherished a
hope that her friend would be a permanent member of
her family, and she used every art of affection to
persuade
her to remain with her at least so long as she
should decline the suits of all the lovers who were now
thronging around her, attracted by her beauty, or
loveliness
,
or the
eclat
she derived from her intimacy with
the wife of the ambassador. M. Constant did not very
warmly second his wife's entreaties. He perhaps had
a poignant recollection of certan
elective affinities
, and
his experience taught him the truth, if indeed he had
not derived it from a higher source, that, in the
present
infirm condition of human virtue, it is always
safest and best not voluntarily to enter into
temptation
.
Miss Angely returned to Boston. M. Constant's
union with Miss Liston was one of uninterrupted
confidence
and conjugal happiness; but it was not destined
to be of long duration. His wife died in about a year
after their marriage. Among her papers was found a
letter addressed to her husband, written in expectation
of the fatal issue of the event that had terminated her
life, in which she earnestly recommended her friend
as her successor. In due time her request was honoured.
M. Constant married Miss Angely. After residing
for some time in America, they went to France, where
she was received as an ornament to her noble family,
and acknowledged to be the brightest jewel in its
coronet.
Far from the mean pride of those who shrink from
recurring to the humble stages in their progress to the
heights of fortune, Madame Constant delighted in
relating
the vicissitudes of her life, and dwelt particularly
on that period, when, as Mrs. Reynolds's handmaid, she
considered herself honoured in standing behind the
chair of the wife of the great General Knox.
The longest day comes to the vesper hour.
Madame
Constant closed at Paris a life of virtue,
prosperity
,
and happiness, in July 1827.
THE CANARY FAMILY.
I paid
a visit to my friend Sophia, yesterday. I
could describe her; but if the portrait did justice to
her peculiar loveliness, every one who knows the
original would know it, and that she would not like;
for she is not a subject for an exhibition picture, but for
an image to be worn next the heart. I may say of her,
for in this feature of her character I trust that many of
my young friends resemble her, that she has certain
delicate chords in her composition that vibrate to
whatever
is beautiful and loveable. Her first glance and
smile win a child's love; the most delicate flowers
thrive under her culture as if they were in their
native
atmosphere, and the most timid birds are soon
tamed by her gentle usage, and seem to make her their
intimate and confidential friend.
Her favourites, at present, are a little family of
canaries
.
She gave me their history, and it is evident that
she has observed their conduct, and studied their
characters
,
with an interest similar to that which a tender
mother feels in her offspring. She, who watches over
her little dependents with such love, must be a more
accurate observer than the bird-fancier, who rears the
bird, as the slave merchant trains his captive, for the
market. We, therefore, request our readers will
believe
our story, and we pledge them the word of a
faithful biographer that we will not add a single
fictitious
circumstance to embellish it.
Sophia being much alone, procured a canary, as an
innocent and pleasant companion. She preferred a
male, because the male birds are gifted with the
sweetest
song. The little creature soon seemed to feel quite
at home in Sophia's boudoir, and attached to his gentle
mistress. As far as he could, he made his society
agreeable. He seemed never tired of singing to her;
would flourish quite a pretty little accompaniment
when she played on the piano; would perch on her
shoulder, for she allowed him the liberty of the room;
and sometimes daintily pick from her plate when she
was eating. In short, he did his best to be happy in
his solitude, but after a while he got the blues, became
silent, and drooped, and Sophia said it was not good
for birds any more than man to be alone, so she went
to Lawrie Todd's, the immortalized florist and
bird-fancier
,
and selected the prettiest little damsel in the
aviary to be a companion for our sighing bachelor.
Some persons have thought that if the President of
the United States appointed all the matches in the
country, they would prove full as happy as they now
do. Certain it is, that if our little friend had had the
pick of his own bright isles, he could not have been
better satisfied, than he was with the selection his
mistress
had made for him. He and his helpmeet were a
picture of conjugal harmony, and she, a thrifty little
wife, soon began to build her nest, and thus prepare
for the expected wants of a young family.
Sophia took care that she should not lack materials.
She hung within the cage a net-bag, containing hay
and hair. The husband seemed anxious to aid her,
and certainly did his best, but he was clumsy at
house-work
,
and Sophia observing that the little lady hardly
gave herself breathing time, and afraid that she would
overwork herself, contrived, while Mrs. Canary was
taking a hasty dinner, dexterously to intertwine some
of the hairs in the nest. But even Sophia's delicate
fingers were not equal to the art of the bird. At the
first glance at her nest, she lost her sweet temper, flew
into a violent passion, went to work like a little fury,
and in half a minute she had extricated every one of
the hairs inserted with such pains, and then arranging
them with the nicest skill, she seemed to say, Shall
a mortal presume to mingle her coarse labour with that
of a heaven-instructed bird? Her mate stood by,
the while, and it may be, laughed in his feathered
sleeve, to find his little wife a lady of such spirit, and,
like a prudent husband, resolved never to provoke it.
Sophia placed feathers within reach, aware how
very carefully the bird prepares the inside of the nest,
the part that is to come in contact with the
unprotected
skin of the young bird. It was affecting to see
with what pains the little creature cut off, with her
bill, the quill of the feather, as we have often seen a
careful mother remove every pin and needle that could
by possibility scratch her child.
Sophia once more interposed, and with better
success
.
She scraped some very soft lint and put into
the cage. This service, Mrs. Canary very thankfully
accepted, for thanks are certainly best expressed by
using well the gift. She instantly caught up the lint,
and in a very short time completed the nest. Sophia
says, and she has a right to know, that there is as much
difference in individual character among birds as
human
beings; and that lady-birds sometimes, as well as
ladies, make very indifferent house-wives. But our
heroine was not one of these. She was a pattern.
Her nest was as exactly formed as if it were done by
a mathematical rule, and the entire labour of
constructing
this beautiful little edifice was performed in one
day.
In the course of a week four eggs were deposited in
it; and in eleven days, or one fortnight after, I have
forgotten which, four birds, three males and one female,
made their appearance. And now the young husband,
become a father, was more devoted than ever. He
was an epicure for his wife; selected all the delicate
morsels for her, and aided her in feeding the young
ones. She, like all good wives, was a keeper at home.
He was a pattern of conjugul kindness. Except when
employed in procuring food, he laid his head beside his
mate's, and if any stranger came into the apartment,
he would start up, sit on the side of the nest, half
extend
his wings, and fix his eye on the intruder, as
much as to say, If any discourteous knight disturb my
lady-love, I will do battle in her behalf. But his
chivalric spirit was not called into action. Sophia took
care that no one should rudely approach the cage, and
the happy little family was unmolested.
It was a scene of perfect domestic happiness, which,
a poet says, (I do not believe him,) is the Only bliss
that has survived the fall.
Who would have thought that at this moment a
cloud was gathering over this harmonious contented
family.
Adjoining the house in which Sophia lives is a
public
garden, one of the favourite resorts and prettiest
embellishments
of our city. I wish I could transport all
my young friends there, that they might realize some
of the beautiful visions that have floated around their
brains when they have been reading the Arabian Tales.
The garden is laid out with taste, enriched with plants
of every clime, and filled with the delicious odours of
Cape jasmines and orange flowers. Every thing is
managed with taste. Before a saloon in the centre of
the garden is a pyramid of fragrant leaves and bright
blossoms, formed by placing pots on circular benches
around a pump, which but for this floral drapery would
have been a deformity. Every evening the garden is
lighted by coloured lamps hung in arches over the
walks, illuminated columns, and fantastic
transparencies
.
One broad avenue terminates at one extremity
by noble mirrors, that multiply to apparent myriads
the crowds that resort to this fairy land. At the other
end of this avenue a painting is hung, in which the
walk is so well represented by the art of perspective,
that it seems to stretch as far as the eye can extend; a
winding path leads to a grotto, embellished with shells
and corals, and sparkling with crystals; a fit bower for
the pretty naiads. In another secluded nook is a
hermitage
,
which seems to be in a deep and rocky recess,
where sits a hermit, reverend and gay. I would
not advise my young friends to examine all these
things by daylight, lest they should find they had been
deceived by false appearances. There is no harm in
an agreeable and innocent illusion.
But to return to our canaries, whom we left at the
moment of impending evil.
Sophia, as we said, had always allowed her first
canary the liberty of the room. The weather had
now become so warm that she sat with her window
raised, and the bird, either tempted by the sweet odours
that rose from the garden, or the love of liberty, and
probably not aware of the danger of separation from
his family, flew out of the window. Sophia was
alarmed and distressed, and she immediately hit on the
most probable expedient for recovering the wanderer.
She had her cage conveyed to the garden. The little
rover was skimming the air and perching on the green
branches, but the moment he espied his mate and her
little ones, he flew to his house again, preferring
captivity
with them to freedom without them.
The cage was again taken in hand to be reconveyed
to the boudoir. Mrs. Canary seemed agitated and
flurried with the sudden changes in her condition;
her little head was turned with joy at the recovery of
her mate. She flapped her wings against the wires of
the cage, lighted on her perch, and on her nest, and
finally, for the door of the cage had been carelessly
left open, out she went. It was evident she was
bewildered
.
The cage was set down in the hope that
the instincts of the mother would bring her back, but
I have no doubt the poor little creature was like a
person
suddenly deprived of reason. She flew round and
round, as birds are said to do, when fascinated by a
snake. There were some wild sparrows flying over
the garden, they hovered around her. This seemed
still farther to alarm and distract her; the little
vagrants
encompassed her; enclosed her within their
circle, and drove her off, and she was forever lost to
her bereaved family.
I do not doubt her widowed mate felt all that bird
could feel. He expressed his affection for his lost
companion as good husbands should do, by the most
devoted care of the little ones. Sophia was a foster
mother to them, and he was father, mother, every
thing. It was really affecting to see his care of them.
It was as much as he could do, with all the aid Sophia
gave him in cracking the seeds, to supply food to the
hungry little fry; the poor fellow really became thin,
while they grew apace.
Perhaps some of our young readers may not know
how the parent prepares the food for the young bird.
An egg boiled hard, a lettuce leaf, seeds and water,
were all placed by Sophia within the bird's reach. He
would take a little of each, and appear to roll the whole
in his mouth till it was formed into a paste. Then he
seemed to swallow it; for when he was ready to
distribute
it to the birds, he made a motion with his throat,
like that which is necessary to recover what is partly
swallowed. While the birds were very young, one
preparation would suffice for the whole; but in a few
days, three of them would cat all their father could
prepare at once. He was not discouraged at this, but
went patiently to work again. Sophia was alarmed
lest he should forget which was the unfed bird; he
never mistook, but always, like a just and good parent,
made an equal distribution to all his children.
Never did a nursery, under the care of the most
experienced
nurse, thrive better. At the end of the
week the female bird, the only female in the brood,
was hopping off her nest. She was the most forward,
knowing bird, of her age, ever seen. In a fortnight,
B B
she flew about the room, and lured her timid brothers
to adventure forth. She continues to manifest the same
bold, enterprising, independent character.
A friend of Sophia's who had admired, from day to
day, the devotion of the father to his young, very
kindly
sent him the best reward of his fidelity, another
mate. When I saw the family last, his second wife
had built her nest, though not half so well as her
predecessor
.
She was sitting on her eggs, and was most
affectionately tended by her husband. Sophia
complains
that he has become somewhat of a hen-hussy,
and had rather be cowering over the nest than abroad
on the wing, with his gay flock. They all live
harmoniously
with the step-mother, save the little vixen
of a girl; and she pecks and scolds the lady-mama,
who bears her pettishness with calmness and dignity,
and will, I doubt not, in time, subdue the little shrew.
THE END.Dear RandolphI thank you a thousand times and
so does C, for the gold eagles. There never was
anything in the world so beautiful, I do'nt believe.
They are far before the grown up ladies. We shall
certainly wear them to meeting next Sabbath, and fix
them so every body in the world can see them, and not
let the bow of ribbon fall down over them, as Miss
Clarke did last Sabbath, cause she has got that old
democrat, Doctor Star, for a sweetheart; but I managed
her nicely, Randolph. In prayer time when she did
not dare move, I whirled round the bow so the eagle
stood up bravely, and flashed right in Doctor Star's
eyes. I did not care so very much about having an
eagle for myself, (though I do now since you have
given it to me,) but I thought it very important for
C to wear the federal badge, because her father is
a senator in Congress. Father is almost as pleased as
we are. I see Clover coming and I must make haste;
poor old fellow! I heard his tread when it stormed so
awfully last night, and I got father to put him up in our
stable. Was not he proper good? It was after prayers,
too, and his wig was off and his knee buckles out. There,
they all go out of Deacon Garfield's to read Clover's
papers. Good by, dear,
dear
Randolph.
F. A.Honoured SirIt is with no little grief of mind
and sadness of heart, that I am necessitated to be so
bould as to supplicate your honoured self, with the
honourable assembly of your General Court, to extend
your mercy and favour once again, to me, and my
children. Little did I dream, that I should have
occasion
to petition in a matter of this nature; but so it
is, that through the divine providence and your
benignity
,
my sonn obtayned so much pity and mercy at
your hands, to enjoy the life of his mother. Now my
supplication to your honours is, to begg affectionately
the life of my dear wife. 'Tis true, I have not seen
her above this half yeare, and cannot tell how, in the
frame of her spirit, she was moved thus againe to run
so great a hazard to herself, and perplexity to me and
mine, and all her friends and wellwishers.
So it is, from Shelter Island, about by Peynod,
Narragansett, &c., to the town of Providence, she
secretly
and speedily journeyed, and as secretly from
thence came to your jurisdiction. Unhappy journey,
may I say, and woe to that generation, say I, that
gives occasion thus of grief (to those that desire to be
quiett), by helping one another to hazard their lives
to, I know not what end, nor for what purpose.
If her zeal be so great, as thus to adventure, oh!
let your pitty and favour surmount it, and save her
life. Let not your love and wonted compassion be
conquered by her inconsiderate maddness, and how
greatly will your renoune be spread, if by so
conquering
,
you become victorious. What shall I say more!
I know you are all sensible of my conditionyou
see what my petition is, and what will give me and
mine peace.
Oh! let Mercy's wings soar over Justice's ballance,
and then whilst I live, I shall exalt your goodness;
but otherways't will be a languishing sorrow  yea,
so great, that I should gladly suffer the blow at once,
much rather. I shall forbear to trouble you with
words, neither am I in a capacity to expatiate myself
at present. I only say this, yourselves have been,
and are, or may be husbands to wives; so am I, yea
to one most dearly beloved. Oh! do not deprive me
of her, but I pray give her me once again. I shall be
so much obliged forever that I shall endeavour
continually
to utter my thanks and render you love and
honour most renouned. Pitty me! I beg it with tears,
and rest your humble suppliant,
W.
Dyre
.Dear Berville
It is, I believe, or should be, a maxim of the true
church, that confession of a sin is the first step
towards
its expiation.
Let me, then, invest you with a priest's cassock,
and relieve my conscience by the relation of an odd
episode in my history. When I parted from you, I
was going with my friend, Robert Ellison, to visit his
father, who has a beautiful place on the banks of the
Hudson. Young Ellison, as you know, is a thorough
republican, and does not conceal his contempt for those
of his compatriots, who, professing the same
principles
,
are really aristocrats in their prejudices and
manners
;
who, having parted, and as they pretend
voluntarily
,
with the substance, still grasp at the shadow.
To test these false pretensions, and to mortify an
absurd
pride, he joyfully acquiesced in a proposition I
made to him, to lay aside the pomp and circumstance
of my official character, and to be presented to his
friends without any of the accidental advantages with
which fortune has invested me. You will inquire my
motive, for you will not suspect me of the absurdity
of crusading against the follies of society, the most
hopeless of all crusades. No, as our own Moliere
says,
C'est une folie,  nulle autre seconde,
De vouloir se mler de corriger le monde.
My motives were then, in the first place, a love of
ease, of dishabille; an impatience of the irksomeness of
having the dignity of a nation to sustain; and, in the
second place, I wished to ascertain how much of the
favour lavished on me I should place to the account of
the ambassador, and how much I might reserve to my
own proper self.
You may call this latent vanity. I will not
quarrel
with you. I will not pretend that I was moved
solely by a love of truth, by a pure desire to find out
the realities of things; but alas! my dear Berville, if
we were to abstract from the web of our motives,
every thread tinged with self, would not warp and
woof too disappear? Let, then, my motive be what
it might, you will allow the experiment required
courage.
We had some difficulty in settling the precise point
at which to gage my pretensions. `Do not claim a
drop of noble blood,' said my friend, `it would defeat
your purpose.' There is something cabalistic in that
word `noble.' The young ladjes at  would at
once invest you with the attributes of romance; and
the old dowagers would persecute you with histories
of their titled ancestors, and anecdotes of lords and
ladies that figured in the drawing-rooms of the colony.
Neither must you be a plain gentleman of fortune,
though that may seem to you a sufficient descent from
your high station; but fortune has everywhere her
shrines and her devotees. You must be the artificer
of your own fortune, a talented young man who has
no rank or fortune to be spoken of. What say you to
the profession of a painter, a portrait painter, since that
is the only branch of the art that gets a man bread in
this country.' I acceded without shrinking, secretly
flattering myself that my friend either underrated my
intrinsic merit, or did the world rank injustice.
When we arrived we found a large party of the
neighbouring gentry assembled to dine at . I
was received with great courtesy by the elder Ellison,
and with kindness by Madame, on the ground, simply,
of being an acquaintance of their son's. My friend
took care to prevent any elation from my reception by
saying to me in a low voice, `My father, God bless
him, has good sense, good feeling, and experience, and
he well knows that the value of gold does not depend
on the circulation it has obtained;' and truly if he
had known that I bore the impress of the king's
countenance
he could not have received me more graciously.
There might have been more formality in his
reception
of the public functionary, but there could not have
been more genuine hospitality. He presented me to
his guests, and here I was first reminded of my
disguise
.
Instead of the sensation I have been accustomed
to see manifested in the lighting up of the face, in the
deferential bow, or the blush of modesty, no emotion
was visible. No eye rested on me, not a link of
conversation
was broken, and I was suffered, after rather
an awkward passage through the ceremony, to retire
to my seat, where I remained, observing, but not
observed
,
till dinner was announced. From the habit of
precedence, I was advancing to lead Madame to the
dining-room, when I encountered my friend's glance,
and shrunk back in time to avoid what must have
appeared an unpardonable impertinence. I now fell
into my modest station in the rear, and offered my
arm to an awkward, bashful girl, who I am sure had
two left hands by the manner in which she received
my courtesy, and who did not honour me so far as to
look up to see who it was that had saved her from the
mortifying dilemma of leaving the drawingroom alone.
I helped my companion from the dish nearest to me,
and waited myself till Madame, reminded by her son
of her oversight, sent me a plate of soup. I was
swallowing this, unmolested by any conversation
addressed
to me, when my friend's father said to him,
`When have you seen the French ambassador, Robert?
I hoped you would have persuaded him to pay us a
visit.'
`Perhaps he may,' replied my friend, `before the
summer is over. He is at present out of the city on
some excursion.'
`A prodigious favourite is your son with the French
ambassador, as I hear from all quarters,' said a
gentleman
who sat next to Mr. Ellison.
`Ah! is that so, Robert? Are you intimate with
Monsieur ?'
`He does me the honour to permit my society,
sir.' Every mouth was now opened in praise of the
ambassador. None of the company had seen him, but
all had heard of his abilities, the charms of his
conversation
,
his urbanity, his
savoir plaire
. `You must be
proud of your countryman, M. Dufau?' (this was my
assumed name) said my host, with that courtesy that
finds a word for the humblest guest.
I said it was certainly gratifying to my national
feeling to find him approved in America, but that,
perhaps
it was not his merit alone that obtained him such
distinguished favour; that I had understood he was a
great admirer of this country, and though I should do
him injustice to say `he praised, only to be praised,'
yet I believed there was always a pretty accurately
measured exchange in this traffic.
`The gentleman is right,' said an old Englishman
who sat opposite to me, and who had not before
vouchsafed
to manifest a consciousness of my existence; `this
is all French palaver in Monsieur . He cannot
be such a warm admirer of this country. The man
knows better; he has been in England.'
I was too well acquainted with English manners
to be startled by any manifestation of that conviction
which an Englishman demonstrates in every part of
the world, that his nation has no equal; but I
instinctively
defended my countryman, and eager for an
opportunity to test the colloquial powers so much
admired
in the ambassador, I entered the lists with my
English opponent, and thus stimulated, I was certainly
far more eloquent than I ever had been before, on the
history, the present condition, and the prospects of
this country. But alas for the vanity of M. Dufau!
my host, it is true, gave me all the attention he could
spare from the courtesies of the table, but save his ear,
I gained none but that half-accorded by my
contemptuous
,
testy, and impatient antagonist, who after
barking
out a few sentences at me, relapsed into a moody
silence.
I next addressed some trifling gallantries to my
bashful neighbour, fancying that she who was
neglected
by everybody else, would know how to
appreciate
my attentions; but her eyes were rivetted to a
fashionable beauty at the upper extremity of the table,
and a half a dozen `no sirs' and `yes sirs,' misplaced,
were all the return I could obtain from her. To
remain
silent and passive, you know, to me, was
impossible
;
so I next made an essay on a vinegar faced dame on
my left, far in the wane of life. `If my civilities have
been lead elsewhere, in this market,' thought I, `they
will at least prove silver or gold.' But here I received
my cruellest rebuff; for the lady, after apparently
listening to me, said, `I do not understand you.' I
raised my voice, but she, determining to shelter the
infirmity of age at my expense, replied, `I am not so
deaf, sir, but really you speak such broken English,
that I cannot understand you.' This was too much,
and I might have betrayed my vexation, if an
intelligent
and laughing glance from my friend had not
restored my good humour, and a second reflection,
suggesting that it was far more important to the old
woman's happiness that her vanity should remain
unimpaired
,
than it could be to me to have mine reduced,
even to fragments, I humbly begged her pardon, and
relapsed into a contented silence, solacing myself with
the thought, that our encounter was but an illustration
of that of the china and earthen jars. But I will not
weary you with detailing all the trials of my
philosophy
,
but only confess that the negligence of the
servants was not the least of themthe grinning
self-complacency
with which these apes of their superiors
signified to me that my wants might be deferred.
After all, my humble position would not have been
so disagreeable, if I had been accustomed to it. The
world's admiration, like all other luxuries, in the end
becomes necessary, and then, too, like other luxuries,
ceases to be enjoyed, or even felt, till it is withdrawn
and leaves an aching void. If this is Irish, set it down
to my broken English.
After dinner, I followed the ladies to the
drawing-room
,
and was presented by my friend to Miss ,
a reigning beauty. She received me with one of
those gracious smiles, that a hacknied belle always
bestows on a new worshipper at her shrine. These
popular favourites, be it clergyman, politician, or
beauty
,
are as covetous of the flatteries they receive,
as a miser is of gold. No matter how unclean the
vessel from which the incense rises; no matter what
Z
base alloy, may mingle with the precious metal.
Have you ever encountered one of these spoiled
favourites
in the thronged street, and tried to arrest the
attention for a moment; to fix the eye that was roving
for every tributary glance? If you have, you will
understand without my describing it, the
distrait
manner with which the belle received my first
compliments
.
Even this was not long accorded me, for a
better accredited and more zealous admirer than
myself
appearing, she left me to my meditations, which
were not rendered the more agreeable by my
overhearing
an old lady say, in a voice, which, though slightly
depressed, she evidently made no effort to subdue to
an inaudible key, `I wonder what possessed Robert
Ellison to bring that French portrait painter here!
How the world has changed since the Revolution!
There is no longer any house where you don't meet
mixed society.' My friend had approached in time
to overhear her as well as myself. `The ignorant old
fool!' he exclaimed, `shall I tell her that artists are
the nobility of every country?'
`No,' said I, `do not waste your rhetoric; there is
no enlightening the ignorance of stupidity; a black
substance will not reflect even the sun's rays.'
Ellison then proposed that I should join a party at
whist; but I complained of the heated air of the
drawing-room
,
and, availing myself of my insignificance, I
followed the bent of my inclinations, a privilege the
humble should not undervalue, and sauntered abroad.
The evening was beautiful enough to have soothed a
misanthrope, or warmed the heart of a stoic. Its peace,
its salutary, sacred voice restored me to myself, and I
was ashamed that my tranquillity had been disturbed.
I contemned the folly of the artificial distinctions of
life, and felt quite indifferent to themwhen alone.
The ground in front of my friend's house slopes to
the Hudson, and is still embellished with trees of the
majestic native growth. Where nature has left
anything
to be supplied by art, walks have been arranged
and planted; but carefully, so as not to impede the
view of the river, which was now in perfect repose.
A sloop lay in the channel, its sails all furled, idly
floating on the slumbering surface. While I was
wishing
my friend were with me, for I am too much of a
Frenchman to relish fully even nature, the favourite
companion of sentimentalists, in solitude, I saw a boat
put off from the little vessel, and row slowly towards the
shore. Presently a sweet female voice swelled on the
stillness of the night, accompanied by the notes of a
guitar, struck by a practised hand. Could any young
man's mercury resist moonlight and such music? Mine
could not, and I very soon left behind me all of
terra
firma
that intervened between me and the siren, and
ensconced myself in a deeply shaded nook at the very
water's edge, where I could see and hear without being
observed. The boat approached the spot where I
stood, and was moored at half a dozen yards from my
feet; but as my figure was in shadow, and sheltered
by a thick copse of hazel bushes, I was perfectly
concealed
,
while, by a flood of moonbeams, that poured on
my unsuspicious neighbours, I saw them as plainly as
if it were daylight. These were two men, whom I
soon ascertained to be the captain of the sloop and an
attendant, and that they were going to a farm house in
the neighbourhood for eggs, milk, &c. The two
females
were to remain in the boat till their return.
The lady of the guitar was inclined to go with them
as far as the oak wood on the brow of the hill; but the
captain persuaded her to remain in the boat, by telling
her there was a formidable dog on the place, which
she might encounter. As soon as the captain was gone,
her companion, an elderly, staid looking country
woman
,
said to her, `Now, child, as I came here for
your pleasure, you must sing for mine. None of your
new-fangled fancies, but good Old Robin Grey.'
`Oh, Robin Grey is a doleful ditty; but anything
to reward you for indulging me in coming on shore.'
She then sung that touching ballad. The English,
certainly the Scotch, excel us as much in the pathos of
unembellished nature and truth, as we do them in all
literary refinement, ingenuity, and grace. I know not
how much of the tribute that gushed from my heart
was paid to the poetry and music, and how much to
the beautiful organ by which they were expressed, for
the fair musician looked herself like one of the bright
creations of poetry. I would describe her, but
description
is cold and quite inadequate to convey an
idea of her, and of the scene with which she
harmonized
.
It was one of nature's sweetest accords; the
balmy air, the cloudless sky, the river, reflecting like
a spotless mirror the blue arch, the moon and her
bright train; my enchantress, the embodied spirit of
the evening, and her music the voice of nature. I
might have forgotten that I was in human mould, but
I had one effectual curb to my imagination; one
mortal
annoyance. Argus, confound him! had followed
me from the house, and it was only by dint of
continued
coaxing and caressing that I could keep him
quiet. Before the ballad was finished, however, he
was soothed by its monotonous sadness, and crouching
at my feet, he fell asleep, I believe. I forgot him.
Suddenly `the dainty spirit' changed from the low
breathings of melancholy to a gay French airthe
very air, Berville, that Claudine, in her mirthful
moments
,
used to sing to us. The transition was so
abrupt that it seemed as if the wing of joy had swept
over the strings of her instrument. I started forth
from my concealment. That was not all. Argus sprang
out, too, and barking furiously, bounded towards the
boat. The old woman screamed, `There is the dog!'
and the young lady, not less terrified, dropped her
guitar, and unhooking the boat, she seized an oar and
pushed it off without listening to my apologies and
assurances
.
In her agitation she dropped the oar, and
her companion, still more tremulous than herself, in
her attempt to regain it, lost the other, which she had
instinctively grasped. As soon as the first impulse
imparted to the boat was expended, it scarcely moved
at all, and I had leisure to explain my sudden
appearance
,
and to say that my dog, far from being the
formidable
animal they imagined, was a harmless spaniel,
who should immediately make all the amends in his
power for the terror he had caused. I then directed
him to the floating oars. He plunged into the water
and brought them to me, but he either did not, or
would not understand my wish that he should convey
them to the boat, which, though very slowly, was
evidently
receding from the shore. I then without farther
hesitation, threw off my coat, swam to the boat, and
receiving there the oars from Argus's mouth, I soon
reconducted the boat to its haven. There was
something
enchanting to me in the frankness with which
my fair musician expressed her pleasure at the homage
I had involuntarily paid to her art, and the grace with
which she received the slight service I rendered her.
Perhaps I felt it the more for the mortifying
experience
of the day. I do not care very nicely to analyze
my feelings, nor to ascertain how much there was of
restored self complacency in the delicious excitement
of that hour.
The elderly lady, for lady she must needs be
since my fair
incognita
called her mother, expressed
a matronly solicitude about the effect of my wet
garments
,
but I assured her that I apprehended no
inconvenience
from them, and I begged to be allowed to
remain at my station till the return of their
attendants
.
The circumstances of our introduction had been
such as to dissipate all ceremony. Indeed this
characteristic
of English manners would have as ill fitted
the trustful, ingenuous, and gay disposition of my new
acquaintance, as a coat of mail her light, graceful
person
.
Z 2
She sung at my request, our popular opera airs,
with more effect, because with far more feeling, than
our best professed artists. She talked of music, and
of the poetry of nature, with genius and taste; and she
listened with that eager and pleased attention, which is
the second best gift of conversation. I should have
taken no note of the passage of time but for the
fidgetting
of the old lady, who often interrupted us with
expressions
of her concern at the captain's delay, for
which he, quite too soon, appeared to render an
account
himself. As I was compelled to take my leave,
I asked my fair unknown if I might not be allowed to
think of her by some more accurate designation than
the `Lady of the Guitar.'
`My name is'she replied promptly, and then,
after a moment's hesitation, added, `Nopardon me,
your romantic designation better suits the adventure of
the night.' I was vexed at my disappointment, but
she chased away the shade of displeasure by the
graceful
playfulness with which she kissed her hand to me
as the boat pushed off. I lingered on the shore till she
had reached the vessel, and then slowly retraced my
steps towards the house. I was startled by meeting
my friend, for my mind was so absorbed that I had not
heard his approaching footstep `Ah!' he exclaimed,
`is this your philosophy? turned misanthrope at the
first frown from the world.'
`My philosophy,' I replied, `has neither been
vanquished
,
nor has it conquered, for I had forgotten all
its trials.'
My friend evidently believed, notwithstanding my
disclaimer, that my vanity required some indemnity
for the humiliations it had sustained, and he repeated
to me some assuaging compliments from his father.
`But,' he concluded, `tell me, have you really turned
sentimentalist, and been holding high converse with
the stars?'
`With a most brilliant star,' I replied, and related
my adventure.
Ellison's curiosity was excited, and he proposed
we should take our flutes, go out in the barge, and
serenade the `Lady of the Guitar.' I, of course,
assented
,
and the next half hour found us floating around
the little vessel like humble satellites. We played an
accompaniment and sung alternately, he in English,
and I in French; but there was no token given that
the offered incense was accepted; no salutation, save a
coarse one from the captain, who invited us to go `on
board and take some
grog
.' We of course declined
his professional courtesy. `Then, for the Lord's sake,
lads,' he said, `stop your piping, and give us a good
berth. Sleep, at this time o'night, is better music
than the jolliest tune that ever was played.'
Thus dismissed, and discomfited by the lady's
neglect
,
we resumed our oars and were preparing to
return
to the shore, when the cabin window was gently
raised, and our fair
incognita
sung a sweet little
French air, beginning `
Adieu, adieu!
' We remained,
sound, motion, almost breath suspended till the song
was finished.
So sweetly she bids us adieu,
I think that she bids us return,
said my friend, and we instantly rowed our boat
towards
the stern of the vessel. At this moment the
sash was suddenly dropped, and taking this for a
definitive `Good night,' we retired.
Now, dear Berville, I have faithfully related the
adventures of my masquerademy boyish pastime,
you may call it. Be it so. This day has been worth
a year of care and dignity. I shall return to New
York in a few days. Till then farewell.
Yours,
Constant
.
But though M. Constant professed himself satisfied
with his day, there was a lurking disquietude at his
heart. He had written to assure himself there was
nothing there he dare not express, and yet he had
concluded
without once alluding to the cause of his
self-reproach
.
He had folded the letter, but he opened it,
and added;
P. S. I did not describe to you my friend's
vexation
that the responded song was in French. `Ah!'
said he, `I see there is no chance for such poor devils
as I, so long as you are neither married nor
betrothed
.'